Vol. I.2
CHAPTER I.
The Neptunian origin of Robin Day; with an account of his early
friends, Mother Moll and Skipper Duck, and his preferment to
a fat office.
Sylla
, the Roman dictator, is, as far as I know,
the only great man on record who attributed his
advancement to good luck; all other great men being
modestly content to refer their successes in life to
their own merits; insisting, with the philosophers,
that there is not, in reality, any such thing as luck
at all, good, bad, or indifferent, but that every man's
fortune, whether happy or evil, is referable to his
own agency, the direct result of his own wise or
foolish actions. Such may be the fact, for aught I can
say, (it is a comfortable doctrinef or the fortunate,)
and I do not pretend to controvert it; but of one
thing I am very certain, namely, that whether there
be bad luck in the world or not, there is an
abundance
of those unhappy personages who are
commonly
considered its victimsthat is to say,
unlucky
dogs;
of which race I was undoubtedly born
a member.
My introduction into the world was of itself
sufficient
to establish my claim to pre-eminence in
misfortune
;
for, from all I was ever able to learn, instead
of making my appearance in the usual way, I came
ashore, one stormy night in September, in the year
1796, upon the coast of New Jersey, washed up by
the sea, like a king-crab; with this advantage,
however
,
that I had for my shell, or cradle, the battered
hull of a Yankee schooner, which, if it did not keep
me as dry and snug as was desirable, preserved me,
at least, from being swallowed up by the raging
billows
.
In other words, I was cast ashore in a wreck
name unknown, as the gazettes say, from which
I was taken, a puny little bantling of some twelve
or fifteen months old, half famished and half drowned,
the only living creature, save two ducks that were
soaking in a coop, and a broken-backed cat in the
forecastle, that escaped.
The particulars of this eventful catastrophe, there
were many good reasons why I, though so much
interested in knowing them, should never succeed
in making myself perfectly acquainted with. The
scene of disaster was in the neighborhood of
Barnegat
,
a place famous in the annals of shipwreck; and
the vessel, there was little doubt, contained a rich
freight of rum and sugar, and other West Indian
products, which it was manifestly nobody's business
to know how to account for. Besides, it was thought
not improbable that the wreck of this particular
schooner was owing less to the fury of the storm
than to the instrumentality of the people of the coast
land pirates, as they have been called from time
immemorialwho were often accused in past days,
as sometimes in the present, of setting up false
beacons
,
to decoy unsuspecting mariners to their ruin.
I have even heard it said, there was a rumor at the
time that the crew of the unfortunate vessel (whose
disappearance could not be otherwise accounted for,)
had met with foul play from the wreckers; which, if
true, was a better reason than all for their keeping
a veil of obscurity over the whole affair. But this
rumor after all, had no better foundation than
surmise
,
and a disposition on the part of malicious
people
to explain the disappearance of the crew, which
was undoubtedly a very remarkable feature in the
shipwreck, in the most unfavorable way. It was
more charitable to suppose they had been suddenly
washed from the deck by some furious billow, which
had carried away every thing above board; and that
I owed my preservation to being left nestling in the
highest berth in the cabin, whence I was plucked by
my robber preservers.
Another reason why the particulars were never
known, was that no one interested ever made
inquiry
.
No agent or emissary of owner or
underwriter
,
as far as I could learn, ever visited the spot
to investigate the circumstances attending the wreck,
or attempt the recovery of the property lost: which,
I suppose, was because the news of the disaster never
travelled more than a dozen miles from the scene,
and then only among people, who, whatever cause
they might have to report the worst of it among
themselves, had too much interest in the
preservation
of coast privilegesthe uninterrupted
enjoyment
of flotsam and jetsamto invite the
interference
of strangers and law officers. As for myself,
I think the reader will allow, I was entirely too
young to trouble myself in the matter; or, indeed, to
know any thing about it. Who were my parents,
or whether I had any, were questions which, as they
concerned nobody, so nobody cared to inquire. But,
I believe, it was generally thought among those
who had the first charge of me, I must have been
the son of the ship's cook, as I had an inordinate
love of good eating, with a judgment in dainties,
which could only be expected from one who had
been indulged in the fat of the caboose; besides
showing
,
when I grew a year or two older, an
extraordinary
tact in roasting crabs and fiddlers, oysters
and sand-eels, and such other stray edibles as I could
lay my hands on.
My earliest recollections go back to some such
scenes; and I have a vague remembrance that I lived
a life of famine in a miserable hut by the sea-side,
with an old beldam, who used to wear a sailor's
tarpaulin
hat and pea-jacket, and was, as I have been
since informed, a very Semiramis among land-pirates,
and had not only been engaged in robbing, but had
been the actual cause of, more wrecks than any man
on the coast. She had a wretched little starveling
pony, whose legs she used to tie together of nights,
and, having hung a lantern to his side, send him
stumbling along the beach; in which operation, the
motion of the lantern rocking up and down, had the
appearance, to persons on the sea, of a light from a
vessel sailing along the coast; and thus was
undoubtedly
sometimes the cause of the observers
driving
on shore, before they dreamed they were nigh
it. Of this circumstance I have the better
recollection
as I myself was frequently sent out, especially
in bitter stormy nights, when such stratagems were
most practised, to keep the said pony to his duty, by
whipping him up and down the sands; an
employment
in which if I at any time failed, by dropping
asleep from cold or fatigue, or sneaking away under
a sandhill, to shelter me from the winds, I was sure
2*
to be rewarded with such a drubbing as kept me in
memory of my fault for a week after. I am pretty
confident, indeed, it was with an eye to my future
usefulness in this line of employment, that old
Mother Moll, (for by that name they called her,)
after helping herself to such other valuables in the
wreck (which she was one of the first to enter) as
she could lay hands on, deigned in like manner to
add unlucky
me
to her share of plunder, and carry
me to her hovel; where, first under the name of
Sammy Septembera title given me by the
wreckers
,
in memory, I suppose, of the month of
shipwreck
,
and, next, under that of Robin Rusty, which
became, at last, the more frequent appellationI
had the satisfaction to be cuffed about from morning
till night, and from one year's end to the other, until
rescued by a change of fate from her intolerable
clutches.
She had the greater need of some such assistant,
as the only other being over whom she had any
control
,
a reprobate son, called Isaac, or Ikey, was now
grown a huge, hulking hobbledehoy of fourteen, was
waxing day by day more restiff and intolerant of
authority, and betraying every evidence of a manly
inclination, sooner or later, to give her the slip, and
set up in the world for himself. He was, assuredly,
a most graceless and abandoned young scoundrela
worthy son of such a parent; and I have a
recollection
of his communicating to me one day, which he
did with much apparent satisfaction, his expectation,
in about one year more, of being able to trounce, or,
as he expressed it, to lick, his mother; an idea,
which, I must confess, was infinitely agreeable to my
infant fancies, as it associated the prospect of my
being able, in course of time, to do the same thing
myself, and thereby requite some of the million
afflictions
which Mother Moll was in the daily practice
of dispensing on my own cheeks and shoulders. I
had this addition, however, to the conception, and
the pleasure of it, in my own case; inasmuch as I
hoped that the day which should see me able to
settle
accounts with Mistress Moll, would find me in a
condition to award the same justice to her son Ikey;
for I know not which used me most cruelly, from
whom I received the greatest number of daily
drubbings
,
or which of them I most heartily detested.
It was to the excess of severity of this
she-barbarian
and her savage son that I finally, at the age of
about seven years, owed my escape from their hands;
for their cruelty being observed by others of the
wreckers, excited a kind of indignation and pity
even among them; and one of them, a fellow named
Day, though better known under the nickname of
Duck, which he himself commonly accepted and
acknowledged
,
the skipper and owner of a shallop, the
Jumping Jenny, in which he carried wood, oysters,
fish, and sundry other articles of merchandise,
including
at times, the plunder of the wreckers, to
New York and other places, interfered one day in
my favour; and, having tried more amicable means
in vain, seized me and carried me off by force. It
is true, that he afterwards, in a fit of generosity, sent
the old beldam a cask of rum, which he had, in the
beginning, offered as the price of my ransom, and
which she was now glad to receive as a compensation
in full for her loss.
It was for this reason, I suppose, that my humane
deliverer ever after chose to regard me as his
property
,
an item of his goods and chattels, bought at
what he always assured me was a price infinitely
above my value, a moveable which nobody could
doubt his right to do with whatever he pleased.
Having settled this point to his satisfactionand,
perhaps, also, to mine, for I never dreamed of
disputing
ithe proceeded to deport himself
accordingly
:
and the end was, that, before I had been a
month in his employ, I was convinced that the
servitude
I had endured under Mother Moll, infernal
though it might be called, was a kind of paradise,
compared with the purgatory of bondage to which
I was now reduced by my generous and tender
skipper.
The first thing the tyrant did, after getting me on
board, was to appoint me to the honorable office of
ship's cook; an appointment which I doubtless owed
in part to the talents I had already displayed in that
line, while living with Mother Moll, though more
perhaps to my being the only person of the whole
crewor rather of the ship's company, for crew
there was none, there being, besides the captain,
only one other man on board, and he called himself
the matewho could be spared for such a duty.
Nor should I have been in less danger of the
appointment
,
had my talents been inferior, or my years
even fewer; the only qualifications for the office
being that I should be old and strong enough to
hold up the end of a frying-pan, and of sufficient
experience
to know, as Captain Duck said, a potatoe
from a pig's foot. The appetite of my noble
captain
being extremely artless and unsophisticated,
never aspired beyond the two simple dishes of a boil
and a fry, as he was used to call them; and the
preparation
of these was always the same, no matter
what might be the variation in the materials, which
were only determined by the contents of the larder.
If a boil were ordered, all my duty consisted in
tumbling into the pot, along with a sufficiency of
water, a specimen of every eatable on board, fish,
fowl, and flesh, salt and fresh, beans, peas, pumpkins
and potatoes, clams, oysters, onions, and what not,
and boiling away at a furious rate, until the signal
was given for serving up, by the skipper roaring to
me, dinner! you son of a cook's jackass! If a
fry, the operation was equally simple, as nothing
was to be done but to throw the same articles into
the pan, with a pound or two of slush, and keep up
the fire until the mate, in his turn, gave the signal
by suddenly whisking the pan out of my hands, and
as suddenly kicking me over into the lee scuppers.
When I was first made acquainted with the office
to which my skipper's generosity assigned me, I
must confess, my youthful spirits danced with joy;
for having been fairly starved under Mother Moll's
ministry, nothing could be more agreeable to my
desires than a post which assured me,
ex officio
, of
a full dinner every day. But on this occasion, as
on a great many others that have befallen me, I
reckoned entirely without my host; being soon
forced to the disagreeable discovery that my duty,
as understood by Captain Duck, was to cook dinners,
and not to eat them. My captain was indeed a
brute, and a much worse one than old Mother Moll;
who, though savage enough, had her seasonsfew
they were and far betweenof good humour. His
apparent humanity in snatching me from the
dragoness
,
was, at bottom, the same feeling that induced
the latter to take me from the wreck; that is, he
had occasion for my services; or perhaps he
was
humane at the moment; for all persons are capable
of pitying distresses not inflicted by themselves, but
by other persons. But be that as it may, it is
certain
that such touches of human feeling never visited
his breast again; and that during the whole term of
five years or more, that I remained in his power,
there was no tyranny or cruelty that a despot could
exercise at the expense of his most helpless slave,
which he did not make me suffer. One would have
thought that my destitute condition, a miserable little
vagabond child without a single kinsman or friend
I could call my own, would have sometimes
awakened his sensibilities, and procured me better
treatment: but I am rather inclined to think my
destitution
only made him give a greater loose to his
ferocity, since there was no one left to call him to
account.
As a temper of such unmitigated barbarity is,
fortunately
,
so uncommon in the world that some will
feel disposed to doubt its existence, it is incumbent on
me to explain the secret of his character, which was
reduced to that extreme pitch of brutality only, I
believe, by indulgence in strong liquors. The fellow,
in short, was a sot, and had been all his life; not
indeed
that he ever appeared to the world in a state of
positive intoxication; for that was a point no liquor
could bring him to; but, as he was always drinking,
so his potations kept him constantly in a condition
of sullen fury, like that of the Malay who is smoking
opium for a
muck
, and may, one knows not how
soon, burst out into a frenzy of rage and murder.
In this frame of mind, it may be supposed, he
would as often have vented his anger upon the mate
as upon me; and this I have no doubt he would have
done, had not this useful officer, who was his cousin,
been a great two-fisted fellow, who made no
difficulty
of knocking him down and drubbing him into
his senses, when the wind lay in that direction; by
which means it happened that the skipper was forced,
in spite of himself, to confine his operations entirely
to me.
The particulars of his cruel usage I have no
desire to enter upon; but their effects were such,
that at the beginning of my thirteenth year, which
was the last of my bondage, I was a wretched little
stunted thing, to appearance not more than nine
years old, a picture of raggedness, emaciation and
misery, a creature with no more knowledge,
intelligence
,
or spirit than a ferryman's horse, or a sick
ape; which latter animal, I have often been told, I
much more resembled at that time than a human
child. In fact, the brutality of my skipper had
made me almost an idiot: it had killed my spirit, and
stupefied my mind; and such was the gross
darkness
in which I had been suffered to grow up, that I
was ignorant even of the existence of the Great Being,
the refuge of the orphan, and the avenger of his
wrongs. I had never even heard his name, except
in the execrations, with which my tormentor coupled
it a thousand times a day.
CHAPTER II.
An adventure of a goose and a gander, with what happened
thereupon
to Robin Day.
Such
a creature was I, as wretched and as
hopeless
,
when the business of my master carried him,
one summer's day, to a certain great town in New
Jersey, situated upon a river, where we cast anchor
in the morning; and I, without troubling myself
with any thoughts of shore, which it was seldom
my lot to visit, fell to work at my vocation in
preparing
my master's dinner; in the course of which,
I had occasion to murder a venerable old gander
that had been squalling in the coop, in expectation
of his fate, for the last two days. This execution
being over, and not without five or six hearty cuffs,
which my patron gave me for performing it
bunglingly
,
I sneaked away to the bows, where, perched
upon the bowsprit, I began, in the process of
plucking
the animal, to distribute a shower of feathers
over the tide.
This operation, as it chanced, attracted the
attention
of a knot of schoolboys who were playing,
some of them on a wharf hard by, while three or
four others were busking about in a batteau, to
which they had helped themselves; and, whether
it was that there was something more than usual of
the ludicrous given to my employment by my
uncouth
appearance, or that the urchins were ripe for
mischief, they forthwith began to salute me with a
battery, first, of jokes and sarcasms; to which they
afterwards added an occasional volley of pebbles and
oyster-shells. This was a proceeding that caused
me no surprise, for I had been too much accustomed
to unkindness all my days to expect any thing else;
and, I may also add, that such was the indifference
to bodily pain into which I had been beaten, and so
stupefied within me were all the ordinary instincts
of self preservation, that although I was once or
twice hit by the missiles cast at me, and in danger
of faring still worse, I neither removed from my
perch, nor intermitted a moment in my task.
My insensibility, or want of courage, as it
doubtless
appeared, gave additional edge to the malice of
my persecutors; and those who were in the batteau,
having taken in a sufficient supply of small shot
that is to say, of the pebbles and shells as aforesaid
ventured to push into the stream, for the purpose
of attacking me nearer at hand, which they did
with infinite zeal and intrepidity; and one little
fellow
of ten years old, that seemed the greatest imp
of all, the most voluble in railing and the most
energetic
in attack, succeeded in planting upon the top
of my forehead the ragged edge of an oyster-shell,
by which I was cut to the bone, and my face in a
moment covered with blood. This, indeed, stung
me to resentment, for the anguish of the wound was
very great; but so sluggish were the movements of
all my passions that I had scarce proceeded to a
greater length in the expression of my rage than by
turning a haggard look of reproach upon the
assailant
,
when an accident happened which changed the
current of my feelings. The little reprobate who
had immortalized himself by so capital a shot, had
Vol. I.3
given such energy and strength to the cast, that he
lost his balance, pitched forward, and at the very
moment I looked down upon him, plumped, with a
dismal shriek, into the river, which was deep, and the
current strong. It was evident, the little dog could
not swim; and such was the terror which the
catastrophe
caused among his companions, that they lost
the only oar they had in the boat, and were
incapable
of rendering him any assistance.
In the meanwhile, the hero of the scene, whose
disaster I regarded with sentiments of complacency
and approbation, as being nothing more than he
deserved for the unprovoked injury he had done
me, sunk to the bottom, whence in a moment he
came whirling and gasping to the surface, and was
swept by the tide against the sloop's cable, which
he attempted to seize, but without success; for
though he had hold of it for an instant, he was not
able to maintain his grasp. In this state of the
adventure
,
the little fellow was immediately under me
where I sat on the bowsprit; and as the tide swept
him from the cable, he looked up to me with a
countenance of such terror, and agony, and despair,
mingled with imploring entreatythough being on
the point of strangling, he was neither able to speak
nor to cry outthat I was suddenly struck with
feelings of compassion. They were the first human
emotions, I believe, that had entered my bosom for
years. And such was the strength of them that,
before I knew what I was doing, I dropped into the
rivergander and allto save the poor little rascal
from drowning.
Such a feat did not appear to me either very
difficult
or dangerous, for I could swim like a duck, and
had had extraordinary experience in the art of
saving
life in the water; not, indeed, that I had ever
performed such service for any body but myself;
but, in my own case, I had almost daily occasion;
for nothing was more common than for Skipper
Duck to take me by the nape of the neck and toss
me overboard, even when on the open sea; though
the mate always threw me a rope to help me on
board again, except when we were becalmed, or at
anchor; in which cases, he left me to take care of
myself. In the present instance, however, as it
proved, the exploit was not destined to be performed
without difficulty; for dropping down with more
hurry than forecast, right before the stem, and with
a force that carried me pretty deep into the water, I
was swept under the shallop's bottom, which, in the
effort to rise to the surface, I managed to strike with
my head, with a violence that would undoubtedly
have finished me, had not that noble excrescence
been in those days of unusual thickness. The shock
was, however, sufficient to stun and confound the
small quantity of wits I possessed, and to such a
degree
that I lost my hold of the gander, which, up to
this moment, I had clutched with instinctive care;
besides which, I was swept, before I had time to
recover myself, along the whole of the sloop's
bottom
;
and this being pretty well studded with
barnacles
,
young oysters, and the heads of old nails, I had
the satisfaction of enjoying as complete and thorough
a keelhauling as was ever administered to any
vagabond
whatever, my jacket, shirt, and back being
scratched all to pieces. Of this, however, as well as
of the loss of the gander, I was for a time quite
unconscious
,
being confused by the shock my head had
suffered; and the moment I succeeded in passing the
rudder, and reaching the surface, I had all my
thoughts engaged in rescuing the boy, who had now
sunk two or three times, and was, I doubted not,
sinking for the last time; for he was quite insensible,
when it was my good fortune to reach and seize him
by the collar.
The batteau had, by this time, been borne by the
tide against a projecting wharf, whither I easily
swam with my charge; and then giving him up to his
companions, who had now, by dint of yelling, brought
several men to their assistance, I took to my heels,
hoping to regain the sloop before Captain Duck, who
had gone ashore, should return and discover my
absence
.
My only way of getting on board was that in
which I had departed, namely, by swimming; and to
this I betook me, by running a little up the stream,
and then leaping again into the river.
My haste, however, was vain; the worthy
skipper
reaching the vessel an instant before myself; and
when, having clambered up by the hawser and
bobstay
,
I succeeded in jumping on deck, Iwho was in
such a pickle, what with my clothes torn to shreds,
and dripping with water, and the blood trickling
down my face, as the reader cannot conceivefound
myself confronted with my tyrant face to face. He
gave me a horrible stare of surprise, took one step
forward so as to bring me within reach of his arm,
and exclaimed,
You draggle-tailed tadpole! where have you
been?which question he accompanied with a
cuff on the right cheek that tossed me full a fathom to
the larboard.
Please, sir, said I, in as much terror as my
stupidity was capable of.overboard, sir.
Overboard, you son of a tinker's cowbell! cried
my master giving me a cuff with the other hand,
that sent me just as far starboard; what have you
been doing overboard?
Please, sir, saving boy's life, sir, returned
unhappy
I, beginning to be conscious of the enormity
of my offence.
Saving a boy's life, blast my fishhooks!
ejaculated
Skipper Duck, knocking me again to larboard:
and here I may as well observe that this was his
usual way of conversing with me, or rather of
pointing
his conversation; his stops being usually but
three, a cuff to the right and a cuff to the left, which
he alternated with extreme regularity, at every other
speech; and a full period, used at the close, by which
I was laid as flat as a flagstone. Saving a boy's
life! cried the Skipper, boxing me as aforesaid: I
wish all the boys were in Old Nick's side-pocket,
roasting!Where's the gander?
The gander? ay,
where
was the gander? The
question froze my blood: I remembered the loss;
by this time the gander was a mile down stream, if
not already lodged, in divided morsels, in the
capacious
jaws of a hundred catfish.
The skipper noticed my confusion, and his face of
a sudden became small, being puckered by an
universal
frown, that began at forehead and chin and
the two ears, and tended to the centre, carrying
these several parts before it, till all were blended in
a knot of wrinkles scarce bigger than his nose. He
stretched forth his hand and took me by the hair, of
which I had a mop half as big as my whole body;
and giving his arm a slow motion to and from him,
like the crank-rod, or whatever they call it, of a
locomotive, just as it is getting under way, and
making my head, of course, follow in the same line
of traverse, thundered in my ears,
The gander! you twin-born of a horse-mackerel!
where's the gander?
Please, sir, I spluttered out, in a confusion of
intellects that was with me extremely customary
3*
boy was overboardjumped overboard to save
him
Dn the boy! quoth my honest master;
where's the gander?
Please, sir, jumped overboard, I repeated; got
under the keel; knocked headsenses out, and
and
And the gander? blast my fish-hooks! the
gander
?
Please, sir; couldn't help'most drownedlost
it!
The skipper's eyes rolled in their sockets, and
he turned them to heaven, as if to invoke
thunderbolts
of vengeance on my guilty head. Then taking
a quid of tobacco, to compose his nerves, he made
me a speech, importing, first, that he had bought me
of old Mother Moll at the price of a ten-gallon keg
of rum; secondly, that I was not worth the tenth
part of a sous-marquee, or ten scales of a red herring;
thirdly, that I was the ugliest wall-eyed, shock-headed
son of a ship's monkey he had ever laid eyes on;
fourthly, that he had always said I would come to
the gallows, without even the grace of arriving at
the yard-arm; fifthly, that he had borne as many of
my dog's tricks as mortal man could; sixthly, that
the loss of the gander was the most atrocious piece
of cold-blooded knavery he had ever heard of, for
which hanging was too good for me; and seventhly
and lastly, that as it was his duty to take a father's care
of me, he would forthwith proceed to give me the
handsomest trouncing I had ever had in my whole
life, blast his fish-hooks. And this oration, which
was interlarded with more profane execrations than
I desire to repeat, being ended, he kicked and
dragged
me along into the cabin; where, seizing up a
rope's end, he fell to work upon my half naked body
with a vigour that, I think, would have ended in his
killing me outright; had not fate sent me assistance
in the person of a friendit was the first one I ever
hadwhom the accident of the morning had gained
me, all unknown to myself.
The little boy whom I had saved from drowning,
was, as it happened, the son of a worthy and wealthy
gentleman, a physician, of that town, who chanced
to be nigh at hand, when I landed the little fellow
on the wharf; and being drawn thither, among others,
by the cries of the children, had the happiness to
find his child already restored to his senses, and
suffering
no inconvenience from the catastrophe, except
a good ducking and a hearty fright. He took pains
to inform himself on the spot of the particulars of
the accident, which a little inquiry among the boys
soon put him in possession of, including all the
circumstances
of the attack, as well as of my
instrumentality
in saving the graceless urchin; and he was
pleased to express as much approbation as surprise,
at what he called my magnanimitya word, by the
by, which, when he afterwards delivered it into my
own ears, filled me with consternation, as from its
bigness, I supposed it must mean something very
horrible. Nay, his feelings becoming more
interested
,
when he discovered from what a wretched
looking little imp (for, it seems, I had passed him,
while running up the wharves, and he had noticed
my squalid appearance,) the good act had proceeded,
he determined to visit the shallop on the instant, to
do me reparation for the injuries I had received, as
well as to reward me for my humanitywhich word
also, when he pronounced it, struck me as a very
terrible one, though not so awful as magnanimity.
He accordingly procured a boat, and, in company
with several other persons, immediately came on
board, the visit being for me the most opportune in
the world, as the honest skipper was threshing me,
as he himself expressed it, within an inch of my
life, and was, indeed, so enwrapped in the business,
that he was entirely unconscious of the entrance of
the visitors into the vessel and the cabin, until my
new friend, shocked and enraged at his brutality,
brought it to an end by suddenly knocking him
down with his cane.
My miserable, wretched appearancefor besides
my starveling looks, the blood was still streaming
over my faceand the inhuman tyranny to which
he thus saw me exposed, operated to such a degree
on the benevolent feelings of this most excellent man,
that he determined to release me from my skipper's
clutches altogether; which he immediately effected,
by carrying me ashore to his own house, where he
dressed my wounds, and had me washed and clothed
in decent attire.
Nor did his good offices rest here; for having
questioned
me, and discovered what a friendless creature
I really was, and how much I had suffered from the
cruelty of the skipper, his indignation was roused to
such a pitch, that he proceeded to lodge an
information
before a magistrate, who immediately granted
a warrant for Duck's apprehension, and he was in a
few hours laid by the heels in the common jail; when,
being tried, he was mulcted in a heavy fine, and
punished also with a month's imprisonment. And
this punishment not seeming severe enough to
certain
worthy citizens, whose choler had been
exceedingly
inflamed by the developments of his cruelty
that took place at the trial, the skipper was no sooner
released from prison than they carried him aboard
his own vessel, where, after subjecting him to the
process of keel-hauling, administered in a much
more regular way than had happened in my case,
they shaved his head and tarred and feathered him
from top to toe; and then ordered him to get under
way, never to appear again in their waters, under
pain of being hung from his own cross-treesan
injunction which, I believe, the scoundrel very
faithfully
observed, for I never heard of his being again
seen in that neighborhood.
As for me, the events of that day hadalthough
I knew it notoperated an entire and thorough
change on all my future prospects. I had gained a
friend and protector, who was as able as he was
willing
to repair the mischiefs I had suffered in body
and mind, and to guard me for the future from wrong
and outrage. And all this was, as I may say, the
result of my own actionof the indulgence of a
natural feeling or instinct, of the laudableness of
which I was entirely ignorant. I had done a good
act, andlike the young Pawnee Indian,
[1]
[1]
Petelesharoo
, son of
Latelesha
, or the
Knife-Chief
, head of the
Pawnee-Loups, who cut from the stake, where his nation had
devoted
her to the flames, a Paduca, or Ietan girl, and carried her
in safety to her own tribe; for which heroic act, he was presented
with a medal by the young ladies of a seminary at Washington.
The young savage, in returning his thanks, declared, with great
simplicity, or good mannersfor the assertion looks very much
like a stretch of politenessthat he did it in ignorance, and did
not know that he had done good, until his
sisters
, by giving him a
medal, told him so. See Morse's Indian Reports; and also Long's
Expedition to the Rocky Mountains.
who saved
the life of a female captive, without knowing he had
done a good deed, until his Christian rewarders told
him soI did not know it. And for this reason, I
certainly deserved neither credit nor recompense;
but I would that all good actions were as well
rewarded
.
CHAPTER III.
Robin Day begins his education, and advances in the opinion of
the world.
My
patron, Dr. Howard, (for that was his name,)
was not content with merely releasing me from
bondage, and punishing my tyrant, but carried his
goodness still further. The few hints I was able to
give him in relation to the shipwreck, led him to
indulge a kind of hope that my parents were
perhaps
living, and that I might be restored to their
arms; in consequence of which, he not only
instituted
inquiries into the circumstance, but even paid
two different visits to the coast, where he made every
effort to sift the affair to the bottom. His exertions
were, however, of little avail; the reasons for silence
which I had mentioned, were still in operation, and
kept every man's memory under lock and key. No
one of those interested as actors in the scene had the
slightest knowledge or recollection of the affair; there
were a great many wrecks, they said, on their coast,
and they could not pretend to remember them, or
to say who came ashore on them; they knew in
general, no such personage as little Robin Rusty,
though some professed to have heard the name, and
some believed there had been a boy so called, whom
old Mother Moll had picked up some where, they
had never troubled themselves to ask where. In
short, they were determined to hold their tongues;
and all the information that my patron ever
succeeded
in acquiring was obtained from persons living
at a distance from the scene; and, indeed, the further
they were off, the more they seemed to know of the
matter. The only difficulty was, that no two agreed
in telling the same story; from which, as well as
from the thousand manifest falsehoods and
contradictions
with which the relation was overburthened,
it was clear these worthy personages had gained their
intelligence from their own imaginations, and in
reality knew nothing more than the inquirer
himself
.
He might, perhaps, have gained all the
information
he sought, from the old beldam, Mother Moll,
who was now grown decrepid and helpless with age,
had been long abandoned by her vagabond son, and
was dragging out existence in the most hopeless
poverty; but she had reached the period of dotage
and mere oblivion, and was incapable of rendering
him any assistance. It was with the greatest
difficulty
she could be made even to remember my name;
and when she did, and was questioned particularly
concerning me, she, by some unaccountable
perversion
of association, always confounded me with her
son Ikey, whose history, including all his
monkeytricks
,
and sometimes mine with them, his sundry
rebellions against the maternal authority, and final
desertion of her, she was very willing to tell, so long
as her memory served; but that was never long.
She seemed to have some glimmering recollections
of the wreck; but they were not such as could be
turned to profit; and as to the date, which she
sometimes
threw twenty years back, and sometimes but
a few months, nothing of the least account could be
gained from her.
All that my patron, therefore, learned, after every
inquiry, was no more than what he knew before;
namely, that there had been a wreck, and that I had
come ashore in it: but of the exact period of the
catastrophe, of the name and character of the vessel,
of the fate of the crew, and other the most
interesting
and important particulars, he knew nothing.
The discouragement which he suffered did not,
however
,
prevent his making the only other effort that
remained. He drew up a brief accountif account
it could be calledof the occurrence, and caused it
to be inserted in several of the newspapers of the
day, in hopes it might attract the eye of some one
interested, and thence lead to further developments
that might finally bring my parentage to light. But
the effort resulted in nothing. Some few persons,
merchants who had lost vessels, and others who had
been deprived of friends, wrote to him for further
particulars, which he had not to give; and there the
matter dropped. Whatever might be my good
qualities
,
nobody thought me worth claiming.
In the meanwhile, neither my protector's
inquiries
nor their failure of success, troubled
me
in the
least. I had arrived at a fate which satisfied all my
youthful longings, inasmuch as I had plenty to eat
and drink, could take my fill of sleep whenever I
wanted it, and had no fear of an hourly drubbing.
In the enjoyment of these blisses, and in the kitchen
corner, whither my instincts and ambition both
carried
me, I should have been content to pass my
existence, contending for nothing but the warmest
rug and the hugest cast-bit, with no rivals but
Towzer
the house dog and Tabby the tom-cat. A nobler
strife, and competitors more distinguished, were
subjects that entered neither into my desires nor
thoughts. I was entirely of opinion that the life of
a scullion in a rich man's kitchen was the happiest
that human being could leada life for a skipper,
or the gods themselves.
This grovelling disposition there were some who
considered an inborn one, a characteristic of a
naturally
low and vulgar spirit; though I am very well
convinced it was all owing to Skipper Duck and his
villanous treatment; and certain it is, had any nobler
feelings ever existed in my bosom, they could not
have survived the long course of debasing cruelty
to which I had been subjected. The truth is, it had
resulted in quenching every spark of intellect and
spirit I ever possessed, in stultifying, in stupefying, in
reducing me to a condition very little above that of
a mere animal; so that, I verily believe, my old
prototype
of Cyprus, he that was
Cymon call'd, which signifies a brute;
So well his name did with his nature suit,
was the Seven Wise Masters of Greece all in one
body, compared with me, whom every body agreed
in considering not merely a dolt and blockhead of
unusual barrenness, but a kind of Orson, or Wild-boy
Peter, on whose nature, as on Caliban's, nurture
could never stick, and every effort at instruction
must be entirely thrown away.
And in this opinion, I am sorry to say, my
benevolent
patron also joined, after he had worn out his
patience in the vain effort to awake my dormant
faculties
,
which he declared were of so low an order as
to be incapable of any cultivation, and so, in despair,
left me to myself, to my own enjoyments, and in the
honourable officethe only one he deemed me fit
forof scullion and turnspit;my cooking abilities,
though sufficient for the purposes of Skipper Duck,
not being, in his opinion, brilliant enough for the
Vol. I.4
appointment of Commander in Chief of the culinary
department in his householdwhich was, indeed,
very capably filled by an old negro, whom we called
Don Pedro, a slave from one of the Spanish West
India Islands.
Thus consigned to contempt, and given over as a
case of hopeless stupidity, I must have remained
among pots and pattypans, an ornament of the
kitchen, for life, had it not been for the good offices
of two other friends who were not so willing to desert
me. The first of these was Nature, who, having
been outraged in my person for years, and, in fact,
driven out of it, now returned, and having nothing
to oppose her, save the craziness of the mansion,
began a course of renovation, which, though slow
and at first imperceptible, was destined sooner or
later to make itself manifest. The second was my
patron's son Tommyhis only son, and therefore a
spoiled oneto whose exploit with the oyster-shell
I owed my advancement. The little gentleman, who
was my junior by at least three years, though my
equal in size, and infinitely superior in every thing
that marks the intelligent beingsuch were the
advantages
of a parent's love and carewas by no
means the malicious and wicked imp his unprovoked
attack on me seemed to declare; but, on the contrary,
a very amiable and generous boy, although wild and
prankish, and easily led into mischief, as most boys
are. Perhaps I should say, as most boys
were;
for
the juveniles of the present generation, as I have
observed
,
are a much more manly and rational race
than their predecessors of the last, the difference
resulting
,
I suppose, from a better system of education.
The boys of my day, I declare, were the greatest
scoundrels conceivable, quarrelsome, vindictive, and
cruel, oppressors of one another and of every living
thing that was too weak to resist them; in short,
Neroes and Domitians in miniature. And those who
were not born with these happy characteristics,
hastened to get inoculated with them; as nothing
was held more contemptible, because evincing a
babyish, cowardly spirit, than a peaceable temper,
and tenderness to cats and dogs. My little friend
Tommy was of a mixed class, having been born with
spirit enough to adventure into every excess, and
yet with milder and kindlier feelings, that, if
carefully
governed, might have made him the best of
boys; and he was of just such a character as to be
able, at any moment, to enter with enthusiasm upon
the torture of a tabbycat, and burst into tears, the
next, at the sight of her dying agonies.
The little fellow's best feelings had been enlisted
by the service I rendered him by plucking him from
the water; and his father had made him awareif,
indeed, his own conscience had notof, the
meanness
and cruelty he had been guilty of in attacking
such a poor, inoffensive vagabond as I; and the end
was, that Master Tommy was anxious to repair the
mischief he had done, and do me some important
service in return. He straightway contracted a
fiery friendship for me, which he showed in a
thousand
different ways; and especially by cramming me
with oranges and sugar-plums, and other infantile
luxuries, such as had never before blessed my lips;
and, what was better still, by appointing me his chief
playmate.
It was Anaxagoras, I think, the philosopher of
Lampsacus, who, being asked at his death-hour, by
the magistrates of the city, what he wished to be
done in commemoration of him, desired they would
give the boys a holiday on the anniversary of his
death, and let them play over his grave. This
sentiment
is generally considered as proving that
Anaxagoras
must have been an uncommonly amiable old
gentleman, who had spared the birch in his school,
and was determined the boys of Lampsacus should
be as happy after his death as before. To my mind,
it proves a good deal more, and shows that the
philosopher
was a philosopher in earnest, who knew
the influence of childish playbecause an
institution
of Nature herselfin expanding the powers
of the childish mind; and therefore aimed, in his
festival, as much at the improvement as the
happiness
of his youthful heirs. Of the justice and truth
of this remark I am the more strongly persuaded,
as I believe I can trace the first efforts of expansion
in my own spirit to the influence of boyish sports;
and I am convinced that I learned more by playing
leap-frog and cock-horse with Master Tommy
Howard
than by thumbing all the hornbooks and primers
his father ever put into my hands.
It must be recollected that the sports of
childhood
those
first and truest sources of enjoyment, of
health and of happinesswere vanities I had never
known, nor even dreamed of; all my tender years
having been passed in captivity and servitude, and
every hour and moment devoted to some infernal
drudgery, as killing to the mind as the body. The
smile and laugh of happy vacancy, the shout of
merriment
,
the whistle, the song, the uproar of play, were
music that had never visited my ears; which were,
indeed seldom invaded by any thing, except abusive
language and the hard palms of my honest skipper.
I was now, for the first time, to be made acquainted
with such joys; and the delight I experienced from
them was only equalled by their happy effects on
my benighted spirit. The change was speedily
manifested in my visage and person, the former of
which gradually lost the look of stupefaction that
had hitherto marked it; while the latter took a
sudden
start, and grew out of the similitude of a starved
ape, which it had first borne: though, I must
confess
,
as far as stature is concerned, I have not even
yet entirely got over the effects of my early
sufferings
.
A still better evidence of the transformation
that had been effected, was soon shown; for little
Tommy now taking upon himself the office of a
schoolmaster, ambitious to succeed in an exploit
which his father had pronounced impracticable, I
was actually, through his instrumentalily, taught to
read; and that before the good doctor dreamed that
the attempt had been made to teach me; and,
indeed
,
the first intimation he had of the miracle was
when Tommy carried me in triumph before him,
to display the fruits of his skill and enterprise.
The work of regeneration thus commenced by
the son, the parent was determined it should not
languish for want of encouragement on his part;
and the result was that, in a short time, I was
translated
from the kitchen to his study, and from thence
to a public school, where it was my good fortune to
make such progress as entirely satisfied my patron;
who from that moment treated me rather as a child
than a poor dependant on his charity. And there
unhappily occurred, soon after, an event which,
while it brought mourning into his family, advanced
me to a still higher niche in his affections. This
was nothing less than the death of poor Tommy,
who, to the eternal grief of his parents, and myself
for I loved him with all my hearthaving now
learned to swim a little, was drowned, while bathing
with other boys in the river. How the catastrophe
happened was not known, as none of his
companions
were by him at the moment; and, indeed, he
4*
was not missed by them, until they had finished
their sports and gone on shore to dress; when the
sight of his clothes reminded them of his
disappearance
;
nor was his body ever recovered. He was,
as I have mentioned, an only sonI might almost
have said, an only child; for, though Dr. Howard had
another, a daughter, who was a year older than
Tommy
,
yet she was, and, from her youth up, had been,
of so frail a constitution, that nothing but her
father's
skill and extreme care seemed to keep her
alive, and few believed her term of existence could
extend to many years. The death of Tommy was,
therefore, almost as heavy a blow as if he had been,
in reality, an only child; and it plunged his father
into a kind of despair that lasted several months;
after which he gradually recovered his spirits, and
began to treat me with uncommon marks of regard,
transferring to me in a great degree the affection
which had once been lavished on his son. In this
he was imitated by his wife, an excellent woman,
who had always distinguished me by her favour, and
now carried her benevolence to such a pitch that, as
I have been told, she once even proposed they
should adopt me as their child, and give me their
name; and, although the good doctor did not
altogether
consent to carry the matter so far, I was
treated by them both as if the act of affiliation had
really occurred, and also by the world at largethat
is to say, the people of our town, who all considered
that my fortune was now certainly made. My
name was so far changed as to make it read Robin
Day, instead of Robin Rusty; the Day, I presume,
having been borrowed from my skipper.
CHAPTER IV.
Three years at school, under the ancient system of education; with
an account of Robin's rival, the heroic Dicky Dare, and the war
of the Feds and Demies.
In
the meanwhile, I accommodated myself to the
change with surprising readiness; and, as I grew
older, I assumed the deportment, and gradually took
upon me all the airs of a rich man's son, bearing my
honours, and the favours of my protectors, with as
much grace as if I had been born to them; and this
presumption, as it was indicative of a gentlemanly
spirit, and had the good fortune to be backed by a
gentlemanly little bodyfor I was grown, as every
body said, quite a pretty little fellowserved the
purpose of endearing me still further to my
pseudoparents
;
who suffered me to fume and pout, to swell
and strut, to play the impertinent and tyrant, and
indulge all the other humours of a spoiled child,
yielding to them with as much dutiful
submissiveness
as if they had been my parents in reality.
And, certainly, so long as my good patroness lived
which, unhappily, was not long, for she died
suddenly
,
of an affection of the heart, in but little more
than a year after her soneven Tommy himself had
not been more effectually humoured to the top of
his bent.
But however bravely I bore it in my patron's
house, there was one place where my pretensions
were not so readily submitted to; that is, at school,
in which the only way to obtain supremacy, I found,
was to fight for it, and drub down all opposition.
As I have represented the associates of my
boyhood
in no very amiable colours, as being neither
Cupids nor cherubs, such as the poets delight to
picture
them, it may be supposed my delineations were
meant to apply to my schoolmates especially; which
is very true: only that the picture was then only
half drawn, being a sketch designed only to embrace
those general characteristics, which I supposed would
apply to the whole race of schoolboys all over the
continent. My own particular associates at school
were individuals of a genus as much worse than the
boys in general of that day, as the latter class was
worse than the boys of this; in fact, a set of such
imps and scapegallows as would now be considered
fit only for a House of Refuge: in which opinion I
think the reader will agree, when he has followed
me through a few more chapters; although I shall
speak of no more of their rogueries than are
necessary
as parts and illustrations of my own history.
In the first place, then, they were all sons of
Ishmael
,
at war with themselves and every body else;
and firmly persuaded, that, as courage was by far the
highest and noblest of all human attributes, so strife
and battle were the most delightful of human
enjoyments
.
No new comer was allowed the freedom of
the school, until he had undergone a sound
drubbing
;
which was commonly inflicted the first day of
his appearance; and I remember well how greatly I
was astonished, on my first day, when, at the
breaking
up of school, a manikin of about my own size,
whom I had never seen before, suddenly marched
up to me, and scratched my buttons, (which, it
appears
,
was a signal of defiance to mortal combat;)
and, upon my replying only by an innocent stare,
fetched me a cuff that sent me sprawling; a feat that
was instantly rewarded by shouts and cries, from
some, of, Hurrah, Jim! give it to him handsome!
while others roared out, Fair play! Let him up!
Hurrah for the monkey-faced little fellow!
meaning
me; for there were some who heroically took my
side of the question, and encouraged me to get up
and fight like a good fellow. This was a piece of
advice I was compelled to take whether I would or
not, or otherwise be trounced, without making
resistance
;
and, accordingly, I fell to work with great
spirit, and had the satisfaction, after half an hour's
combat, yard and yard arm, as the sailors say, of
coming off second bestthat is, of being flogged
until I could stand up to be beaten no longer.
But, although thus vanquished, I gained a great
deal of credit by the constancy with which I
endured
the pommelling: and the more particularly as I
refused to the last moment to holler enough, as
my adversary, with great magnanimity, bawled at
every blow; and when the affair was over, I was
complimented on all sides as being a knotty little
feller, that had the game in him, and would be good
fight some day or other; and encouragingly assured
that I had only been whipped, because I did
not know how to fight; which was very true: as,
from never having been in boys' company, I had
never been in combat before in my whole life.
As for the credit I gained by enduring the beating
so well, and not obeying the charge to cry enough,
I am not so certain I deserved it; for, as to the latter
point, the words were to me heathen Greek all, and
I did not understand what was required of me; and
as to the former, I had been so hardened to
drubbing
in the hands of my skipper, (which was the
only benefit I ever derived from the villain,) that I
cared no more for it, unless when it came in excess,
than for the puffing of the winds.
This callousness or indifference to the pain of
cuffing
,
gave me, with the honourable nickname of Sy
Tough, which the boys presently bestowed upon
me, an infinite advantage over all my schoolmates,
as I soon discovered; and as my only deficiency was
a lack of knowledge and skill in the art pugilistic,
which, praised be my comrades, they gave me every
opportunity to acquire, by engaging me in one battle
at least, every day, I had the satisfaction, before
my first quarter was out, of drubbing master Jim,
my first antagonist, to his heart's content; and, in a
few months more, of extending the same favour to
three fourths of all the boys in school, so that I came
to be looked upon, in time, as a young Julius Csar,
a hero, a paragon of schoolboys.
Howas my disposition was naturally pacific,
and as averse from squabbling and contention as
could be desiredI ever came to be engaged in so
many battles as it was my fate to fightand, I think,
for three years, they must have averaged at the rate
of at least one and a half each dayI am scarce
able to say; but, I believe, the chief cause was, that
my schoolmates so willed it, there being a standing
conspiracy among them to get up a battle whenever
it was possible; each and every one of them, though
not always fond of fighting in his own person, being
delighted when others could be driven into it. This
passion was especially observable among the bigger
boys, who were never so well content as in setting
their juniors by the ears; and, indeed, I have known
them so bent upon their purpose, that when they
found it impossible, by fair means, to engage a pair
of reluctant belligerents in affray, they did not
hesitate
to flog them into it.
With this class of worthies, the leaders of the
school, it was my fate to become a favourite; and
they proved their affection by engaging me in a
never-ending round of conflicts; which, from my
simplicity, ignorance, disregard of fisticuffs, and
above all, a natural facility of being led by the nose,
was no very difficult task.
In this way, it happened, that, in the course of
two or three years, I had been involved in battle
with every soul in the school (which varied in
number from fifty to seventy boys,) that could be
considered in any degree a suitable antagonist; and,
as the toughness and insensibility to pain I have
mentioned, gave me an advantage that no one else
possessed, I usually came off victor; until, at last, there
was but one other boy of my own degree who was
able to dispute the palm with me.
This was Master Richard, or Dicky Dare, the son
of an old captain of the Revolution, who had infused
into his son's heart, the spirit not merely of a
soldier, but of a whole regiment, and filled his head
with drums, trumpets, ambition, glory and other
martial trumpery, to such degree, that there was no
room in it for any thing else. He was about my own
age, i. e. about the age I was supposed to bethough
somewhat taller and stronger; so that I should never
have been able to contend with him for superiority,
had it not been for the above mentioned toughness;
and he had, like myself, under the direction of the
seniors, drubbed all the rest of the school. Nothing
remained, then, for our leaders but to pit us against
each other; andas neither was found the better
manto incite us to the tug of war as often as
possible
.
In this latter particular, they succeeded so
well, that, after awhile, one battle a day between us
became a matter of course, and was as regularly
expected
by the whole school, and ourselves, at the
breaking up in the morning, as the dinners that were
to follow it. And this kind of diversion we practised
daily, to the infinite delight of our comrades, for
more than a year; until, in fact, we, in our turn, had
become big boys, and leaders and masters of the
whole herd; which, like conquerors, we divided
between us.
Nor let it be supposed, that, during this long
period of strife, there was any peculiar animosity,
or ill feeling, betwixt my rival and me; on the
contrary
,
we drubbed one another into mutual
friendship
,
in less than a month after the rivalry began;
after which we continued to fight because it seemed
to be expected of us, and because, from having fallen
into the habit, we had come to consider it as very
good pastime. Nor, when we ceased, as after a
time we did, to pommel one another, did we leave
it off from disgust of combat; but only that we
might organize a plan devised by the martial Dicky,
and recommence hostilities on a grander scale.
My rival, although pronounced by the master the
greatest blockhead in school, (and truly, he never
knew a lesson, that I, out of my friendship had not
drilled into him,) was, nevertheless, the soul of honour
and generosity, and a prodigious genius into the
bargain
;
nature having intended him to rule the million,
and trample nations under his feet; though an
unfortunate
accident caused him to leave the world before
his work was completed. The military spirit, which,
it was said, he had inherited from his father, and
which had hitherto been indicated only by a love of
fisticuffs, was beginning to blaze out its nobler
attributes
;
ambition, the love of rule, and a desire
and resolution to fight his further battles, not with
his own hands merely, but with the fists of his
inferiors
.
He was determined to organize his
adherents
,
who made up one half the school, into an army,
of which he was to be General; and he desired me
to do the same with mine; with which forces, after
having disciplined them to our minds, we should
fight our battles like true soldiers.
The notion was as agreeable to our adherents as
to ourselves; and, in a very brief space, behold us,
to wit, General Dicky Dare, and General Sy Tough,
(for by that sobriquet my school-mates always
preferred
to distinguish me,) each at the head of his
train-bands, all in Coventry uniform, tag, rag, and
bobtail, with shingle-swords and
broomstick-muskets
,
banners of old paper-hangings, and full bands
of musicfor, in truth, every soul, the generals only
excepted, was musician as well as soldierin which
old kettles and frying-pans contended with conches
and tin-horns, and fifes and pitch-pipes with
penny-whistles
,
jews-harps, and comb-organs. In such
array, and all eager for the battle, we were wont to
meet, of Saturday afternoons, on the school house
green; and, having saluted each other with a
preliminary
shower or two of pebbles and potatoes,
march gallantly up to the charge, and to it pell-mell
like brave fellows; so that the plain of Troy and
Donny brook-fair were mere nothings in comparison.
And such battles, fought with extreme rancour, and
at an expense of numberless broken heads, and, once
or twice, a broken bone, we never could give over,
until the towns-people, who by no means encouraged
such excesses, fell foul of us with switches and
horsewhips
,
and so routed both armies together.
Such interference we deemed a great hardship, as
the sport was in great vogue among us; and the more
Vol. I.5
particularly as we had dubbed our parties,
respectively
,
Feds and Demiesthat is, Federalists and
Democratsin imitation of the grown children, our
fathers of the country at large, and thought we had
as much right as they, under the above titles, to
knock one another on the head. But the enemy, or
the armed intervention, prevailed; switches and
horsewhips were weapons we could not resist; and
both armies, having been effectually routed half a
dozen times, were finally disbanded, to the
unspeakable
grief of my great rival, General Dare; who
mourned his discomfiture in sorrow and humiliation,
but was too great of soul to despair. His spirit
was, indeed, not to be vanquished by one rebuff; and
his genius soon supplied, in a new undertaking, a
nobler field of fame than that from which we had
been driven.
CHAPTER V.
The patriot Dare preaches the doctrine of schoolboys' rights, and
the young Republicans strike for freedom.
The
seminary of which I have spoken under the
disparaging name of school, enjoyed the nobler title
of Academy, to which it had the better right, as its
affairs were administered by Trustees, who never
troubled their heads about it, and was intended to
indoctrinate boys in all kinds of learning, from
spelling
in two syllables up to the Pons Asinorum and
Hic-hc-hoc
. The only difficulty, as some esteemed
it, was that the task of dispensing these multifarious
subjects of education was made the duty of one
single
teacher, there being neither assistant nor usher
in the school: but the duty was, after all, no great
matter in a country where it is every man's
business
to be a jack of all trades, and capable of turning
his hand to any thing.
The worthy person to whom was committed this
weighty charge, I have not yet spoken of; nor do I
now think it necessary to say any thing more of
him than that his name was Burley, his nickname
Old Bluff, and that he was a very good sort of
person
,
who was so occupied in horsing and trouncing
his scholars all day long, that he had little time left
for any thing else, and in particular, none at all for
directing their studies.
This latter circumstance, as we had the true
schoolboy
detestation of hard lessons, endeared him very
greatly to our affections; though there was a good
deal of grumbling on account of the trouncing; so
that, to balance matters fairly, as he lost as much
good will by one peculiarity as he gained by the
other, he may be said to have occupied a very
doubtful
place in our regards. Unfortunately, however,
he chose to side with the town's people in their
opposition
to the warlike pastime just mentioned,
which he professed to consider a very outrageous
irregularity, disreputable to the school and to him,
its master, and calling for the severest measures to
put it down. These measures involved, of course,
a prodigious amount of flogging; of which, though
all had their proportion, a principal share fell to the
commanders in chief of the two armiesthat is, to
Dickey Dare and myself. The school had been ever
a Babel: but it was now Pandemonium itself, nothing
being heard from morning till night, but the
thwacks of the birch and ferule, and the yells of
infant innocence. Inexpressible were the terror, the
confusion, the lamentation that prevailed; and broken
spirits and broken hearts, and tingling palms and
smarting backs, were the lot of all.
In this exigency, the genius of General Dare,
whose soul only grew the bigger under
oppression
,
and whose ambition took a higher flight for
every ignominious elevation upon a schoolmate's
back, devised an expedient, than which nothing
could have been better contrived to obviate every
difficulty, to free us from present pangs, and secure
us from all future tyranny. Taking advantage of
our assembling together, one morning after school
alas, assembling no longer to fight or play, but to
mourn our sufferings and invoke execrations on the
head of our tyranthe invited us to follow him into
a neighbouring grave-yard, (a favourite place of
meeting, whenever we had any mischief to concoct;)
where, mounting upon a grave stonea proper
rostrum
for an occasion so solemndoffing his hat with
the graceful courtesy, and puckering up his visage
with the zeal for the public good, of a veteran
stumporator
,
he began to harangue us in the following
terms:
I tell you what, boys and fellers, he cried,
jumping
in medias res
with the directness of a Spartan,
there's no two words about the matter, and the long
and short of it is, Old Bluff is the biggest old tyrant
that ever was, and treats us like slaves and Guinea
niggers; which is a thing quite unbearable and
scandalous; because as how, this is a free land, and
we are free people, as good as any body else; and
it's agin all law and constitution for any body to
treat any body like a slave, except the niggers;
which is because the niggers is slaves, and not free
people. Now I'll tell you what, by Julius Csar,
I've been considering about school-keeping and
flogging the boys; and I've just made it out, they
ha'n't no right, no how, to do no such thing in
America; because as how, we have n't no kings
here, but Presidents, which is made by the people,
and is the people's servants, and has n't no right to
hang people, and cut off their heads and flog 'em;
because how, they a'n't kings, but Presidents; and
it's just the same thing with schoolmasters, for all of
their cutting up like kings, for they
a'n't
kings, but
only Presidents. Now, you see, this is a free land, and
a republic, which is all freedom and equality; and the
people is n't ruled over by nobody, like England,
and Rome, and Greece, and them foreign parts; but
they governs themselves; and when there's any
5*
body to be punished for kicking up, why the people
tells the President, and he gives it to 'em. And
so it's just as clear as coffee, it ought to be the same
thing in a school; for
we're
the people, and Old
Bluff's only the President; ond Old Bluff has n't no
right to give it to any of us, until
we
say so; because
as how, we're freemen, by Julius Csar! and we
ought to govern ourselves!
This doctrine, which was worthy a child of the
republic, was highly acceptable to the boys, and
they agreed,
nem. con.
, that Old Bluff had no right
to flog them; but, nevertheless, it was sagaciously
argued, he
did
flog them; and how were they to help
themselves?
Why, said our Demosthenes, with a proud and
resolved look, just do as our dads did before us;
for if it had n't been for them, we would n't have
had no Presidents over us at all, but kings. For
you must know, we was once slaves, and old king
George, he was king over us; and he carried on as
he liked, and cut off heads, and horsed and flogged
the people, and all that, just like Old Bluff. Well,
you see, the old folks could n't stand that, and they
turned about and they licked him;father, he was
one of 'em, and he has told me all about it till I'm
tired of it, he makes such long stories about it:
they trounced the old feller: it was what you call
the Revolution. And ever since that, there's been
no more kings to flog us, but only Presidents. And
so here's just my idea: if Old King Bluff won't stop
trouncing, why we'll have a Revolution too, and
we'll turn on him and give it to himthump him,
the old rascal! thump him like thunder!
Thump him! thump Old Bluff! The idea was at
first too great for our conceptions, and made us look
aghast. But the spirit of the young patriot, who had
delivered the last words with terrible resolution, was
not to be checked. Thump him's the idea, my
fellers! he resumed; and we can do it just as easy
as the old folks thumped King George; because as
how, he's but one man, and we're sixty-four: (
sixty-four's
the number, for I was counting you over, all
the morning;) by Julius Csar! we're enough to eat
him up! All we want is the pluck: and if we've
only got that, what's one feller of a man among us?
In short, the young hero made it apparent to the
meanest of our capacities and the weakest of our
hearts, that nothing could be easier than for
sixty-four
boys, of whom at least a dozen were full sixteen
years old, and two or three, like himself, nearly a
year older, to bring our tyrant to a reckoning for all
his manifold oppressions and acts of cruelty; and
having debated the matter over again twice or thrice,
to determine upon a plan of proceedings, it was at
last unanimously resolved to begin a revolution
forthwith
,
for the purpose of dethroning the despot, or
reducing him to the level of a mere president of the
school, and establishing our rights upon a firm
republican
basis, to endure for ever.
This resolution, which the democratic reader
cannot
but approve, we had an opportunity to put into
practice the very next morning, when our tyrant,
unconscious of the mine about to burst under his feet,
proceeded to begin the business of the school in his
usual way; that is, by calling up for punishment an
unlucky little culprit, whom he judged most worthy
of his favour at that moment. Upon this, the
patriotic
Dare, who had offered himself for this trying
duty, rose behind his desk, and catching up a pewter
inkstand of some two pounds in weight, addressed
the astonished autocrat as follows:
I tell you what, Old Bluff!that is, Mr. Burley!
we have a sort of resolved, all of us, that this here
eternal horsing and thumping is not the sort of thing
we can stand any longer; because as how, this is a
free country, where the people is all free republican
people, and we boys is as free people as any body
else, and will fight for our rights like our fathers
before us. And so don't touch that boy; for we
won't stand such doings no longer; we won't, by
Julius Csar!
This address, and the menacing attitude which all
the boys, thus encouraged by their patriot leader,
immediately assumed, each grasping at some weapon
or other, a slate or book, or whatever he could pick
up, seemed to have actually petrified the pedagogue,
who turned pale, and sat down, staring around him
as if in a dream; of which the lad whom he had
called up, took advantage to sneak away to his bench;
while the insurgents, not doubting that their tyrant
was actuallyto use their own elegant wordcowed
by their display of resolution, began to resume their
seats, uttering murmurs of felicitation and triumph.
The sound awoke the master from his trance; he
sprang up, and grasping his birch, called out in a
most furious voiceYou Dickey Dare-devil, what's
that you?Come here, you villain, and I'll trounce
you!
I won't be trounced, said Dickey Dare,
except
by a vote of the boys; for I goes on the
popular
principle, and  But Dickey had not time
to finish his sentence; for Burley immediately
rushed
forward to seize him, which Dickey was fain to
avoid by leaping over his desk to the floor; where,
being closely followed, he let fly his inkstand, by
which he did great damage to the head of one his
schoolmates, without, however, hurting the master,
and then dropping like a log on the floor, whereby
the autocrat, whose legs he dexterously seized upon,
was suddenly overturned, with a shock that left him
for a moment quite breathless. Now, fellers!
them that ain't cowards, fall on! cried the hero to
his fellow conspirators; who, having been somewhat
horrified by the sudden rally of the enemy, now
recovered courage, and rushed upon him pell-mell;
so that when he recovered from the shock of his
fall, not Gulliver himself, waking from his first nap
in Lilliput, was more multitudinously overrun by
the bodies, or more hopelessly secured in the toils of
his pygmy foes.
Bang away, roared General Dare, the patriot;
down goes all tyrants! Freedom and equality for
ever! All them that's got sore bones, pay him up
old scores.
Horrible were the din and confusion that now
prevailed; and horrible also, for a moment, were
the struggles of the downfallen monarch; who,
however
,
being somewhat troubled with an asthma,
became after a time completely exhausted and
incapable
of further resistance; upon which Master
Dare demanded handkerchiefs to bind him securely;
which being effected, this incomparable putter-down
of tyrants snatched up a birchen twig, and
dispensed
,
with uncommon coolness, a dozen thwacks upon
the victim's shoulders. Nor did he rest here, but
passing the rod from hand to hand, compelled every
member of the new born republic to administer, in
like manner, the same number of blows; which
were, in general, laid on with exceeding good will.
This being accomplished, he called for three cheers;
after which we all took to our heels, leaving the
deposed
ruler to his meditations.
The result of this exploit exceeded our most
sanguine expectations. We had our misgivings,
when it was over, as to its effects upon the good
people of the town, especially upon our parents and
guardians; who, we feared, might espouse the
enemy's
interests, and exact a terrible retribution.
But, as our good fortune would have it, Burley was
by no means a favourite of the people, his manners
being stiff and disagreeable, and his severity in
school occasionally made the subject of remark and
disapproval; and his misadventure, which was
indeed
surprising and ridiculous enough, excited much
more mirth than commiseration. The disgrace of
the thing, added to this want of sympathy, and the
impossibility of obtaining any satisfaction or
reparation
,
for he was ashamed to carry his complaints
before a magistrate, drove the poor fellow half mad;
so that he packed up his effects, and in two days
decamped from the town, without any one knowing
whither he had gone.
CHAPTER VI.
The Academy is converted into a Republic; and how it prospered
under its Presidents.
The
exploit was productive also of another effect
extremely advantageous to our schoolboy interests.
It set the town people to discussing the merits
of the flogging system of education; which being
now brought under consideration for the first time,
was pronounced by the majority entirely unsuited
to the character and genius of a republican people;
whose children, it was demonstrated, ought to be
brought up with the highest ideas of personal
independence
and honour, of freedom and equality, which
the tyranny of the rod must inevitably beat out of
their tender spirits. To subject them to the sway of a
despot in youth, was to prepare them for slavery in
their riper years, to render them the ready prey of
any designing demagogue, who might aim at the
liberties of the people. In short, this question (there
being a minority opposed to the new doctrine,)
produced
a furious ferment in the town, and would, I
doubt not, in time, have resulted in an entire change
in the State Government; for it was fast assuming a
political aspect; when it was put an end to by the
minority yielding the point, and agreeing with the
others that the Academy should thenceforth be
governed
on republican principlesthat is, that there
should be no more flogging.
In pursuance of this resolve, a new teacher was
sought for, capable of administering
Hic-hc-hoc
on
the new system; and a worthy personage, who had
previously made application for the vacancy, and
was willing to try the experiment, was engaged, and
forthwith entered upon his Presidential labours.
The experiment, in his hands, lasted only a
fortnight
;
for whether it was that he was at heart
opposed
to the system, or that we were as yet too
young in liberty to know how to enjoy the blessing
in moderation, it is very certain that, at the
expiration
of the second week, he summoned the Trustees
together, assured them that the republican system of
schoolkeeping was all moonshine, and declared that
unless he was permitted to resort to the
ultima
ratio pdagogorum
, i. e. the birch, to maintain his
authority, he must give up his charge altogether.
And as he was as resolute in his demand as the
Trustees were in refusing it, the controversy ended
in his immediate abdication.
A new teacher was soon obtained, who warmly
approved of the new principle, and averred, that,
from his experience, boys were more easily, as well
as more profitably, governed by appealing to their
pride and good sense than to their palms and
shoulders
that
the rod, which always left the memory
and taint of dishonour, or any kind of bodily
punishment
,
did more harm than goodthat
he
had never
trounced a lad in his life; but in extreme cases, had
found that exposing the culprit to the ridicule of his
playmates, was sufficient, and, indeed, the most
effectual
punishment that could be inflicted. And this
kind of punishment he proposed to administer by
means of a foolscap or ass's head, I know not which
he called it, (but I remember it had long ears, with
little bells all over it,) to be clapped on the offender's
head; and this the trustees, after he had displayed it
for their inspection and admiration on his own
head, (which, I think, it must have become
exceedingly
,)
agreed he should be permitted to introduce
into the school.
The first trial was unfortunately made upon the
poll of General Dickey Dare, for some slight
offenceI believe, whistling Yankee Doodle in the
midst of a recitation, of which he was growing
tiredwho took it in great dudgeon, and indeed,
flung it out the window; a freedom that the
President
,
forgetting his horror of all bodily punishment,
resisted by a furious box on the ear. This outrage,
the more intolerable, as all now knew that the
trustees themselves had espoused our cause, and
forbidden
flogging
in toto
, was instantly avenged by a
volley of inkstands from all quarters of the room;
by which the aggressor was so amazed and terrified
that he immediately leaped out of the same window
that had given exit to the foolscap, which, with
himself
,
was never more seen in the Academy.
The next teacher obtained, met the views of all
concerned, being a very amiable, indolent personage
who agreed the more readily to adopt the republican
system, as he had just brains enough to perceive it
would save him a vast deal of trouble. He seemed
very well content we should do as we pleased, get
our lessons when we liked, and as we liked, come
in and go out, laugh, talk, play, fight, or do any
thing else just as we thought proper; a degree of
forbearance that won our entire love and respect,
which we were accustomed to show by peppering
him, whenever he was in a brown study, with potato
popguns and showers of ripe elder-berries; by
emptying the ink bottle on his chair, when he
appeared
in white trowsers, and strewing it with pin
Vol. I.6
caltrops when in brown; and by sundry other
innocent
tricks, wherewith tender juvenals delight to
show their affection. These little freedoms, it is
true, sometimes drove him into a passion, when he
scolded at us with great energy and emphasis; but
they gave him no disgust to the school, in which he
might have perhaps remained the president to this
day, had it not been for a discovery made by some
busy bodies, which brought his administration to a
close, after six months' sway, and wrought somewhat
of a change in public opinion on the subject of the
new system.
The discovery was, that, under the said system,
learning was at a stand-still, the boys having actually
advanced in nothing but mischief during all that
period. The system was again brought under
discussion
;
the minority who had originally opposed
it, repeated their denunciations; and, after another
squabble, which, this time, bade fair to shake even
the National Government, (so hot, furious, political
and patriotic were the passions it excited,) our
enemies
prevailed, and schoolboy rights and schoolboy
glory fell for ever.
It was now urged, that the best way to bring up
the boys of a republic in detestation of tyrants, was
to put tyrants over them during their school days,
and thwack them into a thorough appreciation of
the horrors and inconveniences of oppression. In
short, it was agreed that the Ancien Rgime should
be restored, and the birch used as before; or, at
least, so far as was necessary to help us along with
our books, and keep us on our best behaviour.
In coming to this resolution, our enemies (for so
we now considered the trustees, and all who took
part with them,) forgot the lessons of history and
experience; which teach, that, however easy it may
be to enslave a people who have enjoyed freedom so
long as to be tired of it, it is by no means easy to
subjugate those who have just come to a taste of it.
Had they pondered this truth a little, they would
have saved themselves a good deal of surprise at
what befell, upon the third day of the reign of the
new master they had appointed to rule over us;
when that indiscreet personage, having flourished
his rod for the first time, was valiantly set upon by
General Dare and the rest, and ejected from the
premises, after having suffered a castigation ten times
more severe and wholesome than any he could have
ever designed to inflict.
Another teacher was obtained, and with a like
result
;
and then another, whose reign was as briefly
and ingloriously brought to an end; by which time,
the trustees, who were now unanimously of opinion,
that the democratic system had ruined us, and were
resolved to leave no means untried to flog us into
submission, began to perceive a difficulty in
obtaining
mastersthose whom we had driven from the
chair having united in representing us as such a set
of bloody-minded young desperadoes, nay, of
incarnate
imps, that others of the race were filled with
terror, and declined having any thing to do with the
school; and, in fact, there was an inter-regnum of
two months, during which we happy republicans
enjoyed
a famous holiday.
CHAPTER VII.
A conspiracy against the liberties of the infant republic; and
President M'Goggin is elected to rule over it.
At
the end of this space, the trustees succeeded in
engaging the services of a personage, who, I verily
believe, was procured for the sole purpose of testing
the efficacy of the
brutum fulmen
, of subjugating
us by main force; for he was an illiterate vulgar dolt,
an Irishman just caught, who professed, as he said
himself, to teach nothing but r'ading, writing,
'rithmetic, and dacent manners; although, in other
respects, the very man the trustees wanted. His
name was M'Goggin. He was six-feet high, and
limbed and shouldered like a Hercules; and, indeed,
of such strength and activity, that, had he been set at
the business for which he was best qualifiedthat is,
canal-diggingI have no doubt he would have cut
through the Isthmus of Panama in a month, without
any assistance. He had an ugly look, too, about the
eyes, which, besides being of the colour of a cat's,
were overshadowed by a pair of brows of such a
bigness
and appearance that they looked like two stuffed
rat-skins stuck on with glue; and his complexion
was of the hue of sole-leather, plentifully besprinkled
with freckles of the size of half-dimes. To add to
his demerits, he was entirely incapable of fear, and
had such a natural love of a row, that, when informed
by the trustees of our character and doings, and the
probability, or indeed, certainty of his soon being
embroiled with us, he rubbed his hands with
satisfaction
,
and declared we were swate little divils,
and that we should get along very well together.
I remember very well the impression which the
first view of this destined enslaver produced upon
the scholars; and it was none the weaker for some
hints of his qualities which had begun to circulate
among us. We were assembled at the Academy door,
comparing accounts, when the new President was
pointed out by one who had seen him before,
crossing
the street to a turnstile, which led into the
schoolhouse green, through a fence full five feet high.
We all pronounced him a giant, and some one said
he looked as if he could walk over the fence like
nothing; a declaration, which, though made in jest,
was justified by the event; for the gentleman,
neglecting
the stile, either because he did not see it, or
scorned to pass by a mode so humble and
commonplace
,
suddenly leaped into the air and over the
fence, without so much as laying his hands upon it;
which, indeed, he could not do, both hands being
occupied by two mysterious-looking bundles, the
nature of which, at that distance, we could not make
out. The facility with which he performed this
wondrous feat, as if it were a matter of every day's
occurrence, and the appearance he had in the air so
like a fiery dragon or a flying dromedary, struck a
kind of terror into the youthful republicans, who
looked upon one another with blank visages; and
then, as Mr. M'Goggin drew nigh, slunk away
silently
into the school, and betook them to their
seats.
In a moment more, M'Goggin entered; and we
then saw that the two bundles he carried were
composed
6*
of goodly birchen twigs, there being at least
a groce of them altogether; and this sight, it may be
supposed, did not banish the chill of our first
impressions
.
These odious emblems of rule, carried on
his shoulders like the fasces of a Roman lictor, he
bore to the master's desk, situated on a platform;
which having ascended, he turned upon us the light
of his countenance, and roared, (for his voice was
like the bellow of a bull,) in tones that made the
glasses rattle, and, I might almost add, some of our
bones into the bargainGood morrow till ye, ye
spalpeens! I'm your masther and t'acherGet up
and make me a bow, to show your good manners.
Now whether it was that there was electricity in
his tones, or that we were all willing to prove we
were well bred young gentlemen, it is very certain
that every soul in school, at these words, bounced
up and fell to scraping and ducking with the utmost
civility; which being done, the invader, dropping
down upon his chair, roared out again, before we
could follow his example and resume our seats, which
we were about to doStand at aise!as ye are,
ye rapperees, 'till I lay down the law till ye!
In this, also, he was obeyed; though I cannot say
any of us actually stood at our ease, but, on the
contrary
,
we remained casting wild and anxious glances
one upon another, as if doubting whether we had
not of a sudden got some dangerous nondescript
animal
,
instead of a new preceptor, among us. But the
gentleman gave us no time for pondering. Now,
ye blackguards! he cried, listen to my spache, and
remimber it every letther; and him that doesn't,
belave me, I'll have the skin of him. D'ye hear,
ye vagebones! Now, thin, I'm tould ye're an
iligant
set of divil's imps, one an' all, that knows
nayther manners, nor obadience, nor dacency of
behaviour
;
but, arrah, ye divils, look me in the face,
till I tell ye what I am of
meself
, that is the
Masther
over ye!
Every eye was at once obediently turned upon the
gentleman, who with furious voice, and hideous
contortions
of countenance, like a bulldog taking
physic
,
continued:
Be the powers, I'm nothing at all at all, only
jist the gentleman that will bate the wickedness out
of ye! D'ye hear
that
, ye rapscallions?
And with that, Mr. M'Goggin, whose ire seemed
to rise at the sound of his own voice, jumped up
again; and flourishing his birches, a whole bundle
at at ime, again burst forth: D'ye want to be licked,
ye divils? I'm tould, ye're grand fighting ganiuses.
But d'ye want it? Does any of ye want it? If so,
spake; spake up like big little fellows, any of ye;
for, be me sowl, I'm itching to begin wid ye!
This harangue, or rather defiance, for it was
nothing
less, the horrid fellow concluded by marching
round the room, and prying into every countenance,
as if for the purpose of finding some one disposed to
try conclusions with him; and it is wonderful with
what pacific modesty every eye was cast to the floor,
the moment Mr. M'Goggin stood before its possessor.
Even General Dicky Dare, who we thought could
face Old Nick himself, was observed to become so
studious and intent upon a sum he was working on
his slate, as the gorgon passed, as to be quite unable
to lift his eyes up to it. In short, we were all very
peaceably inclined that morning, and stood the
challenge
with patiencebecause, as we agreed, as soon
as we got out of school, Mr. M'Goggin was a
stranger
,
and it was not worth while to quarrel with
him at the first introduction. Besides, as we also
concluded, it would be just as well to wait a while,
to know what sort of a person he was.
In this particular, Mr. M'Goggin did all he could
to gratify us, by laying open his characteristics as fast
as possible. I should rather say, his characteristic,
for he had but one; and that was a raging desire to
get an opportunity to trounce some of us. He sat upon
the watch all day long, birch in hand, threatening,
fifty times an hour, if a boy did but look up, or
scratch his head, or drop a book, or stir on his seat,
or do, in fact, any thing at all, to bate him, if he
did that again; and as we were all too intent upon
the study of his characteristics, as above, to think
of giving him such an opportunity of quarrelling with
us, it so happened that, for five whole days, to the
infinite astonishment of the whole town, we were
the best behaved boys that were ever seen in a
school-room.
CHAPTER VIII.
President M'Goggin converts his government into a despotism:
the patriots rise in insurrection, and strike a terrible blow for
freedom: the effects of the great battle between the oppressor and
the oppressed.
On
the sixth day, the usurper waxing weary of
his close application, and deeming his power
perfectly
established, began to relax somewhat in his
vigilance; and in the afternoon took occasion to pay
a visit to a house across the way, that he had hired
for the reception of his family, which, with the
assistance
of an old negress whom he had taken into
his service, he was now fitting up for his residence.
We took advantage of his absence to relax a little
ourselves, being as tired as he of the stupidity of the
five former days; and not knowing in what better
way to amuse ourselves, we got up a little fight
between
two of the juniors; and this gradually setting
some half dozen others by the ears, there presently
arose a prodigious uproar, which reached the
auditories
of M'Goggin, and brought him immediately
back. As we had warning of his return, the fray
was over, and we were all at our seats, diligently
poring over books and slates, before he entered;
which he did with thundering step, bellowing, as
he snatched up a bundle of his birchesWho's
been fighting? Tell me, ye villains, and I'll give
it till 'em!a question which, being addressed to
the whole school, no one felt himself called on to
answer.
Seeing this, and having repeated the question a
second time without effect, M'Goggin strode to
the door, locked it, and deposited the key in his
pocket; and we were thus shut up with the tiger,
with no possibility of escape; a horrid situation;
but its very desperateness began to infuse a kind of
courage into the breasts of many of us. Then
stepping
back to his platform, he cried out again, with
a most ferocious lookArrah, ye little divils,
ye don't think I'm now going to tache you a
lesson! Look upon me face! I intind to ask
you the question one afther another; and him that
doesn't answer, be the powers, I'll have the sowl of
of him! And, be me faith, I'll begin wid the
biggest
of ye.
And with that, he stepped up to Dicky Dare,
(who, being now driven to the wall, exchanged
glances with me, full of martial meaning and
resolution
,)
and demandedWho's been fighting, ye
spalpeen.
Why, really, responded Dicky, modestly, (but
I observed he stole his fingers towards an inkstand;
and I did the same, besides winking invitingly to
others to make ready,) I have been so busy with
this here problem, I can't pretend to say any thing
about it.
Ye lie, ye vagabone! cried the tyrant; an
expression
that the insulted general immediately
retorted
by calling him an Irish blackguard, and
throwing the contents of the inkstand into his face;
while, at the same moment, down came, like the
tail of a comet, whisking a world out of its sphere,
the whole bundle of switches upon Dicky's head,
whereby, as he afterwards said, he got six dozen
stripes all in one. Hurrah for freedom and
schoolboys'
rights! roared Dicky, making the inkstand
follow the ink. Come up to the scratch, boys,
and we'll trounce the black-faced beggar in no
time;a call that was responded to by some
twenty or thirty of us, who felt that the case was
desperate, and that we must fight now or yield forever.
But more than half our republicans, I am ashamed
to say, were under such terror of the oppressor's
looks, that they sat still, giving us no assistance
whatever.
And now came the tug of warthe crashing of
the bundled birches on heads and shoulders, the
rattling of inkstands against breast, wall and
window
the
shout, the cry, the rush, the scuffle, the
squeak and groan, the thump, the kick, the slip,
the tumble, the sound of rending garmentsfor it
was a Kilkenny business, and coats and jackets
went to pieces, if they did not utterly vanish in
dust and smoke. Never did twenty patriots rush to
the attack of their country's foe with nobler
intrepidity
than we; never did twenty bulldogs more
valiantly leap upon the throat and back of armed
rhinoceros or Hyrcan tiger. In short, we did
wonders
,
but the greatest wonder of all was, that we did
wonders in vain; for, in five minutes space, there
was not a soul of us that was not put
hors de
combat
.
Valour, patriotism, the love of liberty and
glory, could do nothing against a foe like Mr.
M'Goggin; who, having snatched up General Dare,
as General Dare would have snatched up a kitten,
and slung him round by the leg, in a circle, as a
slinger whirls his sling, whereby myself and seven
others were laid flat, and Dicky, who unfortunately
slipped through his fingers, lodged on the top of a
bookcase that contained the school librarycaught
up another combatant, whom he hurled like a cannon
ball at the heads of the rest, disabling four, as well
as his missile, and ended by demolishing the others
in the usual Irish way, that is, by knocking them
down with his fists.
This ending, however, was, with him, only the
beginning; for, having now rendered the whole of
us conformable, he recurred to his birches, and
flogged usalas, no longer resisting! in a manner
that is quite indescribable. In short, he entirely
used up his bundle of six dozen upon us; and this
being done, he appropriated the remaining fascis to
the others, the non-combatant members of the
confederacy
,
whom he trounced with great regularity
and impartiality, one after the other, till he had gone
over the whole school. In half an hour, we were a
vanquished peopleall vanquished, all subdued
dreaming no longer of our rights, but of our backs
crest-fallen, heart-fallen, chop-fallen, without the
courage left us even to indulge the hope of
vengeance
.
But vengeance was, nevertheless, in store.
CHAPTER IX.
Robin escapes from slavery, and begins to be a young person of
promise.
At
the time of M'Goggin's appearance and
usurpation
,
I was, or (for the matter was by no means
certain) was supposed to be very nearly seventeen
years old; an age at which the reader may be
surprised
at finding me still a schoolboy.
To explain this circumstance, I may observe,
first, that boys in my day, and in that country, were
not supposed to reach the years of discretion so
soon as they do now; it being no uncommon thing
to see gawky fellows of eighteen or nineteen, with
mown chins and bass voices, sitting at the desk in
school, as simple as their neighbours, or playing
shinney on the green with all the zeal and
abandon
of boyhood. This undoubtedly arose, in a great
measure, from the defective system and means of
education; but in part also, from the negligent way
in which boys were brought up by their parents;
who, having their heads full of their own business,
were usually glad to delegate all charge of them,
with all the trouble, to ill-rewarded and incompetent
schoolmasters.
When boys were intended for college, greater
pains were indeed taken to find them good teachers,
who inspired them with early manliness; but in the
Vol. I.7
common schools, where the majority of lads were
to finish their education, the masters being such
ignoramuses as I have described, they were
commonly
left to themselves, and remained, to all
purposes
,
boys, until their education, or rather the
period assigned to it, was completed; when, being
taken away from school, they immediately became
men; the change being effected, like that from day
to night in tropical regions, without any twilight, or
gradual merging of the one into the other. The
manner of the transformation was as ridiculous as
its instantaneousness was striking. A neckcloth and a
pair of high heeled boots were put on; and then the
wearer suddenly amazed his friends by beginning to
talk grammarthat is, by saying, for them fellers
those felloes, for me and him, he and I, &c.
using big words, and trouncing all the boys, his
associates of the day before, who accosted him with
the old familiar nickname of friendship, instead of
saluting him by the honourable title of
Mister
.
There was the additional reason for my remaining
so long a schoolboy, that I was more than twelve
years old before I began my education, and was, at
that period, as I have mentioned, several years
behind my age, as it respected the growth of both
mind and body. It is true, that, having once taken
a start, I was soon on a par, as to intelligence, with
other boys of my age, and, in some respects, even
advanced beyond them; but I was certainly, like
the rest, a mere boy, so long as I remained at school
and, indeed, as the reader may perhaps think, for
a good while afterwards.
From what I have said of the anxiety of parents
to escape the charge and trouble of their children, it
will not seem very surprising that little was done on
their part, to abate or punish the excesses into which
we were driven by the belligerent and democratic
spirit prevailing amongst us. There was,
undoubtedly
,
great commotion among them at every new
flogging and expulsion of the master they had set
over us; at such times they scolded us with great
energy, expatiated upon the enormity of the offence,
and even threatened us with the terrors of private
castigation;nay, sometimes, even vowed they
would give us up to the civil authorities, to be
punished for riot and assault and battery. As for
expelling us the school, that was never talked of, for
the excellent reason that, as every one of us hated
school more than any thing else in the world, so
expulsion
would have been esteemed the greatest
favour they could have bestowed on us. It is very
certain that, whatever they did to bring us back to
reason, they failed to effect their purpose.
In my own case, I must confess, that the share I
had in all these excesses was very disagreeable to
my good patron; who, although immersed in the
cares of his laborious and harassing profession, was
yet at pains to watch over me as much as he could,
to admonish me of the folly and wickedness (for so
he called it,) of my behaviour, and, pointing out the
peculiar impropriety and heinousness of it in my
case, to exhort me to such modesty of deportment
and devotion to my studies as my peculiar situation
made the more imperatively necessary. Such
discourses
had their effect only for a time; for, whatever
were the virtuous resolutions I framed, and the
promises
I made him, I was sure, so easily was I led
away by the example and incitements of my
school-mates
,
to be as bad, in a week or two, as ever.
This incorrigibleness, and the disappointment of the
hopes he had once indulged of my growing up
worthy
of his care and affection, his disgust of my
boisterous
conduct, and indignation at my folly,
gradually
undermined me in his regards; and the
alienation
was the more rapid, as well as excusable,
because
he had now an object upon whom nature
impelled him to lavish all his richest affections.
His little daughter of whom I have spokenher
name was Nanna, derived, I believe, from some
Swedish ancestress on the maternal sideas one
whom, from her infirm constitution, every body
almost daily expected to see fall into the tomb,
began, about the period of her mother's death, to
exhibit symptoms of returning health; which being
taken immediate advantage of by her skilful parent,
she was in a few months, to his own inexpressible
joy and the amazement of every one else, restored
to complete health. The development of her
faculties
,
her rapid advance in beauty, grace, sweetness of
dispositionin every thing that could warm the
heart, and inflame the pride, of a doting father, were
indeed surprising; and at the time of which I speak
that is when I reached what was supposed to be
the verge of my eighteenth yearshe was a creature,
being then nearly fifteen years old, whom no one
could look upon without interest and admiration.
She was the loveliest of creatures; and I, who had,
from habit, grown to regard her as, and to call her,
a sister, was as proud of her beauty as was my
patron
,
her father himself. It was not, therefore,
unnatural, having such a being, his own offspring,
to love, that he should love me less; and whatever
pain I felt at the change in his affectionsfor, boy
as I was, I perceived there
was
a changeI ceased
to regret it, when I thought that he had taken from
me, only to bestow on Nanna. However, I do not
intend to be sentimental.
It could not be otherwise than that such a being,
with whom my daily and hourly intercourse was
that of a brother, should, sooner or later, exercise a
strong and happy influence, even without knowing
it herself, over both my manners and my feelings;
and it is to the commencement of that influence, more
than to the remonstrances of my patron, that I date
the first improvement in both. So true it is, that
the silent, and even unsuspected, influence of woman
sways the heart more strongly to virtue and
manliness
than the wisest admonitions of sages.
I felt this influence for the first time, when
rushing
into the before mentioned battle with President
M'Goggin; which, indeed, I entered into with no
small degree of reluctance; though as M'Goggin was
such a champion as I had never before broken lance
with, I cannot, for the life of me, say whether there
was not quite as much deterring influence of another
kind
videlicet
, a fear of the consequences. But
that battle over, I am very certain, I began to
experience
the unmixed influence of Nanna in the
feelings that followed; for I was ashamed of myself
for having got such a flogging; whereas I never
remember
to have experienced any shame after a
flogging
before, the whole gist of the grief, in such
cases, lying only in the pain of the blows.
And I felt that influence still more strongly in a
desire that immediately seized me to leave the school;
and that, not merely for the purpose of escaping
similar humiliations fur the future, of which, I
confess
,
I had no little dread, but that I might begin
a course of reform and amendment in my life and
manners, which, I had a vague notion, I could not
so easily do, while remaining a boy at school. In
this feeling, I took advantage of a lecture my patron
gave me on the subject of this last and greatest, the
M'Goggin battle, to assure him I was sorry for my
7*
ill deeds, and desirous to live a new life more in
consonance
with his wishes; and in fine, begged him, as
that was a necessary preliminary, to take me from
M'Goggin's hands and from school.
To this he consented; and then, having
endeavoured
to impress upon my mind a sense of my
peculiar situation, as one which, (putting his own
kindness, and the dependence I might place on it,
out of the question,) should make a youth of spirit
eager to embrace every means of securing his own
independence; and assuring me that he did this, not
by way of hinting an intention of withdrawing his
protection, which he should continue to me, until my
own misconduct rendered it impossible, which he
hoped, notwithstanding all that had passed, should
never be the case: having done this, I say, he offered
to my choice either to go to college, (after having
spent one year in careful preparation at some distant
and secluded school;) which having passed through,
he would then advise with me as to my future course;
or to enter his office, and there, while striving as far
as possible by my own diligent efforts, to repair some
of the deficiencies of my education, to be instructed
by him, by and by, in his own profession, and thus
be prepared for future usefulness in the world.
Either of these plans, he said, I was free to adopt;
and, in either, he would give me all the assistance I
could expect from a parent; but, whichever might
be my choice, he would expect of me a promise of
such diligence and good conduct as it was both a
parent's right and duty to expect.
My first inclinations were very clearly in favour
of the first named proposal; for I thought from
what I had often heard, there must be grand fun at
a college; and, in fact, in the midst of all the solemn
admonitions, and exhortations upon the necessity of
soberness and diligence which my benefactor was
giving me, my imagination was most easily seduced
by the ideas of sport and frolic. To the college,
therefore, I felt strongly inclined; and I was about
to say so, when (and I know not why such a
consideration
should enter my brain) I was struck with
the thought that Nanna would not be there; and as
it was but a step in the process of association to
remember that Nanna would be where I was, I
immediately resolved upon the latter proposal; at
which, I thought, the good doctor looked a little
gratified. I promised all he wished as to diligence,
good behaviour, &c.; and should have promised the
contrary, or any thing else, just as easily. In fact,
I was not at all accustomed to trouble myself with
doing things upon reflection, in those days.
The school was left, and in two or three days,
I turned man; that is, I put on the boots and
neckcloth
as aforesaid; astonished the grammar and the
dictionary, as well as the neighbours, with the
elegance
of my phraseology; and should have been
happy to comply with the last requisite of
transformation
,
and trounce all my schoolmates for calling
me Sy Tough, instead of Mr. Robin Day, had I not
been afraidnot of angering my patron, for, really,
I forgot him in the premisesbut of grieving the
gentle heart of Nanna; who, by some means or
other, became, about this time, inextricably involved
in every net of ratiocination my brain attempted
to weave.
There was but one regret I felt at leaving the
school; which was, that I was in debt to Mr.
M'Goggin for a trouncing, without the means of
making payment; and, indeed, I hated the villain
so heartily for having been the first to make me feel
ashamed of myself, that it was only owing to the
secret influence and oft recurring thought of Nanna
that I did not obey the impulse I felt to pelt him
with stones, whenever I chanced to meet him in
the streetespecially as the odious wretch never
passed me, without the insulting salutationGood
morrow till ye, ye vagabone: ye'll come to the
gallows
,
ye divil!
I wish I had not felt so vindictive, as it would
have saved me a deal of trouble; and, in particular,
the trouble of writing my adventures: but it was
fated I should have satisfaction of President
M'Goggin
for all his injuries.
CHAPTER X.
The unconquerable Dare organizes a new conspiracy, and the
tyrant is at last stormed in his citadel and overthrown.
Having
got the mastery of the school,
M'Goggin
,
the most inveterate of despots, with the consent
and approbation of the trustees and townsfolk,
continued
to exercise his authority in a way that was
designed to annihilate every vestige of liberty, and
make the late republicans slaves indeed. From their
own accounts, he flogged every soul at least once a
day, some of them twice or thrice; and as for
General
Dicky Dare, whose dulness at learning still kept
him at school, and whom the tyrant chose to
consider
the sowl of every mischief, he, from his own
representation, got a flogging once an hour.
But Dicky's soul was all of iron; and, like that
noble metal, the more it was hammered the harder
it grew. Besides, the country was now at war with
Great Britain; and the accounts continually coming
to his ears of battles lost and won, of deeds of valour
by sea and land, on the yawning billow and in the
imminent deadly breach, had kindled his martial
spark anew; and, notwithstanding his daily
drubbings
,
he was more of a soldier than ever, full of
plots, and stratagems, and treasons. He bore his own
pangs with heroic patience, being engaged, all the
while, meditating a capable and wide revenge; and the
pangs of his schoolmates he beheld even with
satisfaction
;
for, as he said to me, his friend and confidant,
like a statesman and patriot,Though they are a
pack of cowards, you can even thump cowards into
bravery, by Julius Csar; and by and by, Bully
M'Goggin, (which was his honourable title in
private
,)
will trounce them up to the sticking point.
In this, General Dare prophesied aright; for in
six months' time, M'Goggin's cruelty had driven
the boys into such a frenzy of desperation and
hatred
,
that there was not one of them who would not
have murdered him in cold bloodprovided any
one should have shown them
how
, and made them,
as they called it, free of the hangman. This pitch
of fury was what General Dicky meant by his
elegant
expression, the sticking point; and the
moment
they reached it, he invited them, now ready
for any extremity, to join him in the execution of a
plan of revenge he had long digested, and which
may be considered a monument at once of his genius
and his wrath. And in this great design, for my
sins, Dicky invited me to join him, drawing, in
such agreeable coloursalas, I had drawn it a
thousand
times beforesuch a ravishing picture of the
bliss I must enjoy in paying M'Goggin all his dues,
that even Nanna's image, though it fluttered through
my head as often and as sweetly as ever, could not
entirely banish it from my thoughts. Nevertheless,
I had the grace of refuse assisting in the scheme, and
to repeat the refusal over and over again, until the
moment for executing it had come; and then
But after all, I went only to enjoy the scene as a
spectator: which is, however, the way in which many
other persons go into a squabble.
The day which was to witness this grand proof of
a school's revenge, and of Dicky Dare's genius and
resolution, was at the close of April; and the year,
1813; a period rendered the more auspicious to the
design by the ferment into which the people of the
Middle States were thrown by the visitations of
sundry British fleets to their waters; Admiral
Cockburn
being at that moment employed with all his
forces in the Chesapeake, robbing farmers'
henroosts
,
and Admiral Beresford attempting the same
thing, though with no great luck, at the mouth of
the Delaware. The news of these gallant forays had
just reached our town, which was kept in a furious
commotion by the passage through it of sailors and
soldiers on their way to the scene of action; and still
more by the patriotic efforts of its citizens, who,
having no better way to show their zeal, mustered
three or four companies of volunteers, who killed
the British without stirring from home, and kept the
town in a terrible tumult, day and nightbut
particularly
at nightby firing off cannons, and
sometimes
their heads and arms; while the juniors and
rabblement at large imitated them, as far as they
could, by burning tar-barrels, firing fifty-sixesthat
is, not fifty six-pound cannons, but fifty-six pound
weightswell rammed with gunpowder, and
blowing
their eyes out with squibs and popguns. Nothing
could be more favourable to the scheme of revenge
than the nightly recurrence of these disorders; and
this the great contriver and conspirator, Dicky,
knew full well. And, fortunately, the hubbub on
the night in question was even greater than usual.
M'Goggin's house, which, I mentioned, was near
the Academy, was in a sequestered part of the town,
there being but few other dwellings, and those of
the meanest order, near. It was built on a large lot,
in which M'Goggin had established a kitchen
garden
,
well stored with potatoes; and there was an
attempt at flowers and fruit-trees near the house,
which stood a little back from the street, and was a
small, and very old and ugly cottage-looking
building
.
Immediately before the door was a clump of
four Lombardy poplars, ancient and decaying, that
stood, in a square, two on each side of the path, and
had been taken advantage of by some romantic
dweller of former days to construct a kind of rude
alcove, by nailing strips of board on the sides, and
throwing a few beams across, by way of roof; which,
in summer, was usually shaded by vines of gourds
and squashes. At the gate, immediately in advance
of the poplars, was a locust tree. On the right hand
was a cowhouse, and, on the left, a pigpen; and, on
the whole, the cottage was quite romantic enough
looking for Mr M'Goggin.
The happy individuals who, with Mr. M'Goggin,
shared this peaceful abode, were an old negro man,
whom he worked half to death among his potatoes,
and an ill-favoured woman that he called his wife,
but whom every one else considered his slave, as he
was said to be very savage to her, and to make as
great a drudge of her as the negro. Indeed, the boys
had a story that he sometimes beat her; but, though
many believed it, no one knew this for certain. He
had, besides, a great bulldog, which he starved, to
make him ferocious, and therefore the better guard
over his potatoes.
The removal of this dangerous ally of the tyrant
was considered a necessary preliminary to the attack
on the master; and this Dicky effected, the night
preceding the explosion, by training him off with a
piece of meat tied to a string, until he had thrust his
neck into a noose; by means of which he was
dragged to a horse-pond, and there drowned, amid
the rejoicings of the whole band of conspirators.
This being done, the youthful general, upon whose
shoulders fell the execution of every task that had the
inconvenience of being attended with danger, climbed
up the locust tree at the gate, and with a saw, cut
out two small notches, which he then plastered over
with clay, to prevent their being seen next day.
The object of this manuvre, which concluded all
the preparations required, will be presently seen.
It was not till after ten o'clock on the following
night, that the conspirators assembled on the scene of
action, prepared to carry their vengeful plot into full
execution. They came marvellously well provided
with ammunitionthat is, with pebbles and
brickbats
,
and some, I fear, with more dangerous weapons.
The pebbles and brickbats were chiefly in the hands
of the younger boys, whom General Dicky, having
long and laboriously drilled them for the enterprise,
now proceeded to station so as to surround the
house, and particularly to command the front and
back doors. There was a troop of older boys armed
with fireballs (the general called them grenades,)
made of oakum dipped in turpentine, which they
were ready, by means of lighted segars and a little
gunpowder, to kindle at any moment. These the
General called the Invincible Grenadiers, and
stationed
,
like the others, both in front and on the rear
of the building, but much nearer than the brickbat
guards; and, besides his grenade, each of these
desperadoes
had a good stout crabtree, by way of
sidearms
.
These arrangements having been effected, and all
in deep silence, the General, who had previously
spied a little into the state of the premises, made a
second reconnoissance, prior to entering upon the
last and grandest of his dispositions. And here I
may observe, that all these things were done with
Vol. I.8
but little fear of alarming the enemy; for, besides
the hubbub kept up in the town by the volunteers
and patriotic citizens, there was a gale of wind
blowing, and making a great rustling and howling
among the trees and chimneys. Accordingly,
General
Dare had no difficulty in making his way to a
window, and through a cranny spying into the
proceedings
within; which proceedings some of us,
who had from curiosity crept nearer to the house,
judged to be uncommonly interesting, as we could
hear an occasional murmur of voices, a mingling, as
it seemed, of growling and lamenting, which we
knew not how to account for. The mystery was
soon unravelled by General Dicky Dare, who crept
back, and declared, to our astonishment and
indignation
,
that President M'Goggin was beating his
wifethat he had seen him strike her with his
handthat he was drunk or mad, he knew not
whichand that the poor woman, who was in a
great fright, was crying and begging him not to
abuse her.
This intelligence, as may be supposed, produced a
strong effect upon the feelings of the conspirators,
who were not without generous and chivalrous
sentiments
;
and they swore, one and all, they would
have satisfaction of the ruffian for his brutality to
the woman, as well as for the injuries he had done
themselves. And this discovery, I may also say,
wrought an immediate change in my own
resolutions
;
for whereas I had, up to this moment,
religiously
persisted in the determination I had made not
to take part in the affray, I was now so operated
upon by indignation at M'Goggin's brutishness,
that I fell to work with zeal, anxious to avenge the
poor woman's wrongs; and was, from that moment
to the end, a very prominent ringleader in the whole
row.
The gallant Dare, now doubly excited to
diligence
,
produced a long rope, having a running
noose at the end. This he threw over the roof of
the arbour, and then laid the noose across the
path, supporting it on little sticks in such a way
that it was impossible any one should pass along the
walk, without striking it with his foot; and the
noose was made so large, that it not only stretched
over the whole path, but would admit a man to pass
through it, standing erect. Near the other
extremity
of the rope, was tied by one end a stout bar
of wood, in which was a notch, meant to receive one
end of a second bar that was loose; while its other
end, as well as the end of the bar that was tied, was
designed to be placed each in one of the notches
sawn in the locust tree the preceding evening, at a
height of fifteen or twenty feet from the ground;
the whole forming a kind of trap which would
support
a great weight at the end of the rope, until
something should jerk at the noose; in which case
the loose bar that served as a prop, must be
dislodged
,
the trap sprung, and the weight instantly
fall to the ground, dragging the noose up to the top
of the arbour, and with it Mr. M'Goggin, for whose
sole benefit this beautiful contrivance was invented
by General Dicky.
And supposing we once had the tyrant in the
toils, there was then little fear but that we should be
able to work our will with him at our leisure. The
trap being set, the rope was weighted by some half
a dozen fifty-sixes, which were passed up the tree,
and suspended by Dicky's own hands. We had
previously thrown on the ground, under the noose,
a quantity of straw, sprinkled with turpentine and
sawdust, which we designed to fire, the moment our
tiger was caught, and so give him the benefit of a
moderate roasting and smoking, as an introduction
to what was to follow.
It will be perceived that, in laying this ingenious
trap, for M'Goggin, the great contriver did not
anticipate
the possibility of any one else falling into it.
There was good reason, indeed, why no one else
should; for the negro being a very cowardly old
fellow, (who would, moreover, in all probability be
sound asleep in his garret,) and Mrs. M'Goggin a
weak, timid woman, it was inferred our assault
would only confine
them
more closely to the house;
while M'Goggin, being quite fearless, would
undoubtedly
make a rush upon us. The result proved
that the calculations even of Dicky Dare might
be defeated, like those of any other great military
genius.
Our arrangements being at length all completed,
the signal for assault was given, and at a period, as
it proved, extremely critical for Mrs. M'Goggin;
for, just as the word was passing round, All
ready! we heard her utter a dismal shriek, as if
the ruffian, her lord and master, was again asserting
his supremacy. We uttered three tremendous
cheers; and then, following them up with yells of
Down with the tyrant! and schoolboys' rights
forever
!
let fly a terrible volley of brickbats and
grenades, by which the shutters of the lower
windows
and the glasses in the upper ones were dashed
to atoms; and some half dozen of the latter missiles,
the fire-balls, entering the upper rooms, the house
was straightway illuminated, as if on fire, and filled
with smoke.
The effect of this furious cannonade was
immediately
made manifest by a medley of cries,
ejaculations
,
and roaring curses from within, the woman
squeaking, the negro yelling, and M'Goggin
vociferating
I know not what, but, I believe, maledictions
on the heads of himself, us,the divil-born
schoolwhelps
,and
every body else; and the woman, in
an ecstacy of terror, was immediately seen darting
through one of the back windows, which had been
dashed open; whence she fled shrieking away, no
one offering her molestation, but on the contrary,
making passage for her, glad to have her out of the
way. At the same moment, the front door was
opened with a crash, and out came rushing, in his
night-gear, mad with frightnot the autocrat
M'Goggin, as we fondly hoped, but the negro-man;
who running blindly forwards, stumbled against the
noose, and was, in a twinkling, jerked up to the top
of the arbour, where he was seen hanging by one
leg, such an extraordinary picture of amazement
and terror as was never before witnessed, and such
a target for our fire-balls, (for a volley was thrown
before we had time to remark what kind of game
we had caught,) as schoolboys never before enjoyed.
The melo-dramatic character of the spectacle,
was, in the same instant, wonderfully heightened,
and its interest to us increased to the highest pitch,
by an incident that immediately befell; for
M'Goggin
,
who was close at the negro's heels, armed too,
as we discovered to our horror, with a gun, with
which he rushed forward in the act of firing, having
come within reach of the suspended negro, was
seized upon by this distracted personage, who had
been clawing the air in vain, and now succeeded in
fastening one hand amid the master's locks, while
the other, or the fingers thereof, got by mischance
into his mouth. This accident so discomposed the
nerves of the despot, who, I fancy, must have
8*
thought himself pounced upon by some incarnate
devil, darting upon him from the air, that he uttered
a wild howl, dropped his gun, which went off in
falling; and then, forgetting us, fell foul of the
negro, whom he cuffed with maniacal energy, being
himself haled, scratched and hugged by this flying
demon in a style just as eager and extraordinary.
Bang away! roared Dicky Dare, firing the
bundle of straw, which instantly burst into flames
and smoke around the two victims, both of whom
were now suspended; for some of the besiegers had
seized upon the rope, and hauled away so furiously,
that, in a trice, M'Goggin lost his footing on the
ground, and was dragged by the inveterate negro
into the air; where they continued to wage a battle
which could only be compared to the aerial fray of
the Genie and the Lady of Beauty, in the Arabian
story; while, all the time, there was such a shower
of fireballs raining against their bodies, and such
volumes of flame and smoke ascending from the
burning straw, as to render the spectacle grand,
ludicrous and horrible altogether; in short, it was
quite indescribable.
And now, while these strange combatants were
pursuing their strange fight, the negro pulling at his
adversary's hair, and yelling with the pain of his
fingers, which M'Goggin was grinding betwixt his
teeth, M'Goggin, on his part, biting and cuffing
and growling, and kicking the air; there arose a cry
that one of the boys was shot, struck by a bullet
from M'Goggin's gun, and that he was dying;
intelligence
that afterwards proved to be false, but
which, exasperating feelings that were already
rancorous
enough, was followed by furious calls to Kill
the murdering villain! and by a rush that many
made upon him with their clubs, with which they
furiously beat him; until the rope, frayed and worn
by the rough bark of the locust, suddenly gave
way, bringing him and the negro, with a most
terrible
plump, to the ground.
The negro, who fell uppermost, and had, besides,
the good fortune to fall upon his head, which was
not composed of trifling materials, rolled from his
master, and from the embers of the straw, into which
they had fallen together, kicked his leg free from
the noose, and then ran limping off, yelling like a
madman. As for M'Goggin, upon whom we rushed,
now certain of our prey, he lay without motion; and
a bright blaze from the house now falling on his
visage, there was straightway a cry that we had killed
him. He's done for! said General Dare, with
much composure, being the only one that was not
horrified at this result of our enterpriseHe's done
for, by Julius Csar!And so is the house too, or
there's no snakes in Virginnie!
It was even so: the cottage, which we had been,
for the last few moments, too busy to look at, or
think of, we now discovered was on fire, flames
already gushing out of the upper windows, and the
alarm fast passing through the town, and bringing
crowds of people to the scene of our triumph.
Right about facecut dirt! cried General Dare;
and, in a moment, we were scampering from the
field of battle in all directions, terrified at the thought
of what we had done, and still more at the fear of
what might be the consequences.
CHAPTER XI.
In which Robin Day, flying the terrors of the law, is sent out into
the world to seek his fortune.
For
my own part, I was in such a horror of fright
at the idea of having committed what I now felt was
nothing short of a murder, that I betook myself to
the fields, running as if the hue and cry, the
posse
comitatus
, constable, hangman and all, were after
me; and it was not until I had plumped over head and
ears into a ditch, whereby the ferment of my mind
was somewhat allayed, that I recovered enough of
my wits to consider what I was about. I then
reflected
,
that it was by no means certain M'Goggin
was actually dead, although, to be sure, he had looked
marvellously like a subject for the undertaker, his
face being bloody, and of a cadaverous hue. I
remembered
,
too, that he had fallen from the rope with
sufficient force to stun him for awhile; and moreover,
that the negro-man had tumbled upon him, and so
must have beaten the breath out of his body; and,
hence, it was not improbable, he had been only
in a swoon, from which he might have revived
already
.
In short, I satisfied myself that I was a great
simpleton for being so much frightened, and that the
wisest thing I could do, would be to creep away
to my comfortable home, without any further thought
of leaving it, until assured I had really got myself
into trouble.
Home, accordingly, I went, shivering with wet
and anxiety; and finding the door open, though no
one was stirring, I sneaked away to my chamber,
where I stripped off my wet clothes, and was about
slinking quietly into bed, when the motion was
arrested
by the sudden and unexpected entrance of
my patron. His countenance, which was pale and
disordered, filled me with alarm, and this he
proceeded
to heighten into the wildest consternation by
exclaimingWretched boy, you have killed a
man! Up and away: you must fly, or be seized,
tried, and perhaps hanged, as a murderer!
I leaped up, it may be supposed, quickly enough,
and attempted to give utterance to excuses and
explanations
,
that were none of the calmest or most
coherent; but Dr. Howard checked me: assuring me,
in an agitated and hurried voice, that I had no time
to lose, that he had seen M'Goggin, who was dying
of his injuriesof concussion, or compression, of the
brain, I knew not whichthat he had learned I was
one of the ringleaders in the affray, that some of the
citizens had gone for warrants to apprehend me, as
well as others, my companions, that he had left the
dying man, under pretence of getting his trephining
instruments, but in reality to find me, and send me
off, before it was too late; and he ended by mingling
upbraidings of my folly and wickedness, with
injunctions
to put on my clothes, and pack up a change
of linen in the saddle-bags, which he had brought
with him into the room, as I must mount horse and
be gone immediately.
I stood aghast; for the sentence of banishment
from his house was more dreadful to my feelings
than my fears had been; and in my confusion, I
uttered
,
I knew not why, the name of Nanna. He
looked discomposed, the tears came into his eyes,
and he exclaimed with mingled grief and bitterness
Ah, wretch, you have lost her too: you knew
not what I designed for you! Then, suddenly
changing to anger, he bade me not name her again;
and calling me madman, murderer, houseburner, and
I knew not what besides, he ended by ordering me
again to dress and be ready; and then left me.
I did as he bade me, slipped on my best coat,
stuffed the saddlebags with clothes, with which his
generosity had always supplied me to even
extravagance
and excess; and, though I did all in extreme
agitation of spirits, I had finished before he returned;
which he presently did, bearing a letter and
pocket-book
,
both of which he put into my hands, saying
that I must proceed to Philadelphia, and deliver the
letter to the gentleman to whom it was directed,
who would assist to put me out of the way of
danger
,
at least for a time.
He is my distant kinsmana merchantand
has a privateer which he is about sending to sea: he
will give you a berth in her, and you will then be
free to follow your bent, and cut throats to your
liking.
This he said with such bitterness of sarcasm, that
it overcame my spirits, and I could not avoid
shedding
tears; which seemed to soften him, and he then
spoke more gently.
It is the last life I should have ever desired for
you, he said, for it is little better than
freebooting
piracy
legalized. But it cannot be helped: the
emergency is too sudden for choice; there is no
alternative
.
The letter contains money: it will help
to fit you out: Mr. Bloodmoney, (the merchant to
whom the letter was directed,) will supply you
what more is needed. The pocket-book will keep
you on the road. You must ride all night: I have
ordered you Bay Tomhe will carry you to the
city: but should he fail, leave him on the road, and
hire another. You must be in Philadelphia
to-morrow
.
By this time, we could hear a trampling at the
stable, which was not far off; and my patron,
saying
all was ready, ordered me to follow him; but
immediately bade me hold, while he ran to his
study, from which he returned with a memorial of
the wreckthe only one he could ever obtain
which he had lighted on, at his last visit to the
coast, and bought for a trifle of old Mother Moll,
the first of my persecutors. This was a memento
of whose existence I had long been aware, though I
never attached any importance to it, as my patron
was sometimes inclined to do; for, in truth, I cared
nothing for my origin, and was too well content
with the protection, and, as I might have called it,
the parentage of the good doctor, to wish to
exchange
it for another's, even a father's. There was,
in fact, in the relic nothing very striking or
interesting
.
It was a string of beads of different sizes,
of some black wood, I know not what, but they
were polished, and had a fragrant odour; and there
was a central one, in shape somewhat of a cross, of
considerable size, with grotesque carvings, that
served
as a sort of locked to connect the two ends of the
string. It was, I always thought, just such a poor
trifling gewgaw as any common woman, a sailor's
wife, might wear; and I was the more impressed
that it had belonged to some such personage, as
there was roughly scratched, as with a jack-knife,
on the back of the locket, the name, as far as we
could make it out, of
Sally Ann
, which had
decidedly
the smack of a tar's delight about it. This, to
be sure, Dr. Howard agreed was likely enough; but
the poor sailor's wife might have been my mother
notwithstanding. But what chiefly rendered the
trinket of importance in his regard, was that Don
Pedro, the Spanish negro, our cook, of whom I
have spoken, and who was a mighty good Catholic,
and had an uncommon share of intelligence for his
degree, declared it was nothing less than a Catholic
rosary, as he knew by the number and arrangement
of the beads; and in fact, having put it into his
hands, he began to tell the beads, and, as he did so,
to jabber out a string of Ave-Marias and
Pater-Nosters
with great readiness and fluency; only that
he made such a hotch-potch of the matter as neither
himself nor any one else could make sense of.
This, my patron averred, was a curious
circumstance
;
as a Catholic child in a Yankee schooner (it
seems, Mother Moll had admitted she had taken
the beads from my neck, and Dr. Howard was
convinced
the wreck had been a trading vessel from
New England,) was certainly, something out of the
usual course of things; and he therefore resolved to
treasure the beads up, hoping that they might be
the means some day of leading to the most
interesting
discoveries.
This string of beads, or rosary, or whatever it
might be, he now put into my hands, bidding me
preserve it with religious care, nay, even to wear it
round my neck, for fear of accidents, as it might
conduct me perhaps to the arms of my parents;
of whom, he added, with some emotion, you
have now greater need than ever, having thrown
away . But here he interrupted himself,
and bade me follow him; which I did, until we had
come to the stable; where we found his horse Bay
Tom, an animal that he greatly valued, standing at
the door ready saddled, and with him old Don
Pedro himself, who had long professed a great
friendship for me, and from whom, indeed, in the
course of the last five years, I had gradually picked
up some little knowledge of the Spanish tongue,
which afterwards stood me in good stead.
Mount, and ride for you life, said my
benefactor
,
with a stern voice, yet wringing my hands with
painful earnestness; mount, he cried; and
heaven
forgive you this fatal deed, and go with you.
Don Pedro, also, having helped me into the saddle,
gave me a farewell shake, and blubbered, in his
own tongue'
Adios, mi nino
;adieu, my child;
at last, you are going to the devil: an assurance
which was by no means so pleasant as it seemed
true.
This done and said, Pedro opened a gate, leading
into the highway, (the doctor's house being seated
on the borders of the town,) that I might ride
through. But I faltered a moment, to look back to
the house, in which, notwithstanding the folly and
violence of my career, I had lived so many happy
hours of my youth. There was a light burning in
Nanna's chamber, who was as yet unacquainted
with the miserable adventures of the night. As I
looked up, the light was suddenly put out; and the
darkness that ensued smote upon my heart as a
mournful omen.
Why do you pause? muttered my patron with
impatience. Begone; your life depends upon your
speed.
Thus commanded, I turned my horse through the
gate, gave him the rein and spur, and in a moment
was out of the town, flying all the more fleetly for
the din, the cries and shouts that still prevailed; and
which, as the blast brought them to my ears, my
fancy converted into the halloos of vengeful pursuers.
Vol. I. 9
CHAPTER XII.
Robin Day meets an alarming adventure, and stumbles upon a
companion in misfortune.
And
now behold me upon the world alone, a hero
of eighteen, with just such qualifications for making
my way through the stormy paths of life as one
might expect in a cockboat for performing a voyage
round Cape Horn.
It is true, I entertainedor had done so, until the
affairs of the night had frighted it out of methe
best possible opinion of my own merits and abilities;
and such complacent self-regard, it is conceded on
all sides, is the best foundation and prognostic of
worldly success. I had trounced all my
school-mates
,
(General Dicky Dare, my friend and
confederate
,
though my rival, only excepted;) and it was
but a natural consequence that I should suppose
myself able in like manner to conquer all mankind;
and the share I had had in demolishing the power
and pretensions of the tyrants of the academy, had
convinced me I possessed the same ability to resist
the oppressions of the great men of the world, the
kings and presidents; of whom I entertained a very
mean opinion, believing they were only Burleys and
M'Goggins on a larger scale.
Besides this generous sense of my own merits, I
possessed another qualification thought to be of
almost equal efficacy in helping one through the
world; namely, a good personal appearance; for, from
having been the ugliest little imp in the world, I
was now grown, as my looking-glass told me, quite
a handsome young fellow, with black eyes and hair
the latter very curling and glossy, and, indeed,
the admiration of all the young ladies in the town,
as well as myself, and a figure that, in the main,
satisfied my own predilections; there being no fault
I could find, except that I was a thought shorter than
was necessary, and my complexion somewhat more
tawny than suited my ideas of perfect beauty.
This vanity and self conceit, as the reader may
properly esteem it, I know not whether I owed in
greater part to a natural spirit of coxcombry, or
to the uncommon indulgences I had so suddenly
fallen heir to in my patron's family; which were
enough to turn the brain of one to whom indulgences
had been before wholly unknown. But, at all
events, the foible was never strong enough to throw
me open to remark; and, as I have mentioned, the
catastrophe of the night had banished it from my
breast, at least, for a time; so that I certainly
derived
no advantage from it in what may be
properly
considered my outset in life.
My other qualifications for the great strife of the
world, were neither many nor striking. I had
acquired
,
during my five years at the academy, the
ordinary rudiments of education, besides a little
Latin, as the crabbed Ben Jonson disparagingly
said of his great superior, and less Greek; to
which I managed to add, during the few months I
was ensconced in my patron's office, a little French,
a knowledge of pestles and mortars, and the knack
of pulling out easy grinders. I had picked up some
bad Spanish from the cook, and from the coachman,
the art of riding and spoiling a horse. A French
barber had taught me to dance; and I learned to
squeak upon a cracked flute from the impulse of my
own genius; which even impelled me to the frenzy
of attempting the fiddle; whose mellifluous tones I
dispensed among pill-boxes and swinging bones,
until
my preceptor, disgusted at my music and
inattention
to what he esteemed my proper duties,
advised me, if I wished to play the fiddle, to draw
the bow over my own heada sarcasm that ended
my violining on the instant.
What other qualifications I may have possessed
I am ignorant ofexcept, indeed, an uncommonly
good and strong constitution, capable of enduring
all exposures and hardships; and this was, I believe,
after all, the only one on which I ought to have
placed any reliance. I was, in short, an ignorant
youth, a great schoolboy entirely incompetent to
the task of self-management or self-preservation;
and my benefactor had acted with wisdom in
assigning
me to a situation, wherein, besides enjoying
security from the vengeance of the law, which was
the first object to be aimed at, I should not be left
to the dangerous duty of taking care of myself.
I rode with great speed, for the first two or three
miles, being all the while in terrible fear of pursuit;
but, by and by, I slackened a little in my gait, the
night being still very dark and gusty, and the road,
like all other roads in New Jersey, intolerably rough
and dangerous. As my fears subsided, my griefs
began to usurp their place; and the thought of my
forlornness
and banishmentof my benefactor, whom
I loved well, and of Nanna whom, I discovered, I
loved still better, both now lost to me, and perhaps
for everweighed so heavily upon my heart, that I
gave myself up to despair, and lamented my fate with
floods of tears. In this melancholy employment I
continued
a mile further; and would perhaps have
continued
all night, had it not been for an incident that
presently befell, and aroused a multitude of other
feelings.
I had arrived at a place, where, at the bottom of a
slaty hill, a by-road, that came in a roundabout way
from the town, joined, and terminated in, the
highway
upon which I was travelling; and the hill being
pretty bare, for it was a barren, dreary place, so as
to offer no obstacle to the transmission of sounds,
and the winds lulling at the time, I was made
sensible
,
first, by the animation and snorting of my steed,
Bay Tom, and then by the surer evidence of my
own ears, that a horseman was upon the by-road,
descending the hill, and at as round a trot as myself.
This discovery filled me with confusion, for I did
not doubt it was one of the many pursuers, who
were, in all probability, by this time, scouring the
country in search of me.
Afraid to turn back, as that would be only to rush
into the hands of, perhaps, a whole band of
constables
and deputy sheriffs from the town, and relying
upon the speed of Bay Tom, who was of good blood,
and had a genealogy ten times longer than my own,
I increased my pace, in the hopes of getting beyond
the by-road, before the enemy had left it: after
which, I intended to show him as clean a pair of
heels as possible.
To my dismay, the stranger increased his pace in
like manner; and the thunder of his hoofs, which
grew louder and louder every moment, as the roads
converged nigher together, shook the hill. It was
plain he was riding as furiously as myself, determined
to get before me to the bottom of the hill, and so
intercept
9*
me. I spurred the harder: the enemy did
the same; and both came thundering together at the
meeting of the roads; where my terror, which was
now mounted to a pitch of perfect ecstasy, was
completed
by the bloody-minded villain flashing a pistol
in my face, and exclaiming with a voice of fury and
desperationDeath before dishonour! I won't be
taken alive!
The flash of the pistol brought my horse upon his
hams, frightened out of his wits, as I was out of
mine; but judge my astonishment when I recognised
in these terrible tones, the voice of my friend Dicky
Dare! who, a fugitive like myself, and, like myself,
prepared to see in every body an emissary of justice,
had made precisely the same mistake I had done,
had taken me for a deputy sheriff, as I had taken
him, had aimed, and sorely striven, to be first in at
the meeting of the roads, with the same intention of
escape; and finding himself, as I had done,
intercepted
and caught, had, very
un
like me, resolved to sell
his life dear, and so came within an ace of blowing
my brains out.
Dicky Dare! cried I.
Sy Tough! quoth he.
These were our exclamations; and, the next
moment
,
we burst into a roar of laughter, in which,
fright, sorrow, and every thing else, save the
ridiculousness
of the rencounter, was for a while
entirely
forgotten.
Having exercised our lungs in this way until the
humour of merriment was satisfied, we came to a
mutual explanation; and I found that General Dicky
was, like myself, an outcast and exile, cast upon the
world to seek his fortunethat we were brothers in
distress, as we had been in mischief.
He, it seemed, after retiring from the
battleground
,
had made his way home; though without
any preliminary visit to the fields, or dip in a ditch;
and not without some doubts, as he confessed, as to
what the lawyers would think of the matter;
which grew the more strongly upon him, when,
presently
,
a friend of his father, Captain Dare, suddenly
broke in with the fatal intelligence of M'Goggin's
being at the point of death, the application for the
warrants, &c.; whereupon the father, eyeing his
promising
heir for a moment with ire and indignation,
at last roared outD your blood, if you're so
good at killing, go kill the enemies of your country!
An injunction worthy of a Roman or Spartan, which
was followed by Captain Dare giving him a horse, a
sorrel nag of no great value, greatly inferior, indeed,
to my own blooded charger, a hanger, and pair of
pistols; to which he added a small supply of money
an article that the gratitude of the Republic took
good care he should never be greatly overburthened
withand then ordered him to be gone to the
nearest
army, to fight like a bulldog, and, if need should
be, to die like one.
This was exactly the thing for General Dicky,
whose soul was as eager for conflict as a young
charger's, and smelt the battle afar off, the thunder
of the captains, and the shouting; and who, in fact,
from all I could discover, seemed to look upon the
killing of M'Goggin as the happiest act of his life,
inasmuch as it was to that alone he owed the
gratification
of his dearest hope and most enthusiastic
desire
;
that is, to which he
would
owe it, provided he
should be so happy as to escape the harpies of the
law, of whom he was in some dread, as his late
transports had made manifest.
CHAPTER XIII.
Another terrible adventure befalls, and Robin Day saves his money
and loses his friend.
Meanwhile
, we had not paused to enter into
these explanations, but rode onward at such speed
as the nature of the road permitted; and the martial
equanimity wherewith the brave Dicky seemed to
bear the misfortune of the murder, which, in fact,
he professed to consider a mere accident of war, had
the effect of somewhat enlivening my own spirits.
We found, to our mutual delight, that both were
bound, in the first instance, to Philadelphia; and
Dicky demanded what were my designs, after I
should get there. I told him I was to go to sea in a
privateer, as my patron had arranged for me; a
declaration
that gave him extreme disgust.
Upon my honour, and soul, and conscience, by
Julius Csar, said he, I would as lief go to battle
in a meal-bag, tied up to the chin. It's all small
game, this sea businessa fight between two dirty
little shipsa dog and a pig squabbling in a gutter;
twelve killed and twenty wounded, and a
hellaballoo
in the newspapers. Give me, he cried, with
enthusiam, a fight where there's a thousand killed
of a side, or it may be, twenty thousand, with
scratches in proportion; five or six hundred field pieces
blazing away, slambang, all togetherfifty thousand
muskets peppering all at once, bayonets shining,
horses charging, trumpets clanging, drums rattling
rub-a-dub-a-dubwith generals, and
field-marshals
,
and cocked hats and feathers, and all that, my
fellow! by Julius Csar, that's the thing for me!
But your nasty shipsall tar and bilgewater, brine,
slush, stale junk, and mouldy biscuitrolling about
sick as a dog, no soul in younothing but firing
off cannon and making wood flynobody killed
worth talking abouta small business'pon my
honour, and soul, and conscienceby Julius Csar,
a small business!
But remember, Dicky, said I, somewhat
moved
at this contemptuous picture of my destined
profession
remember
the prize-money.
Curse the prize-money, said Dicky Dare,
with the lofty spirit of a soldier; I go for the
glory!However, he added, relapsing into
sentiments
not so high-flown, there's the booty that a
soldier has, to put against your prize-money; and
there's sometimes grand picking after a battle,
especially
in an enemy's country. Think of a city taken
by storm, by Julius Csar!the shops, and banks
with vaults full of money!the rich houses, and
stables full of elegant horses!the churches with
golden candlesticks and all sort of things! the heaps
of plate, the rings, and the jewels! Ah, by Julius
Csar, it's no such small matter, that booty, after
all. However, I don't stick for that: the honour's
the thing, the fame and the greatness, my fellow;
and
that's
enough for a soldier.
With this, the gallant general, after indulging in
another tirade against the meanness and
insignificance
of existence at sea, particularly in a privateer,
which he held to be no better than life in an
oyster-boat
,
proposed I should give up the design, and
unite my fortunes with his; that is, turn soldier;
for which, having a good horse, and some of the
sinews of war in my pocket, he held me admirably
well qualified. It was his intention to proceed
without delay to the theatre of war on the
Chesapeake
,
which was the nearest field of distinction;
and there, he doubted not, we should play the very
mischief with the enemy, and cover ourselves with
immortal renown.
The idea was not disagreeable to my inclinations.
The voyage in the privateer I had not yet had time
to reflect upon, nor to ask myself what appetite I,
whom my early adventures had imbued with an
inveterate horror of salt water, might have for it.
The conversation of Dicky recalled me to a
memory
of my disgust, and I felt a stirring desire to
unite with him in his noble enterprise; whereby I
should both avoid the terrors of the sea, and secure
to myself the company and countenance of Dicky,
whom I recognised as a superior genius, and ardently
longed to have as a companion.
But as I could not prevail upon myself to attempt
an adventure so important, without the consent of
my patron, who had assigned me to another career,
and to whose will I was now desirous to yield
implicit
submission, as some amends for my past
misconduct
,
I proposed deferring my answer until we
got to Philadelphia; whence I promised to write to
Dr. Howard, and request his permission to seek my
fortune on dry land.
To this proposition the general very readily
agreed, declaring that a day or two could make no
difference, that he had heard there was great fun in
the big cities, and that the theatres were the finest
places in the world; and besides, he added, having
discovered I had made the highly unmilitary
blunder
of setting out without any arms, while he, on
the contrary, was armed to the teeth, we should
want a day or two to fit me out with the proper
weapons and other munitions of war; among which,
in the warmth of his fancy, he seemed disposed to
consider as highly proper, though he would not
pretend to say they were indispensably necessary,
a brace of generals' uniforms, with chapeau and
feather
,
and epaulettes, complete. But as these articles,
he admitted, were expensive, it was proper to
consider
how we stood provided with the needful.
Accordingly, he demanded how much money the
old codger, as he irreverently termed my
benefactor
,
had given me. I replied, I did not know:
the doctor had given me a pocket-book, which I
had in my pocket; but I had not had time to
examine
it, and I knew not what were its contents.
As for me, said Dicky, with an important
tone, I never go into a campaign, without
knowing
what is in the military chest; and, by Julius
Csar, when dad gave me his purse, I took good
care to count all the money in it; and, by Julius
Csar, (speaking as if he expected me to be
astounded,) there's fifty dollars in it!
But this was a fortune to Dicky; who, from the
poverty of his father, had always been kept bare of
money, and never expected, perhaps, to handle such
a sum in his life. But mean as the sum appeared to
me, who, besides having been always lavishly
supplied
,
had been accustomed to hear my patron speak
of his thousands and tens of thousands (for he was
a very rich man,) I was astonished, as Dicky
anticipated
;
though, as it happened, not so much at the
vastness of his treasure, as at a danger which
suddenly
invaded it.
We had, by this time, left our homes some fifteen
or twenty miles behind us, and had just descended
one of the many vile hills by which our speed was
retarded, coming to a wild place very dark with
woods, and very dismal, where the road seemed to
fork; and we were about to halt, to debate upon our
route; when, all of a sudden, a man leaped from
among the bushes, and seizing both our horses by
the bridles, exclaimedDn my eyes! if you r'e
so flush in the locker, I
a'n't
.Your money, or
your blood!A demand, whose abruptness threw
me into such mortal terror, that I thrust my hand
into my pocket, intending to give him all I had,
and beg for mercy besides. General Dare received
the application in quite another way. My blood,
then, by Julius Csar! cried the valiant youth,
who pulled out a pistol, and fired it without
ceremony
in the highwayman's face, bawling, at the
same time, Surrender you dog, or die!
The shot did instant execution, first, upon the
robber, who fell to the earth, with a curse and a
groan, and then upon our horses, neither of which
displayed the courage to be expected of chargers
bound to the battle-field, but, on the contrary, fell to
plunging and prancing like incarnate fiends; and
then, each choosing a different fork of the road,
betook them to all their speed, whether we would
or not, leaving the wounded highwayman to his
fate.
To this inglorious flight, I, obeying my own
instincts
,
which were pretty much like those of the
animal's, should not, I believe, have opposed any
particular objections, had it not been for the
separation
from General Dare; but of this I was for a time
unconscious, the frenzy of Bay Tom, who, besides
running as hard as he could, made sundry desperate
attempts to get rid of his rider, giving me no leisure
to think of any thing but the preservation of my
own neck. Nor did I recover my composure until
the animal, having continued his flight for about half
a mile, suddenly came to a stop among a crew of
wagoners; who, with their wagons, were encamped for
the night in front of a little tavern on the wayside,
greatly patronised by worthies of that class; and
finished
the adventure by flinging up his heels, in a fury, I
suppose, of delight at his happy escape; whereby I
was very suddenly transferred from his back to that
of a wagoner, who had got up to stir the fire, and
was now prostrated by the vigour of the salutation.
The man, at first frightened, and then enraged,
awoke his companions by his exclamations; and they
came tumbling out of their carriages, threatening
dire things against the invader of their rest; but when
I had informed them of the cause of the accident, and
the attack of the highwayman, they abated their rage,
or rather directed it to the robber, whom they
immediately
swore they would take, dead or alive.
Each seized upon a horse, and the man whom I had
prostrated, jumped, without any ceremony, upon
Bay Tom; thus putting it out of my power to
accompany
them; as perhaps I should have willingly
done, to seek for my friend Dicky; and away they
galloped to the field of battle.
Vol. I.10
CHAPTER XIV.
A still more extraordinary adventure, in which Robin Day falls
among Philistines, and is convicted of highway robbery; and
how he escapes the dangers thereof.
In
the meanwhile, the tavern keeper had got up,
and opened his doors, and I was glad to shelter me
in his bar-room, where was a cheerful fire. He plied
me with questions about the robbery, which I
satisfied
as well as I could, and then about myself,
making little ceremony in asking who I was, whence
I had come, whither I was going, why I travelled
at night, &c.; questions which I could not answer
without some appearance of confusion and
equivocation
,
(for I feared lest he should discover I was a
fugitive from justice,) which gave him an
unfavourable
opinion of me, and excited suspicions not
altogether
advantageous to my character.
Fortunately for me, his interrogatories were soon
put an end to by the return of the wagoners, who
had found the robber lying senseless on the road,
dragged him with no great tenderness between them
to the tavern, and now haled him into the bar-room,
where he displayed a figure that inspired me with
dread.
He was a stout, sinewy, middle-aged man, dressed
like a sailor, with a tarpaulin knapsack on his back,
a new blue cloth jacket, and old canvass trowsers
exceedingly well daubed with pitch, and no hat or
cap, that covering having been lost in the scuffle.
He had a most savage countenance, covered with
whiskers, beard, and hair, all black and grizzled,
with a swarthy skin that was now, owing to
faintness
and loss of blood, of a cadaverous leaden colour;
and there were drops of blood on his forehead,
coming from some wound on the head, and a more
plentiful besprinkling on his shirt, that added to the
grimness and ferocity of his appearance.
The roughness with which he had been dragged
from the road, had stirred up the latent powers of
life; and he was beginning to rouse from his
insensibility
,
as the wagoners brought him into the room,
vociferating a thousand triumphant encomiums upon
their own courage, and as many felicitations upon
the prospect they thought they had, both of being
rewarded by the Governor of the State for
apprehending
such a desperate villain, and of seeing him
hanged into the bargain. Being in such a happy
mood, they agreed with great generosity to treat
their prisoner to a glass of grog, with a view of
enlivening his spirits and recalling his wits; and this
being accordingly presented, and immediately
swallowed
with great eagerness, had the good effect of
restoring him at once to his faculties. This he made
apparent by suddenly bending an eye of indignant
inquiry on his captors, who held him fast by the
collar, and by exclaiming, in corresponding tones,
Sink my timbers, shipmates! do you intend to
murder, as well as rob me?
This address, which filled them with surprise, the
wagoners answered by telling him, they were no
robbers, but
he
was, as he should find to his cost; a
charge that, to my amazement, the honest man,
instead
of admitting in full, repelled with furious
indignation
,
swearing that, instead of being a robber, he
had himself just been robbed by a brace of rascally
land-rats on the road under their nosesplundered
of a huge store of prize-money, the gains of a whole
year of fighting, which he was carrying to his wife
and children in Philadelphia, and knocked on the
head into the bargain; that he would have the blood
of the villains, whom he could swear to, and would
pursue to the ends of the earth; and if they, the
wagoners
,
were honest fellows, and loved a sailor that
had been fighting their battles on the stormy seas,
they would help him to catch the rascals, instead of
jawing him like a thief and a piratethey would,
split him.
This address, delivered with matchless effrontery,
and with an air of injured and insulted innocence
quite indescribable, had the effect of staggering
several of the captors, who evidently began to think
they had made a mistake; while others laughed it to
scorn; and one of them called me forward (for I had
kept, from modesty and fear, in the background,)
to confront the fellow; which I did, though with no
good heart, having a great dread of his ferocious
looks. But, however terrible the robber appeared
in my eyes, I, it seems, possessed an appearance
equally alarming in his; for no sooner had he caught
sight of me, than he roared out, That's one of the
land-sharks, sink me! and starting back, with the
air of one endeavouring to overcome a fit of
trepidation
,
called upon some of the company to give him
a pistol or cutlass, and upon the others to hold the
villain fast, for he could swear his life against me.
I was confounded at this sally; and as the sailor
had every appearance of being in earnest, and the
wagoners looked as if vastly inclined to believe his
story, I began to have my doubts whether I was not
a robber in reality. To complete my confusion, the
innkeeper now swore
he
had had his suspicions of
me from the first, and said I ought to be searched
for the sailor's money. A furious contention arose
among the wagoners, some insisting that I was, others
that I was not, the robber; the former arguing my
innocence from the fact of my coming of my own
accord into their camp; while the others, among
whom was the man upon whose back I had been
pitched, declared the visit was not voluntary, but
that I had been thrown among them by my horse,
entirely against my will, and had invented the story
of my having been robbed, only to prevent their
arresting me as the robber.
And during all this time, the real Simon Pure,
the highwayman himself, kept up a terrible din,
calling me a thief and pirate, demanding a weapon,
insisting that the wagoners should hold me fast; and,
in the midst of all his rage, discovering so much
disinclination to come within arm's length of me,
who was, on my part, ready to swoon with dismay,
that some of the company were scandalized at his
cowardice; which was the more remarkable in one
of his age and warlike profession, and assured him
the little boy, as they contemptuously termed me,
would not eat him.
Encouraged, or pretending to be encouraged, by
this assurance, (for the crafty knave was merely
playing a part,) he threw aside his fear, seized me
by the collar, and gave me a furious shaking,
overwhelming
me with denunciations and maledictions;
and the others of the company, moved by the same
imitative impulse, which, when one dog of a village
attacks a currish visitant, leads all the other dogs of
the town to set upon the stranger in like manner,
fell upon me likewise; so that I thought I should
have been shaken to death among them.
10*
It was in vain I remonstrated, and protested my
own innocence and the guilt of the sailor. The
latter worthy grew more furious and determined
every moment; and finding that I had a horse at the
door, he carried his audacity to the pitch of
claiming
him as his own, or rather as his captain's, which,
he said, he was carrying to Philadelphia for his
commander
;
swore I had knocked him off that very
beast's back, and then run off with him; and ended
by jumping upon Bay Tom's back, and riding
immediately
off, for the purpose, as he said, of hunting
up my accomplice, the other villain, who had made
off with his prize-money; in which undertaking he
invited the assistance of the wagoners, promising a
handsome reward to any who should help him to a
a sight of the pirate. This induced two or three of
them to mount their horses; and I had the
satisfaction
of seeing the scoundrel, whose unparalleled
impudence
had thus carried him through, gallop away
with my patron's horse, leaving me a prisoner in
his place.
I was nearly distracted by this turn of affairs; and
seeing no other way left to release myself from the
hands of the innkeeper and his customers, and
persuade
them to attempt the recovery of the horse
before it was too late, I made a merit of necessity,
and told them who I was, and the causes of my
adventurous journey.
This only made matters a hundred times worse
than before; for the wagoners, now discovering I
was a fugitive from justice, and trusting there might
be a reward offered for my apprehension, which
they had it in their power to secure, immediately
locked me up in a little room in the garret; whence
I could hear them through the chinks of the floor,
debating with one another whether they should
immediately
carry me back to the town I had left, or
detain me a prisoner, until made certain that a
reward
had been actually proclaimed for my delivery.
As neither of these alternatives possessed any
charms for me, but on the contrary filled me with
new desperation, I began to cast about for some
means of escape; and I had the good fortune to
discover
a window, through which I found no great
difficulty in creeping out upon the roof, and thence,
by means of a shed, and a willow-tree that grew
beside it, of dropping on the ground.
CHAPTER XV.
How Dicky Dare meets, and routs, two armies of wagoners,
while Robin Day plays the Babe in the Wood.
My
escape from the tavern and the wagoners thus
effected, I ran with all my speed to the nearest wood,
glad to be a freeman once more, though with the loss
of my horse and saddlebags, in which latter was all
my clothes; and the loss of it was the more
provoking
,
as I had snatched it from Bay Tom's back, when
the wagoner mounted him, and so saved it from the
robber only to leave it to the tender mercies of his
captors. But the loss was, after all, not so very
great; for the villains, notwithstanding their threats,
having abstained from searching my pockets, I was
still in possession of my pocket-book, and the letter
to Mr. Bloodmoney, as well as the string of beads,
which my patron had insisted I should put round
my neck.
I was, I am certain, more grieved at the loss of
my friend Dicky, whose disappearance I knew not
how to account for, than at any other deprivation: as
I had now greater need than ever of his countenance
and assistance. But as I knew not where to look
for him, and felt it needful to improve the time in
getting as far as possible from the dangerous vicinity
of the tavern, I did not pause to lament or consider;
but discovering the points of the compass by the
gray streaks of the dawn, which were beginning to
appear, I turned my face towards the southwest,
which I judged to be pretty nigh the direction of
Philadelphia, and set forward with all the vigour I
possessed, hoping to make my way, like a wild
Indian
,
through the woods.
And, here, I may as well inform the reader what
became of my friend Dicky; the history of whose
adventures I did not learn until many weeks
afterwards
.
He had had, like me, the misfortune to be
run away with by his horse; which, plunging into a
wood, managed to get rid of the General, after a
time, by brushing him off against a bough, and then
ended the race by plumping into a swamp, where he
stuck fast, and was presently found by Dicky; who,
after an hour of toil, succeeded in extricating him
from the mire. This done, Dicky rode back to the
battle-ground, and thence to the tavern; at which he
arrived only a few moments after I had left it, and,
indeed, just as my jailers had made discovery of my
flight; which had thrown them into a ferment of
rage and disappointment.
The appearance of Dicky, who, by the questions
he asked after me, they discovered to be my fellow
robber and accomplice in flight, and who would
therefore prove as valuable a capture as myself, was
the signal for an assault that they instantly made
upon him; but which the valiant Dicky, no wise
disconcerted
by their numbers, repelled with equal
resolution
and discretion. Snatching at his pistols,
which the practice of the night had already made
him familiar with, he let fly among the assailants,
shooting one of them right through the hat; who,
leaping back in mortal terror, overthrew a
companion
,
with whom he fell to the earth; and both
believing
themselves dead men, they yelled out in such a
horrible way that the others were struck with
consternation
,
and immediately put to flight. Of this
the youthful general, who was too much of a soldier
to pursue a success too far, took instant advantage by
riding off; though only, as it appeared, to encounter
a new danger. The wagoners who had pricked
away with the villanous sailor, in quest of my
fancied
accomplice, were by this time returning from
the expedition, after having been by some
unaccountable
accident separated from their leader, whom,
with Bay Tom, they were never destined to see
again; and they had arrived so nigh the little inn as
to hear the sounds of conflict, and even to see, though
indistinctly, (for the morning was yet but little
advanced
,)
the rout of their companions and the
retreat
of the victor; whom, not doubting him to be
the identical highwayman they had been seeking,
they now made preparations to intercept: taking up
such a position on the road as rendered a passage
through them desperately difficult, if not wholly
impracticable
.
But Dicky's soul was now up in arms;
his late victory had given double edge to his
courage
,
so that he eyed his opponents with disdain, and
resolved to cut his way through them, or die nobly
in the attempt. And for this undertaking there was
now the greater necessity, as he perceived the
assailants
he had just put to flight, had caught sight of
their comrades, and being encouraged by the
reinforcement
,
were making demonstrations of a design
to attack him on the rear.
He rode forward, therefore, preserving a good
countenance, and having come within striking
distance
,
discharged, without any hesitation, his
remaining
pistol as his foes: and then, drawing his hanger,
he charged upon them at full gallop, using his
weapon with such fury, slashing one over the back,
slicing the fingers of a second, and nearly poking
out the eyes of a third, that the wagoners, who had
been already somewhat disconcerted and disordered
by the pistol shot, were thrown into a panic, and
fled from before the terrors of his face; until a lucky
gap in a fence gave them an opportunity of darting
into the woods, and so escaping the terrible thwacks
which he dealt around him with relentless rigour.
The road being thus cleared, the young champion
pursued his way; and giving me up for lost, or
supposing
,
(as he afterwards told me,) that I was before
him on the road, he spurred onward with such
vigour as to reach Philadelphia before the close of
the day, the distance from our town being full sixty
miles.
As for me, I made no such speed in my journey,
which I was obliged to perform on foot. For though
I discovered, upon examining the pocket-book, that
my good patron had supplied me with abundant
means even to have bought another horse, had I
chosen, or to have travelled in any other way, I was
so terrified at the mishaps that had already befallen
me, and was in such fear of being apprehended a
second time, that I avoided the highway altogether;
and even resorted to lanes and by-ways only because
I found it impossible to make any progress in the
woods; where, besides being always bewildered, I
was in danger of perishing with famine. I made
one or two efforts to hire a horse of farmers in
lonely places, but found no success, none of them
liking my looks, or account of myself, which, I
doubt not, were both suspicious enough; and as
some of them betrayed an inclination, or so I
thought, to detain me upon speculation, in the hope
that they might make something by it, I found
myself
compelled to give over all attempts of that kind,
and trust to my own legs for safety. Nay, as I
perceived
there was a danger even in visiting their
houses for food or shelter, because they were all so
inquisitive, and so distrustful, when they perceived
my hesitation in answering their questions, I took
means to make such visitations unnecessary, by
buying, in a small village I passed through, a little
wallet or knapsack, which I crammed with food,
and such other necessaries as I could procure, and
slung upon my back. Thus provided, I trudged
along with greater independence, and in less fear,
and even had the hardihood to sleep one night in
the woods, though in horrible discomfort from the
cold, and a furious rain that fell that night.
From these causes, in happened that I travelled
very slowly; and it was not until the afternoon of the
third day that I arrived at the town of Camden on
the Delaware; and thence, in a ferry-boat, crossed
over to Philadelphia; whose huge size and endless
array of ship-masts and chimneys, stretched in a
waving line along the river, filled me with
astonishment
and alarm. I was landed by the ferryman at
the foot of High Street, which, as it was a
market-day
,
was full of people, and especially shad-women;
from one of whom, whose basket I had the
misfortune
to make my first step intobeing beside
myself
with wonder and confusionI received a
benediction
much more eloquent than elegant, and would
perhaps have had a box on the ear also, had I not
made a precipitate retreat out of her reach and the
region of the fish-market.
CHAPTER XVI.
Robin Day arrives at Philadelphia, and meets many adventures
therein, and some grievances, which he cures with a pinch of
snuff.
Having
got over my first amazement at the sight
of such a prodigious number of houses and people,
and emerged from a species of dejection which held
me for a moment at the thought of my insignificance
and almost nonentity among such a multitude of
men, I began to enjoy greater ease and contentment
of mind than I had known for several days. My
very insignificance, it appeared to me, was my best
protection; for sure, thought I, among so many
people, I shall be in little danger of my pursuers, the
constables and deputy-sheriffs, who might hunt for
me in such a city for weeks in vain.
With this encouraging reflection, my natural spirits
returned at length, to such a degree, that instead of
jumping into the gutter, to make room for every
body that passed, as I had modestly done at first, I
elbowed my way along like others, endeavouring to
assume, as far as I could, the air of ease, and the step of
busy haste, which seemed to characterize thecitizens.
In this I succeeded to my wish, and had just
begun
to conceit myself almost a citizen, and to fancy
that every body else so considered me, when my
equanimity received a blow from the wheelbarrow
Vol. I.11
of a black porter; who, coming up from behind,
whistling Yankee Doodle with a vigour that drowned
the creaking of his wheel, tumbled me into a lot of
pottery arranged along the pavement; whereby,
though I received no greater injury than a rent or
two in my coat, great damage was done among the
merchandise.
This accident, which might have moved the
concern
of any rational being, its cause, the negro, did
not seem in the least to regard, but went on his way,
whistling as before; which incensing me, I started
up, intending to chastise him for his impudent
assault
,
with a staff I had cut in the woods, and still
retained. But here I was doomed to a
disappointment
,
the dealer in washbowls and pattipans seizing
me by the collar, and declaring I should not leave
him until I had paid for the damage I had done,
which he estimated at two or three dollars, though
he afterwards abated his demand to one. I would
have remonstrated upon the injustice of making me
pay for a mischief evidently caused by the negro;
but my merchant only grew angry, and declared he
would carry me to the nearest justice; which was an
alternative so frightful to me, who had such terror
of, and such occasion to keep at a distance from, all
limbs of the law, that I consented to satisfy his
demand
,
and handed him a five-dollar bill accordingly.
But this being a New Jersey note, which, he affirmed,
was, like the bills of all New Jersey banks, at a
discount
,
he refused to receive it, unless I allowed him
an additional half-dollar by way of premium; and I
was about yielding to his demand, when a decent
looking man stepped forward, inveighed against the
roguery of the fellow for endeavouring, as he said,
to take advantage of my youth and ignorance, swore
that New Jersey bank-bills were never at a discount,
but always at par, and ended by giving the fellow a
dollar bill of some Philadelphia bank, and handing
me four others as change; which being done, he
clapped my Jersey note into his own pocket, and
walked off to escape the thanks, with which I,
charmed with his politeness and liberality, was
disposed
to overwhelm him.
This occurrence gave me a high idea of the
generosity
and kindness of Philadelphians to strangers;
which was only abated by my discovering, as I did
about five minutes afterwards, that the four bills
given me by the good-natured stranger were
counterfeit
,
and my liberal gentleman a rascally swindler,
who had rescued my youth and ignorance from the
jaws of the pottery merchant, only to enjoy a huger
bite of them himself.
Having accomplished this adventure, I proceeded
onward, intending to hunt my way to some
respectable
hotel, without asking assistance of any one to
direct me; a measure that I thought was needless,
and which I had, besides, the greater aversion to, as
it would be to acknowledge myself a stranger; and
I considered that the fewer who knew
that
, the
less would be my danger of discovery.
I had not well got over the anger I had been
thrown into by the assault of the porter, when it
was my fate to encounter another blackamoor, a
strapping tatterdemalion, who had upon his shoulder
an axe and beetle, with a brace of iron wedges
suspended
by a string, which he clinked together as he
went, crying at intervals, Wood! wood! split
wood! with a very nasal twang, and a melodious
snap quite inimitable. This vagabond, who seemed
as deeply engaged in the enjoyment of his music as
the porter had been, I very naturally expected
would get out of the way, as he passed me; instead
of doing which, he stalked against me, as if entirely
ignorant of my presence, or quite indifferent to it;
and I was, in a twinkling, laid upon my back by his
maul, which struck me on the head, while his two
wedges, at the same time, beat such a tattoo on my
breast, that I thought, during the instant of contact,
they would have drummed my heart out. I leaped
up, greatly exasperated, and snatched at my stick to
beat the villain; who, perceiving my design, which
was made the more manifest by some abusive
epithet
I let fly at him, paused a moment, and regarding
me with extreme astonishment and contempt,
exclaimed
Guy!
guess the younker's a fool! Git
out of
my
way, will you? And with these words,
and the addition of his usual twanging note, Wood!
wood! split wood! he passed on, leaving me
covered
with rage and mortification; which were the
greater for my not having dared to beat him; for,
in truth, while he spoke, he laid hold of his beetle
as if resolved to requite any attack I should
presume
to attempt, by making a wedge of me, and
driving me through the pavement.
In two minutes more, I encountered a similar
accident
;
a third negro running against me with a
violence that pitched me into a cellar; where was a
cooper making cedar barrels or churns, one of which
I had the satisfaction to demolish, just as he had
completed his task of putting its different parts
together
.
And here again I expected to be met with
a claim for damages; but my cooper was a
good-natured
fellow; and having eyed me a moment with
surprise, while I was dragging my leg from amid
the ruins of his work, he said, as if giving me
friendly counselYou've kicked the barrel to pieces
this time, my fine fellow; take care, the next, you
don't kick the bucket. Which piece of witfor
a piece of wit, I believe, he considered ithaving
passed his lips, he burst into a haw-haw of
approbation
at his own smartness; and I cursing him in my
heart for his insensibility to my pangsfor I had
broken my shin by the accidentand mad with
vexation and a vengeful desire to punish the author
of my misfortunes, clambered up to the street again,
but only to find the victorious rascal had vanished
away.
These three several assaults led me to further
observation
of the deportment of the coloured gentlemen
of Philadelphia; and I was soon convinced that they
were, next to the pigs, the true aristocracy of the
town, or, at least, of the streets thereof. I perceived
that all passers-by of white complexion and genteel
appearance, of all ages and both sexes, gave the way to
their sable brethren, stepping reverentially aside, to
let them pass; and that, if they did not, the chance
was that the sable brethren would revenge the slight
by jostling them into the gutter or any open
packing-box
that lay convenient. I observed also, that there
was nothing to be gained by the sufferer
remonstrating
,
in such cases; except a deal of insolent and
abusive
language, which the lords of the
trottoir
had
always ready at command, by way of convincing the
complainant that they were as good as himself, if not
a great deal better. The insolence of the black
republicans
was to me astonishing, though not more so
than the general submissiveness with which I found
it endured. I saw one fellow, a porter with a
wheelbarrow
,
execute, upon a well dressed lady, the same
feat that his comrade had lately performed upon me;
that is, he knocked her down with his carriage,
though not upon a pile of pottery; and the only
apology
the villain made was a great horse-laugh, and
a giggling cry of, Couldn't help it, Missus, 'pon
11*
wudder honor! Nor did I find a single one of
the many persons who witnessed the aggression, and
helped the lady to her feet, who was disposed to
resent
it, further than by declaring, the coloured
people
were growing too insolent;except, indeed,
myself; who being, by this time, boiling over with
indignation, saluted the grinning baboon with a
thwack of my staff over the shins, which had the
effect of surprising him into a very singular leap or
dodge, that carried him head-foremost into his own
barrow; the back of which giving way under the
blow, he went shooting over the wheel, like a ship, at
a launch, rushing down her rollers into the dock,
ploughing his way with his nose over the bricks, in
a manner that was astonishing to behold. For this
salutation, it is highly probable, I should have
received
in return a furious drubbing from the incensed
gentleman, had not a shopkeeper who stood at his
door, surveying the spectacle, advised me to retreat
before the negro had recovered his feet; assuring me
that he (the blacky) would have me immediately
taken up and carried before a magistrate; by whom
I would be heavily fined for the liberty I had taken.
The name of magistrate was sufficient to put me
on my best behaviour; and I left the place,
accordingly
,
without delay. But I was still so much
enraged
at the insolence of these black gentry, having
never before been accustomed to see any that were
not very polite and humble in their carriage, that I
could not resist an impulse, which now seized me,
to provide in advance a suitable punishmentthat is,
of a character that should not endanger myselffor
the next one I should happen to meet. Perceiving
a tobacconist's shop at my elbow, I entered it, and
bought some Scotch snuff, and a box to hold it; and
it was here that I made the discovery of my four
bank-notes being counterfeit, the tobacconist refusing
to receive them, and even showing some inclination
to detain me and send for an officer to inquire how
I had got them; until I appeased his distrust by
producing
one of my Jersey bills, and relating how I
had been imposed upon. This man I found to be
as facetious as the cooper. Upon my
demanding
if he had any very strong snuff, he replied,
with a grinhe had some so strong the box
wouldn't hold it; and when I told him of my
mishap
with the pottery, he declared that that was
only a way of taking pot-luck uninvited. He
consoled
me for the imposition practised upon me with
the four notes, by saying that, whatever we might
think of them, they were undoubtedly counterfeit
which he supposed, in plain English, meant fit for
the counter. In short, this happy personage
astounded
me by a multitude of quibbles, which he
produced as a hen does her eggs, with a furious
cackle after each; and then dismissed me with my
box of snuff, which, its violence setting me sneezing
as I left the door, he declared was, nevertheless,
not to be sneezed at.
I had not walked twenty steps, before I beheld a
black fellow approaching, dressed like a dandy,
though of the shabby genteel order, his hat cocked
smartly on the side of his head, a rattan in his hand,
with which he thwacked his boots at every second
step, with a swaggering gait, and a look that said as
plainly as if labelled in show-bill letters on his nose,
which was the broadest part of his countenance,
Get out of my way, white man!an injunction
very dutifully observed by every well dressed white
man who met him.
As for me, who was not at all disposed to yield
him such indulgence, but was, on the contrary, eager
for the encounter, I loosened the cover of my
snuff-box
,
as if to regale me with a pinch; and,
pretending
to look over my shoulder, as if ignorant of his
approach, continued to advance in the middle of the
walk, until the gentleman, scandalized at my
presumption
,
and resolved to punish it, suddenly came
in contact with me in such a way, and with such
violence, as must have prostrated me, had I not
prepared
myself for the assault. I took advantage of
the concussion to tap the bottom of my snuff-box,
from which the contents immediately flew into the
rascal's face, filling eyes, nose, mouth, and lungs;
from which last there presently issued a most terrific
yell of surprise and anguish, that was followed by a
volley of shrieks and execrations without number,
the fellow dancing about, in the agony of pain and
blindness, in a manner highly consolatory to my
insulted
feelings. I crowned my triumph by
exclaiming
,
as if with indignation and rage at my loss,
Hang you, you rascal, you've spilled my snuff!
With which reproach, that served the purpose of
both explanation, and apology for the accident, to the
persons who came crowding round the negro, I
immediately
took my departure, turning into another
street, and walking away with all the unconcern
imaginable.
CHAPTER XVII.
A short chapter, showing the inconveniences of visiting the high
places of hospitality in a tattered coat, with a pack on the top
of it.
The
sense of gratified revenge, added to that of
security from my foes, had a favourable effect on my
spirits and deportment, which latter was now as stiff
as might be expected of a schoolboy entering upon
the world with a high opinion of his own merits and
importance; and seeing a great hotel, that had the
appearance of being one of the best in the city, and
was therefore just the thing to suit me, I stepped
boldly in, and going to the bar, demanded of a
dapper
personage who stood therein and rested for a
moment from his labour of compounding slings and
hailstones, by throwing his elbows on the bar, and
his chin into his hands, in which position he very
lazily and complacently regarded the groups of
customers
scattered about the roomif I could have
lodgings. The gentleman raised his eyes, without
disturbing the economy of his attitude, and surveyed
me with a look of placid inexpressiveness, but made
no reply; seeing which, and supposing he had not
heard me, I repeated the question. Upon this, he
roused himself so far as to disengage his right thumb
from his cheek, and point with it to the door, eyeing
me still with a look that seemed to express little or
nothing, but which I, at last, understood to convey
an intimation that I might go the way I had come.
I was so enraged and mortified at this insulting
repulse, that my first impulse was to lay my staff
over the man's pate for his impertinence: but just
then, I observed a huge dog rear himself by his
forepaws behind the counter, and eye me in a way
that convinced me it would be dangerous to attempt
any liberties with his impertinent master. To
complete
my confusion, I perceived, as I turned to
depart
,
that every body was laughing at me, seeming
to be vastly diverted at the insolence of the
barkeeper
,
as well as my own unconcealed chagrin; a
degree of cruelty and boorishness, which,
notwithstanding
my shame, I had yet the courage to
reprehend
,
by begging their pardon for having intruded
upon them, because, as I said, I supposed the
house was a place of resort for gentlemen.
With this cut, which, in the innocency of my
heart, I supposed was prodigiously witty and severe,
but which only made my gentlemen laugh the louder,
I left the house, and hunted my way, though with
less confidence than before, to a second hotel, where
I met a similar rebuff: at least, the barkeeper told me,
with a sneer, they never harboured runaway
'prentices
;
and upon my retorting his impertinence,
called a servant to put me out of the house. A
third attempt resulted in equal mortification; and
having made one or two more efforts, in vain, I
began fairly to weep with vexation and shame; for I
perceived that every body regarded me with
contempt
,
as being entirely unfit to be received into
decent lodgings, among genteel and respectable
persons
.
This, I began to suspect, was all owing to
the appearance of my clothes, which my travels
through the woods had by no means beautified; and
still more to the knapsack I carried, the effect of
which, as I could well believe, was to give me more
the air of a pedler than a gentleman.
This consideration, and the mortifications I had
already endured, besides reducing me in my own
opinion, and making me feel very forlorn, caused me
to debate whether I should not go to a tailor's shop,
and transform myself immediately into a
gentleman
;
or inquire out the residence of Mr.
Bloodmoney
,
and betake myself immediately to him for
advice and countenance. The latter alternative
appearing
to me most advantageous, I summoned
courage enough to enter a little tavern, or
chop-house
,
to make inquiry; and finding myself
courteously received by a very greasy, bluff and
mean-looking personage, who appeared the master
of the house, and met me with a courteous demand
what I would have.Tripe, chop, steak or soused
sturgeon?and my appetite being pretty eager, I
was glad to preface my questions with a dinner such
as the man had to give me.
This accomplished, I asked after Mr. Bloodmoney,
and received such directions as, I had no doubt,
would enable me to find his house without further
assistance; and as I had now (not knowing how
better to provide myself) resolved to lodge in the
steak-house, where the greasy man assured me I could
have a very decent bed, provided Mr. Bloodmoney
should not direct me otherwise, I left my knapsack
in the man's charge, and set out to report myself to
that gentleman; who, mine host gave me to
understand
,
in a malicious way, was a great bug, that
is, a great personage, rolling in wealth; which, for
his part, he did not envy, because he was an honest
man, who made his money honestly by the sweat of
his brow, (he should have said the grease,) and not
by grinding the face of the poor, and sending out
ships in the slave-trade, and getting into banks and
using the people's money, and all that sort of thing.
In short, my landlord was one of those honest
personages
who console themselves for their poverty
by abusing their richer neighbours; which I could
see well enough: nevertheless, I thought his account
of Mr. Bloodmoney might be true, as it is not
always necessary that a rich and great personage
should be a man of honour and virtue.
CHAPTER XVIII.
Robin goes in quest of Mr. Bloodmoney; and how he fares in the
hands of that gentleman.
It
was already evening when I set out; and Mr.
Bloodmoney's house being at a considerable distance,
it was dark before I reached the street in which he
resided, and endeavoured, in the light of the lamps,
to discover his dwelling.
While I was engaged in the search, which was
the more difficult because the houses were all built
after the same pattern, and none of them furnished
with door-platesfor, it seemed, the citizens
residing
in this quarter were too great and distinguished
to suppose any body in the world could require such
vulgar guides to their mansionsI had the
misfortune
to run against a man who was hurrying by; by
which accident both of us were staggered and well
nigh overthrown. The stranger, who, although a
stout and muscular personage, had received the
greater damage, ripped out a dreadful oath, and
demanded
what I meant by running against him, the
question being asked in such a ferocious style of
bullying
and profanity, that I stood aghast, and began,
as soon as I could gather the breath which had been
knocked out of my body, to stammer forth excuses
and apologies, assuring him, in my confusion, that I
had been so intently occupied looking for Mr.
Bloodmoney's
Vol. I.12
house, that I had forgotten every thing else,
and so failed to notice his approach; and upon his
demanding, which he did with some appearance of
surprise, and another oath, what I wanted with Mr.
Bloodmoney, I replied, with great frankness, (for I
thought, from his tone, he must be an acquaintance of
the gentleman, and might therefore direct me to his
house,) that I had a letter for him from his friend
and kinsman, Dr. Howard; and, indeed, I had it in
my hand at the moment, having taken it from my
pocket on arriving at the square.
My friend, Dr. Howard? cried the gentleman,
with another oath, though in tones somewhat more
amiable; and, as he spoke, he whisked the letter out
of my hand, and advanced to a lamp to read it,
assuring
me, to my amazement, that I had lighted
upon my man, Mr. Bloodmoney himself.
While I was wondering both at the oddness of
the encounter, and the singular conversation,
manners
,
and appearance of the gentleman, which did
not at all answer the opinions I had conceived of
him, he opened the letter, withdrew the inclosure,
consisting of several bank-notes, which, with a
hearty and approving malediction on his blood and
the lamplight, he transferred to his pocket, and
then made an effort to read the letter; but this was
rendered vain by the insufficiency of the light and
the impatience of the reader, who to every word he
succeeded in spelling out, added a running
commentary
of execrations on the crabbedness of the
chirography. Nevertheless, with the help of an
occasional hint from myself, he made out enough to
understand the nature of the application, of which
he expressed his approval by observing, that, when
one was too big a rascal for the land, the sea was
the only place for making him a gentleman; and
then asked whether I had been breaking a
strong-box
or slicing a weasand?
I replied, with some spiritbeing, indeed, affected
by the unsavoury nature of these innuendoesthat
I was no such contemptible villain as he seemed to
consider me, and knew nothing of broken
strong-boxes
or sliced weasands, but had had the misfortune
to kill a tyrannical schoolmaster, or at the least, to
beat him within an ace of his life; for which it was
thought . But here Mr. Bloodmoney burst
into a laugh, shook me by the hand, and swore I
was a fine fellow and should have a berth in the
Lovely Nancy, which, it appeared, was the name of
his privateer. This declaration he accompanied by
asking, how I stood furnished in the locker, or,
as he afterwards expressed it, what funds I had
for my outfit; and upon my intimating, that,
besides
the sum contained in the letter, my patron
would supply me further, according as he himself
should direct, he swore, with every appearance of
satisfaction, that hethat is, my patron, his friend
and kinsmanwas the right sort of an old hunks,
and invited me to follow him to a tavern, to discuss
the matter at leisure. I was surprised he did not take
me to his house, which was so near; but perceiving
from his conversation that he was an odd sort of
personage
,
I followed at his heels without demur, and was
led by him into a very mean by-street and a
mean-looking
house; which he, however, declared was a
snug and respectable place, fit enough for our
business
.
Here he ordered a room, with a supper, which,
being a very extemporary one of steaks and oysters,
entered the room nearly as soon as ourselves; and being
garnished with a flagon of ale and a bottle of wine,
was attacked by him with a zeal and energy that
struck me with as much surprise as I felt at his
personal
appearance, now revealed in the light of two
tallow candles for the first time. He was a
middle-sized
man, but very muscular, as I mentioned before,
dressed in clothes, which, though of good blue
broad-cloth, were none of the newest or handsomest,
and looked out of place upon him, who, I could not
help thinking, had the air of a sailor in
landsman's
toggery; for which opinion there was the
better
reason, as his conversation had throughout a
strong smack of the sea. His countenance was bold,
and alternately repulsive and prepossessing, being
now open and jocund, and now, if he but chanced to
purse his brows together, as black and glum as
Satan's. His skin was very dark, but I thought
there was something of a sickly hue about it, as if
he had but recently risen from a sick bed; though
it was clear enough, from the strength of his
appetite
,
that his disease was now entirely banished.
He was a man of forty-five or more, and his hair
which was very long and bushy, and had been a jet
black, was now becoming grizzled and frosty.
It struck me, as I surveyed the gentleman, that I
had seen him before, and so, in the innocence of my
heart, I told him; adding, that I supposed it must
have been in former years, at my patron's house.
Ay, ay, he mumbled out of a corner of his mouth,
which was too full of provender to admit an easy
replyremember you wella young,
porpoisefaced
baboon: always told your father you'd bring
up at the gallows.
Sir, said I, glad to escape the compliment,
the Doctor is not my father; and you must mean
his son Tommy, who was drowned five years ago.
To this all that Mr. Bloodmoney deigned to reply
wasWas he, d him? his further
expressions
of sympathy being cut short by a mouthful of
oysters.
Having finished his supper, and swallowed a
tumbler of wine, to fortify the ale which he had
previously
got rid of, he looked up and honoured me with a
stare, which was first severe, then wildor so
I thought it, for it seemed to express inquiry
mingled
with astonishmentand then became placid
and pleasant; and in this frame he continued looking
me in the face for a minute or more; and then,
bursting
into a sudden and furious fit of laughter,
exclaimed
,
as soon as the convulsion was over, And
so you were drowned five years ago, split me?
No, sir, said I, perceiving the gentleman had
been in a reverie, and was not yet well out of it;
it was my friend Tommy.
Oh, ay! what was I thinking of! cried he, with
another peal, which having indulged, he produced
and read aloud my patron's letter; in which Mr.
Bloodmoney was entreated to send me to sea as
soon as possible, and to draw upon him for any sum
necessary for my outfit, the amount inclosed (which,
I believe, was a hundred dollars,) being all that the
hurry of the occasion enabled him to despatch with
me. Talks like a ship's pig! grumbled the
gentleman
,
by way of comment; ought to have sent
five hundred or a thousand; and might, just as easy
as not. Here, you, shipmate, he added, addressing
me, you Timothy Howell, or what's your name
My name, said I, is Robin Day.
Very wellyou Robin Day: write home to my
cousin HowellWhat's his name? Howard, split
me! I could never bear it in mind two glasses at a
time, because how, HowellWhat's his name? Howard, split
me! I could never bear it in mind two glasses at a
time, because how, Howell comes more natural:
write home, curse me, and tell him to send you all
the money he can raise, d'ye see, from five hundred
upthe more the better.
12*
Sure, said I, I thought it would not take so
much to fit me out!
To fit out a cook's mate, or a powder-monkey,
said Mr. Bloodmoney, with an air of disdain, or,
mayhap, a runt of a midshipman, with a head all
ratlicked
.
Hark you, my skilligallee, you've sunk a
schoolmaster: it's a sign of blood, and I like you;
for I did the same thing in my young days, only
that I blew the dog up with gunpowder, and left
him as blind as a barnacle for life. Get the money,
split me, and I'll make a man of you, and bring
you home with a swab on your shoulder, and a
whole ship-load of prize money. 'Pon my soul
and conscience, split me, I'll make you a lieutenant,
and take you into the cabin with me.
I was surprised to hear him talk thus, and told him
I had no idea he ever commanded any of his vessels
himself. Brought up to it, said the gentleman,
who seemed to be a little flustered with the wine,
which had vanished as fast as the ale; began a boy
before the mast, and learned to smell fire with them
that knew how to teach meI did, split me. I
won't say nothing; but I say, my lark, you've heard
of Captain Hellcat? I was obliged to inform him,
I had not; at which he seemed both surprised and
offended, assuring me that Captain Hellcat was the
greatest man that ever boarded an enemy, and I
nothing more than a green gosling that knew not so
much as whether my nose pointed north or south
of a Sunday: in fact, upon reflection, I found that I
had
heard of some such worthy, as I now confessed,
but said I believed he was a pirate. This Mr.
Bloodmoney very readily admitted, but swore he
was an honest fellow for all, and a brave one; and
seemed to intimate, as far as I could understand his
language, which was frequently too nautical for my
comprehension, that he had acquired a portion of
his naval art under that honest commander, could
navigate and fight a ship as well as any body, and
would go to sea, if he felt in the humour, he would,
split him.
With that, he ate an ounce or two of cabbage, as
he said, to lay the liquor: asked me where I put up,
and being told, commended my prudence in
avoiding
the public hotels; bade me write for more
money
,
and keep myself in quiet, till I received it;
assured me I should hear from him; and ended by
knocking for a waiter, asking what was the
reckoning
,
and bidding me pay it; which having directed,
and, truly, it was directed with all coolness and
equanimity
,
he walked out of the room and the house,
leaving me astounded at the oddness of his
character
.
I paid the bill, as directed; though I did not think
Mr. Bloodmoney showed either hospitality or good
breeding in making me do so, and still less in not
having once invited me to his house, nor even
offered
me protection from the inveteracy of my
pursuers.
On the whole, I was greatly disappointed in the
gentleman, and felt so little inclination to take a
voyage with him, or with any captain in his employ,
that I was now resolved, provided I might by any
happy chance light upon Dicky Dare, to unite my
fortunes with his, turn soldier with him, and trust
to the eloquence of the representation I should make,
to obtain forgiveness of my patron.
While pondering thus, returning to my lodgings,
on Dicky Dare, and debating what steps I could
most safely take to discover him, provided he had,
like me, escaped the wagoners, I found myself in
front of a theatre; and remembering that Dicky had
expressed on the road a great desire to rest in
Philadelphia
for a few days, were it only for the sake
of visiting these temples of Thespis, I bought me
a ticket and entered, in the hope that I might light
upon my lost friend within. I had, I must confess,
some fear lest I should stumble upon a less desirable
acquaintance, perhaps a New Jersey constable, with
a warrant for my apprehension in his hand; but the
wine I had swallowed gave me courage, and I was
too anxious to find my comrade, not to be willing
to encounter a little risk. My fears, however,
returned
when I found myself in the house, exposed
to a blaze of lamps, and to the eyes of a countless
number of gaily dressed people, all of whom I
thought were looking at me; in consequence of
which, I retreated for safety to the darkest corner
of the remotest box, where I lay perdu during the
whole of the representation, of which I heard but
little and saw less; for, in fact, I had no sooner
recovered
from my fears, than I fell sound asleep,
being very weary and heavy, and so remained to
the end of the afterpiece; when I was waked by the
noise of the audience getting up and leaving the
house. I departed with them, and was surprised,
while making my way to my lodgings, to hear the
clocks striking midnight.
CHAPTER XIX.
Robin Day is turned out of his lodgings, and hospitably invited to
the house of a friend.
I made
my way without any difficulty to the
chop-house, which, I had been in fear, from the
lateness
of the hour, I should find closed. I found it,
however, open and filled with guests, who were, in
general, of such a mean, and some of them of so
raggamuffinly an appearance, and were, besides,
drinking
and carousing in so noisy and riotous a manner,
that I was filled with disgust, and repented that I
had not searched out a better lodging.
Nor was my uneasiness abated, when I ascended
to the chamber where I was to sleep, and found it
full of beds, in some of which lodgers were already
soundly snoring, men, to all appearance, of a class no
better than the roisterers below. I liked not the
idea of sleeping in such company; and even feared
I might among them be robbed before morning.
Upon examining my wallet, however, I found my
apprehensions were, in this particular, entirely
superfluous
,
and for the best reason in the world
namely, that I was robbed already; the wallet, which
was without lock and key, and only secured by straps
and buttons, having been opened in my absence, and
plundered of the few little articles of dress it had
contained.
Confounded and enraged at this discovery, I
proceeded
to the bar-room, where I preferred a
complaint
to mine host, exhibiting the empty pack as
evidence of the truth of the charge; and mine host
was instantly in as great a passion as myself. The
only difficulty was, that, instead of being in a rage
with
, he was in a passion
at
me, swearing, with
great volubility, that the charge was a slander upon
his house, and him,not to speak of his lodgers and
guests, who were as honest people as any in the
world; and his gueststhat is, such of them as were
drinking in the bar-roomtaking part against me,
there was presently a furious quarrel begun, some
accusing me of robbing myself, others of robbing
the sleepers up stairs, while a third class went the
length of insisting that I had robbed the landlord, if
not even themselves; and all agreed that I ought
either to be taken in hand by themselves and flogged
on the spot, or given over to the watch; both which
penalties, I believe in my conscience, would have
been enforced against me, had not one vagabond,
who was wiser and more humane than the rest,
proposed
a new punishment, which was that I should
treat the company to a gallon of gin, and then he
turned out of the house. And this penalty was
straightway put into execution, the company being
treated to a glass all round at my expense, (for I found
I should be maltreated, if I refused to pay,) and
myself
,
the moment the libation was made and
accounted
for, turned neck and heels out of doors.
I was in a frenzy of rage at this vile and
ignominious
usage, and felt, for a moment, inclined to call
the watch, and give the whole company into charge
of the authorities; but a moment's reflection satisfied
me that my hard fate did not permit me to indulge
in the sweets of revenge; since the probability was,
that, whatever might be the fate of my oppressors,
when brought before the Mayor, I should myself
remain a victim in his hands. I was constrained,
therefore, to rest satisfied with such smaller revenge
as I had it in my power to enjoy; and this I effected
by launching a brickbat through the window of the
bar-room into the midst of the revellers; and,
judging
by the direful tumult that immediately ensued,
I must have done considerable execution among
them; though this I did not wait to ascertain; but,
on the contrary, took to my heels and ran, until
persuaded
I was no longer in danger of pursuit.
And now I began to be in despair, not knowing
whither to direct my steps, or where to seek for
shelter in all this great and inhospitable city; when,
by and by, my thoughts happily reverted to the
little tavern where I had supped with Mr.
Bloodmoney
,
and which, although of an appearance not a
whit better than the chop-house, was yet, as Mr.
Bloodmoney had said, a very decent sort of place,
where I might, perhaps, procure a bed, provided its
doors were still open.
Thither, accordingly, I resolved to make my way;
and I proceeded with greater speed, as I perceived
that foul weather was brewing, with every
appearance
of a furious storm. Indeed, it had been cloudy
all the evening, and a gale of wind was already
blowing, though as yet without rain; but before I
had gone much more than half the distance, it began
to fall in showers, that grew every moment heavier
and more frequent, so that I was by and by soaked
to the skin.
To add to my distress, I became aware, after a
time, that, what with the darkness and my hurry, I
had missed my way, and knew not how to regain
it, unless by betaking myself to a watchman; which
I was loath to do, as I thought the chances were that
he would take me up as a vagrant, and introduce me
to lodgings I should like still less than those in the
chop-house. As for asking assistance of other
persons
in the street, which I was well enough disposed
to do, there was the great difficulty that no such
persons
were to be found, it being now after one
o'clock, and the streets as solitary as the walks of a
graveyard, in which I was the only ghost that
roamed. The winds blew, the lightnings gleamed,
the rains fell, the spouts rattled, the gutters gurgled,
the shutters clattered; but I had it all to myself, and
bade fair to have it so all night, being monarch of
all I surveyed, the storm and the city, without,
however, being the master of so much as a straw
bed.
In this exigency, whilst I was now bewailing and
now cursing my fate, which I began to consider the
hardest in the world, now tumbling over a
curbstone
,
and now plumping into a gutter, and all the
while shivering with cold and despair; it was my
hap to discover, when I least expected it, a man
who seemed to be a wayfarer like myself, and no
watchman: and, in truth, I had seen but little of the
guardians of the night since the storm began.
As the individual was at a distance, and only
revealed
to me by a flash of lightning, I was obliged
to run forward to overtake him, which I soon did;
and then asked him, with a voice all chattering with
cold, if he could direct me where Mr. Bloodmoney
livednot that I wished to find Mr. Bloodmoney's
house in particular; but I knew, when once in the
street where it stood, I could make my own way to
the little tavern. To this question the gentleman
answered by discharging a terrible oath, that was
directed especially against his eyes and blood, and
asking, ejaculatorily, whether the devils were all
broke loose? and what I wanted with Mr.
Bloodmoney
?
I thought I knew the voice; and, indeed, a sheet
of lightning now bursting over the sky, and
revealing
his features, I saw to my surprise, that I had
fallen a second time upon Mr. Bloodmoney himself.
He seemed, on his part, quite as much surprised,
and demanded, with another choice execration,
what I was doing in the street, swimming about
like a lost tadpole?
I replied, that I had been turned out of my
lodgings; at which he was prodigiously diverted;
but he laughed still more, when I told him how my
knapsack had been rifled; though he expressed some
indignation at
that
, and swore that robbery was
becoming intolerably frequent, and that strangers in
a city were plundered and imposed upon by every
bodyespecially young ones.
I then told him how I had lost my way in
attempting to find the little tavern; in which if I
could not procure admission, I must walk the streets
in the rain all night, as I knew not how else to help
myself.
This I uttered in a very dolorous tone; but its
only effect was to increase the mirth of Mr.
Bloodmoney
,
who told me I was a pig in a strange
latitude
;
with other expressions which, from their
abounding with salt-water technicalities, I did not
exactly understand. He concluded, however, by
declaring, in a sudden fit of hospitality, at which I
was both surprised and pleased, that, as he saw I
was no more capable of taking care of myself than
an unshelled oyster, he would carry me to his own
house, and see what he could do for me; and this
resolution he immediately proceeded to put into
Vol. I.13
execution, by bidding me follow him, and leading
the way to the square in which he lived. This, as
it proved, was at no great distance; and I had soon
the satisfaction of finding myself at the corner of the
street, where was a watchman's box that I had
noticed before. As we passed it by, I perceived
the wind had blown the door open, and exposed the
watchman sitting sound asleep; which being noticed
by Mr. Bloodmoney, he closed the door, to keep the
rain, as he said, with a smothered laugh, from
blowing in the poor fellow's face; though he
immediately
after swore, it was a rascally thing for the
man to be thus snoozing away the night, who was so
well paid for guarding the property of the citizens;
adding that such negligence encouraged, and even
invited, burglary, and that he should not be
surprised
if some of the neighbours had their houses
robbed that very night.
CHAPTER XX.
He finds himself in Mr. Bloodmoney's house, who makes great
preparations to entertain him.
As
we walked towards the house, which was now
nigh at hand, Mr. Bloodmoney gave me to
understand
there was sickness in his family, his wife being
ill with a nervous fever, or some such cursed
out-of-sortishness
,
as he called it; which he mentioned,
he said, not merely as a caution against making any
noise after we should have entered, but as an excuse
for the badness of the entertainment I might expect;
since, as his servants were, by this time, all fast
asleep in bed, and could not be rousednor, indeed,
do any thing, if rousedwithout making such a
clatter as must drive his wife distracted, there was
nothing to be done but to wait upon ourselves. I
hastened to assure him I should be very careful in
obeying his injunctions; and begged that no trouble
might be taken on my account, since all I desired
was a bed to sleep in, and some means of drying my
clothes; the two robberies together having left me
no others to shift myself.
It's an ill wind that blows nobody good, quoth
Mr. Bloodmoney, laughing; and then added, with
another of the oaths, without which he seemed
incapable
of conducting any conversation, If the sack
is empty, so much the better; for I shall fill it with
such a freight as it never carried beforeI will, split
me.
With that, Mr. Bloodmoney ascended a suite of
marble steps leading to the door of a very
magnificent
housethat is, magnificent, so far as size was
concerned; but otherwise, it looked like a barn, being
nothing but a great flat wall of red bricks, broken
only by the windows, door, and a petticoat of white
marble below, there being not one pennyworth of
architectural design, or ornament of any kind, to be
seen on any part of it; this being the approved
fashion
of building fine houses in Philadelphia. Here,
bidding me belay my jaw, for I was adventuring
a remark upon the storm, which was now raging
with increased violence, and pouring a deluge of
rain, Mr. Bloodmoney, with a key, essayed the door;
which not opening as readily as he wished, he so
far forgot his own injunctions as to let fly a
multitude
of execrations, first upon the door, then the key,
and finally upon himself, all which, and whom, he
abused with equal fervour; and he had succeeded in
consigning himself to what he called the home of
all the hellcats, before the door finally yielded to
his efforts, and let us in.
This happy success he signalized by dg his
blood, and then closed and secured the door; which
being effected, he bade me follow him, and we
groped our way along a dark passage, and thence
into a dark room; where, however, was a
smouldering
fire of coals twinkling in a grate; which Mr.
Bloodmoney, who was also pretty well drenched
with rain, seemed as happy as myself to see. He
bade me hold fast at the door until he had got a light;
which he obtained by first kindling a paper match
at the fire, and then a brace of wax candles that stood
in a branch over the mantel.
In this light, I perceived we were in a very
spacious
saloon, opening, by means of folding leaves,
that were wide spread, into another of equal size,
and both of them furnished with a luxury,
sumptuousness
and splendour, that struck me dumb with
admiration; for I had never dreamed that such
gorgeousness
was found in any but a princely palace,
much less in the dwelling of a plain democratic
American citizen. The rich carpets, the huge
mirrors
in massive carved frames extending from the
ceiling to the floor, the dark antique-looking pictures
in frames as rich and solid, the window draperies of
satin and fine lace, the chairs and ottomans, with
cushions covered with crimson velvet, the lamps
and chandeliers of dead gold, the branches, brackets,
mantel vases, and other ornaments, made up a
spectacle
that both delighted and confounded me. It
was to me almost a scene of fairy-land; for my
benefactor
,
Dr. Howard, though very rich, never dreamed
of indulging in such luxurious display; either
because
he did not care for it, or was afraid of
incurring
the envy and hatred of his less affluent
neighbours
,
by too greatly eclipsing them in state. In fact,
it daunted me; and I felt both ashamed and afraid to
move, in my drenched and squalid condition, among
so many objects of splendour; until the lord of the
mansion, who seemed to survey the spectacle with
infinite satisfaction, as being fully conscious of all
its advantages, beckoned me forward to help him
replenish the fire from a coal-scuttle, that the
servants
had left standing hard by, either for the
convenience
of their master, who was, doubtless,
accustomed
to be out late at nights, or to lessen their own
labours, in making the morning fires. The coal
being bituminous, was soon in a blaze, thoughfrom
our anxiety to avoid noise and disturbancewe were
13*
some time in putting it on; and we had, after a
while, a fine roaring fire, which our wet clothes,
and the coolness of the night, made uncommonly
agreeable.
My eccentric host noticed the looks of
approbation
I still cast about me; whereupon he muttered,
with an encouraging grin, Fine harbour to moor
in, eh? All made on blue water, with a cast or two
in soundings. The sea's the place, my ladthe
true Spanish mine that you might poke Potosi,
Golgotha
,
or whatever you call it, (I suppose he meant
Golconda,) and Gopher, and the Gold Coast, and
all the rest of your dry-land mines in, and never find
them again. Dn my blood, you Powelwhat's
your name?Robin Day, sir, I put in.Very
well: half a dozen voyages or so, and you're made
for life;just such a snuggery, (Sailor's Rest, eh?)
a bank of moneya nervous wife, and seven
squalling
hell's-kitten children, blast 'emand all the
rest of the good things, split me:provided Davy
Jones don't claim you for supper, beforehand. And
talking of supper, if I could but light upon one of
the niggers, I could eat onethat is, a supper, and
not a nigger; though, upon a pinch, I should n't
make mouths at a young one, seeing that I once ate
a whole leg off one, in a small boat, for want of
something better, split me.
With that, the gentleman, complaining there was
not light enough to see by, got upon a chair, and
lighted a chandelier depending from the ceiling;
which done, he swore he must have something to
drink, or die for it, and began to rummage about,
and at the first attempt, produced the remains of a
bottle of Rhenish wine, that stood on a side-board,
and seemed to have been very recently opened.
This he pronounced cursed wish-wash,bilgewater
and vinegar, but nevertheless took a hearty draught of
it, handing me the remainder, and assuring me it
was poor stuff, indeed, but milk for babes. He
then, in the search for something better and stronger,
made an attempt upon the sideboard, with a key
taken from a huge bunch of all shapes and sizes;
and, while trying one after another, until he hit
upon the right one, he took occasion to inform me,
there was no trusting servants, especially the
nigger
ones; that there was nothing would keep them
out of mischief, except locking every thing up; and
finally, that he was always obliged to carry the keys
himself, when Mrs. Bloodmoney was sick; and
split him, he knew the use of them, though he
never could tell one from another.
By this time he had opened the sideboard, whence
he drew forth, with a chuckle of satisfaction, some
half dozen or more decanters, containing various
liquors, spirituous and vinous, each having a case or
foot-box of silver, in the old style, to stand in.
These he deposited with great glee upon a table that
stood in the centre of the room, as if it had been
left, after clearing away supper. Another visit to
the sideboard resulted in his finding a brace of
cakebaskets
,
also of silver, in one of which was the
remnant
of a huge black or plum cake, in the other a
farrago of smaller cates and confectionary. These
he pronounced, with great disdain, schoolboy
trumpery
;
and betook him to the sideboard again, but
without any further success in discovering eatables;
though he lighted upon sundry articles of plate, all
which he drew out and laid upon the table, swearing,
with as much energy as he could express in a
whisper
,
that he would have a supper, if he had to raise
the house for it. I took the liberty of telling him,
I hoped he was not giving himself any of that
trouble on my account; upon which he nodded
and laughed, swore I was an odd dog, and
declared
he intended to make my fortune.
I thought, upon my conscience, that if there was
any odd dog in the case,
he
was the one; for a more
strangely behaved personage I had never seen before
in my whole life; and every act and expression
served but to increase my surprise.
Having despatched the sideboard, he made an
attack
upon a brace of closets in the chimney-wall,
which, after a deal of trouble, he succeeded in
opening
,
but only to find them empty; whereupon he
fell into a rage, and swore he believed the servants
had robbed them; for Mrs. Bloodmoney, he knew,
used to kep the spoons and forks in one or other of
them. I ventured to say, I thought we could do
very well without any such superfluities; but he
cut me short by applying to
my
eyes one of those
energetic benedictions with which he was wont to
distinguish his own, bidding me hold my tongue,
or use it, like a cat, to dry myself; an expression
whose oddity seemed so agreeable to himself, that
he immediately got rid of a sour look he had put on,
and fell to laughing, though in a subdued manner,
as became the husband of the sick and nervous Mrs.
Bloodmoney. Indeed, I may observe, that, although
the din of the storm, which seemed rather to
increase
than diminish, the howling of the winds, the
pattering of the rain, and the clamour of numberless
shutters slamming and banging in all quarters, might
have excused a little indulgence, since no ordinary
talking or laughing could have been heard out of
the room itself, and none, if heard, could have
distressed
any nerves that were undisturbed by the
tempest; Mr. Bloodmoney was, nevertheless,
extremely
careful in every thing he did or said, to
make as little noise as possible; which convinced
me that, notwithstanding his oddities and coarseness
of manners, Mr. Bloodmoney had an affection for
his wife; and this I felt, was one good quality,
however
deficient he might be in others.
CHAPTER XXI.
In which Mr. Bloodmoney gives Robin his supper, and tells him
several astonishing secrets.
Having
advised me to use my tongue as
aforesaid
,
and laughed at his own facetiousness, Mr.
Bloodmoney swore he would make a voyage of
exploration
over the house, in search of the proper
materials for a supper; and that he might do this
with less fear of disturbing his lady, he pulled off
his boots, that were somewhat of the heaviest, and,
being also, as he said, water-logged, made a gurgling
noise, at every step, which he himself compared to
the gasp of a drowning tomcat. This being done,
and not without my assistance, which he demanded
without any ceremony, he sallied forth in his
stocking-feet
,
with a candle, bidding me keep quiet till
he returned.
I kept quiet as he directed, sitting by the fire,
indulging
in speculations on his character, and
wondering
whether its singularity and coarseness were
shared by any of the members of his family
supposing
he had one; which, I thought, might be
inferred
from his remark about the seven squalling
children. Supposing his wife, however, were his
only companion, I had soon good evidence, as I
esteemed it, of her being a very different sort of
personage from her lord; for, besides a magnificent
piano, that stood against the wall, and a guitar lying
upon it, I perceived, upon getting up to look about me,
an equally magnificent harp standing, half covered, in
a corner, with a music-stand, and books scattered in
some disorder around it. The sight of the harp filled
my eyes with tears; for it reminded me of Nanna, who
had learned to play upon that instrument, and brought
to my memory the days of happiness I had enjoyed in
her father's house, days which I was, perhaps, never
to know again.
I turned away from it, that I might conquer my
agitation before Mr. Bloodmoney's return; and then
betook me to the pictures, which I surveyed with
much interest, having always had a passionate regard
for the painter's art. Some of these appeared to
me very ancient and excellent, being religious
pieces, representations of Madonnas and Saints, and
scenes of crucifixion and martyrdom, that awoke
sad and painful emotions in my breast.
Besides these, there were several portraits; of
which two, hanging as pendants, occupied
conspicuous
places on the wall, representing, the one a
female, not very young or handsome, but amiable
looking; the other, a gentleman advanced in life,
but of a vigorous frame, stern, and somewhat
sinister
countenance, and with powdered hair.
Another, that hung in the corner above the harp,
interested me more, both because it was a better
painting, as I could perceive, notwithstanding it
had but an insufficient light, and because there was
something at once striking and noble in the visage.
It was also the portrait of a gentleman, though much
younger than the other, in some foreign costume,
rich and picturesque; his countenance very
handsome
,
but swarthy, with long black hair falling upon
his shoulders; and round his neck a string of black
beads, that, I thought, looked pretty much like my
own, only that there was suspended to it a rich
golden cross, with a cluster of jewels at the ends of
each arm, and another at the point of intersection.
But what struck me more than the richness of dress
and decorations, or the beauty of the countenance,
was an air of uncommon gloom and dejection that
sat upon every feature, expressing a tale of suffering
that wrought upon my feelings and awakened my
curiosity; and Mr. Bloodmoney returning about
this time, with a huge load of eatables and other
things he had gathered up, I directed his attention
to the picture, begging to know who it was it
represented
.
He cast his eye indifferently towards it,
but his countenance suffered a change the moment
he regarded it: he seemed, indeed, perturbed and
confounded, gazed upon it with a sort of wildness
for an instant, and then turned hastily away, bidding
me mind my own business, and be curst; though
he presently added, as if ashamed of his
roughness
,
that it was an old friend of his who had
gone to Davy Jones long ago; with which gracious
information I was obliged to rest satisfied.
He now spread upon the board the spoils collected
in his expedition, (which, he declared, he had
conducted
without disturbing so much as a cat or a
mouse,) consisting of cold meats and fowls, pastry,
sweetmeats, and I know not what beside; but there
was enough to feed a regiment, as well as an
astonishing
quantity of platespoons, forks, goblets,
salvers, &c., his bringing which and spreading it on
the table, where it made a rich and tempting, but
useless show, I could only account for by supposing
he desired to amaze and confound me with the
evidences
of his boundless wealtha supposition that
appeared to me natural enough of a man whose
conversation
indicated so vulgar, and doubtless so poor
an origin; and which was, moreover, confirmed by
his openly soliciting my admiration to his treasure,
asking me if it was not a cargo for a Spanish
galleon
?
an invoice worth a Jew's eye? with other
like expressions.
Having arranged it to his mind, he now sat down
to eat and drink, bidding me do the same; and out
of the various cold bits he had collected, we made a
very good supper togetherMr. Bloodmoney in
particular, who ate with a vigour that would have
surprised
me, had not the energy with which he
attacked
the potables absorbed all my attention. One
bottle
of wine he despatched at a gulp, without taking
the trouble to pour it out; a second he attacked with
like fury but was obliged to breathe in the middle of
the draught, and when he had cracked off the neck
of a third, which he did with a knife, as if slicing
off the head of an enemy, his zeal was so much
abated
that he was content to drink, as he said, in the
genteel way, that is, by pouring the wine into a
tumbler
;
for he professed too great a contempt of
wineglasses
to condescend to such small ware.
Having arrived at this point of moderation, I could
not observe that his energies suffered any further
abatement; or that his draughts declined either in
quantity or frequency. In short, Mr. Bloodmoney,
as he freely confessed, loved his glass, particularly,
as he added, in foul weather, when the soaking of
the inner man was the only way to prevent the
saturation
of the outer; for how, quoth he, ingeniously,
can water get into a barrel that's already full of
better liquor?
Upon this principle he drank, and with a very
visible effect on his heart and spirits, the one growing
warm and loving, the other facetious and boisterous;
Vol. I.14
so that he, by and by, fell to stretching across the
table, to shake hands with me, in a manner the most
ardent in the world, swearing he loved me, for all
of my nose being too big for my eyes, (an
expression
which, although it was a riddle to me then, I
suppose was meant to convey the idea, that it was
so bigmetaphorically speakingas to prevent my
seeing beyond it,) and finally to trolling a sea song,
which he began to sing so loudly that I was forced
to remind him of the tender state of Mrs.
Bloodmoney's
nerves; whereupon he declared he had
forgot
himself, and declared it with an oath thrice as
loud as the song.
In a word, the gentleman was becoming merry;
of which he gave a new and stronger proof every
moment, being guilty of a thousand absurdities of
speech and action, that are not necessary to be
recorded
,
except in so far as they had a bearing upon
my own interests. One of his pranks was to cram
my knapsack with the valuables he had collected
together; and, as he prefaced this step by embracing
me, and swearing, as he was now accustomed to do
every half minute, that he intended to make my
fortune
,
I thought, upon my conscience, he meant to
make me a present of the whole collection; and was
amazed at the extravagance of his folly. He then
clapped the sack upon the table, swore he was once
the best sailor that ever trode a plank, declared I
should be his first lieutenant, and asked me if I ever
had heard of Captain Hellcat? and upon my
reminding
him he had spoken of that worthy at the
little inn, he averred, with great volubility, and in
one breath, that the said Captain was a very honest
fellow, and the biggest villain the earth had ever
produced; and this very wise and consistent
assertion
he concluded by acquainting me, in a fit of great
communicativeness, that Captain Hellcator Brown,
for this, it appeared was his real appellation, the
former
being a mere nicknamewas in Philadelphia,
and had made application for the command of the
privateer, the Lovely Nancy.
At this information I was both surprised and
alarmedsurprised, as I told Mr. Bloodmoney, that
any such piratical villain should dare show himself
among honest men in a great city, not to speak of
his audacity in asking command of an honest man's
ship; and alarmed, as I also freely confessed, at the
possibility of my being sent to sea under charge of
such a commander. To this Mr. Bloodmoney made
answer, first, by particularizing my eyes in his
customary
way, and bidding me not abuse a better man
than myself, and then by referring in the same way
to his own, and asking if I thought him such a horse
as to trust a ship in the hands of such a desperado,
who might run away with her, the moment it suited
his interestsnot he, split him. No, said he,
I'm no such gudgeon, but a deep-water fish, fin,
head and tail, as you'll find me. And yet I would
I could trust the Lovely Nancy in the dog's hands,
for I'll be hanged if there's his equal, could one
but depend upon his honour and honesty, in all
creation
.
Sails a ship like an angelstorm and shine,
blow or no blow, all's one to Jack Brown; and fights,
ah, split me, where's his match at a fight? fights like
a hell-cat, and there's the name of him. An honest
fellow, split me! made me a power of money: as
how? Why, by fishing for niggers on the Gold
Coast, and stray Spaniards on the Gulf,
et cetera
,
as the learned folk say. But that's neither here nor
there. Bad luck's the lot of the best: even Davy
Jones gets a snub, sometimes, when the parsons
chouse him out of a dying sinner: and so Jack came
to misfortune; and them that were his old friends
turn up their noses at him, especially us that live in
big houses and have made our fortunes by himwe
do, split me. Well, Jack comes to me, and says he,
`I'm an honest man now, and go for fighting the
foes of my country: give me the Lovely Nancy, and
I'll sweep the Irish Channel.' I liked the idea, split
me; for, no doubt, there was good picking there, and
nobody to interfere: for d'ye see, John Bull would
never think of clapping a guard at his parlour door.
But, nevertheless, d'ye see, I meant the ship for the
Gulf and the West Indies, having business of my
own there; and so said I, Jack, I can't trust you with
a ship, for you'll run away with her. Then Jack
dd his eyes and talked of his honour; but I told
him that was all old junk and oakum; for unless he
could find some one to stand security for his good
behaviour, or raise a pledge that would nail him to
the same, he should whistle for the Lovely Nancy,
he should, split him. And now, d'ye see, here's the
case: Jack's as mad as fire, because of my scorning
his honour; and he's mad for the Lovely Nancy, for
she's a beauty; and he's mad to raise a pledge,
because
he can't get a ship without it. And what do
you think he'll do? Why, I'll be hanged, if I know:
only I should n't wonder if he should rob me, the
rascalbreak my house, carry off my plate and what
else he can lay hands on, and so make a pledge for
his good faith with my own money! I should n't,
split me, for it's in the rascal, it is, split me!
With that, Mr. Bloodmoney, seizing upon my
knapsack, and clapping a few more articles of plate
into it, informed me, with a look of unutterable
sagacity
,
that he was going to balk the rascal, by
removing
every valuable from the house, and
depositing
them for safe-keeping in the lockers of the
Lovely Nancy herself;nay, so urgent appeared to
him the necessity of such a transfer, of making it
that very night; for who said he, can tell how
soon Hellcat may be down upon me?
14*
CHAPTER XXII.
An adventure of a Sleeping Beauty, in which Robin Day shines
out as a hero.
Having
thus solved the mystery of the plate, he
assured me again it was more than probable that,
from the difficulty of procuring a suitable captain,
he should take command of his vessel himself; in
which case, I might depend upon being appointed
his first lieutenant; an honour which, I am sorry to
say, did not at this time appear to me too great for
my merits; for, if I must say the truth, the libations
I felt obliged, out of civility, to make oftener than I
should have otherwise desired, had somewhat turned
my head and robbed me of understanding.
For the same reason, as I grew foolish, I became
also sentimental and tender-hearted; and happening
to direct my eyes to the portrait of Mrs.
Bloodmoney
,
I was seized with concern at the thought of
Mr. Bloodmoney leaving her, to embark upon an
enterprise of such danger, and so told him;
whereupon
he assured me in confidence, She was a
confounded
jade and a shrew, and he longed to be rid of
her; adding that he was going to carry a passenger
to the Gulf, a certain young lady, the most beautiful
creature in the world; and who, as he swore he would
marry her the moment he should have got out of
Mrs. Bloodmoney's sight, I did not doubt was a
main reason of his resolving to sail the vessel
himself
.
His rapturous commendations of this young lady,
in whose honour he immediately began to sing a
very strange love-song, abounding with marine
phrases and saline similes, had the effect of making
me think again of the beautiful Nanna; and as I had
now reached the point of festive sensibility, when
one can be lachrymose or merry, just as the whim
shifts, I immediately burst into a flood of tears, and
informed Mr. Bloodmoney I was the most unhappy
of men. Of boys, you mean, said Mr.
Bloodmoney
;
who then demanded with great sympathy
what I was blubbering about? and whether there
was a woman in the case? and upon my admitting
that such was the fact, that my misfortunes had
separated
me from the loveliest and most amiable of her
sex, he gave me a fervent, hug, and swore with great
generosity, that, if that were the case, I should have
the young lady, his beautiful passenger, myselfI
should, split him; for such was his regard for me,
he could refuse me nothingno, not even this
adorable
young lady, who would make me amends for
the loss of a princess; for why? a queen was a dowdy
compared with her.
With that, he launched again into his praises and
his song, now carolling a stave, in a voice that was
as loud, as broken, and perhaps as musical as the
wind itself, howling around the chimneys, now
diverging
into extemporary recitative, uttering I know
not what confused and incoherent nonsense; for the
gentleman was now in his seventh heaven; when
the door, which Mr. Bloodmoney had left ajar,
suddenly
opened, as of its own accord, and there stepped
into the room a vision or apparitionfor so, at first,
I thought itof a young and beautiful female, dressed
all in white, indeed in a night-dress, holding a candle
in her hand, though not lighted, with which she
made her way, stepping softly, towards the harp;
when she laid the light down upon a table, and then
began to remove the cover from the instrument, as
if about to play. She took no notice of either Mr.
Bloodmoney or myself, and seemed, in truth, quite
unconscious of our presence; though she passed so
near me, as I sat at the corner of the table, staring
at her aghast, (for I was confounded at her
appearance
,)
as to brush me with her clothes. It was
then, however, that I perceived her eyes, which were
wide open, and very large and black, had in them
an air of stony fixedness and inexpressiveness, a
want of life and speculation, which I had read of as
characterizing the sleep-walker, and such, I began
to suspect, the young lady must be; and such, as it
proved, she, in fact, was.
She laid down the lamp, and uncovered the harp,
as I have mentioned, and then began to fumble among
the music, as if in search of a piece to play; when
Mr. Bloodmoney, who was, for a moment, struck
dumb, like myself, exclaimed, There she is, shiver
my timbers! An't she a lass for a commodore?
And, jumping up, he advanced towards her,
staggering
and lurching like a ship in a storm, swearing
he'd have a buss, if he died for it; and before I
knew what to say, or think of his strange
proceedings
,
he clapped his arms around her, and snatched
a salute from her lips.
The rudeness and violence of the attack instantly
awoke the fair somnambulist, who, thus restored to
sudden consciousness, and finding herself in a man's
arms, uttered a shriek the wildest, shrillest, and most
expressive of terror and desperation, I had ever
heard; and this she followed up by a dozen others,
as loud and as harrowing, struggling all the time,
though without avail, to free herself from Mr.
Bloodmoney's grasp; who, telling her, with more
energy than tenderness, she might squeak and be
hanged, swore he would have another smack, he
would, split him.
During the first part of this adventure, surprise
kept me nailed to my chair, as well as speechless;
but now, being roused from my stupor, and in part
also, from the effects of the wine, by the lady's shrieks,
and perceiving her almost mad with terror and
distress
,
I began to be sensible the liberty Mr.
Bloodmoney
was taking was neither civil nor manlynay,
on the contrary, that it was indecorous and brutal;
and that it became me to rescue the affrighted beauty
from his clutches. Prompted by these
considerations
,
and still more by my feelings, which were
naturally
chivalrous enough in the cause of women, I
ran to her assistance; and, not knowing in what
better
way to proceed, I took advantage of the
instability
of my entertainer's footing to trip up his heels,
and so lay him upon the floor; assuring him, as I did
so, by way of apology, that that was no way to
treat a lady.
As virtue does sometimes meet with its reward,
so it happened that mine was in this instance destined
to a recompense; for the lady was no sooner released
from Mr. Bloodmoney's arms, than she flung herself
into mine, grasping me round the neck, and embracing
me with such fervour, that my heart began to pitapat
with confusion. In truth, the embrace of such a
lovely creature, now the more lovely for her terror,
wrought a kind of enchantment on my brain; I felt
myself, on a sudden, transformed into a hero of romance
whom a wondrous destiny had thrown into contact
with my star-ordained heroine, for whom I was to
dare all perils and achieve all exploits that had ever
been recorded of a Belmour or Lord Mortimer;
whom I was to adore in the intensest manner
possible
,
and be faithful to, through good and evil, through
storm and shine, through pomp and temptation, &c.
&c. &c. in the usual sentimental way. All that I do
know, in addition to what I have said, is that I, for
the moment, entirely forgot my dear Nanna, and that
I returned the embrace of my new charmer,
swearing
,
by way of re-assuring her, that I would die in
her defence; to all which, as well as to my tender
embraces, she paid not the slightest regard, having,
in fact, fallen into a swoon. It was to this, to do her
justice, more than to any thing else, that I owed the
favour of her embrace; for she had clutched me, to
avoid falling, just as she would, from instinct, have
clutched a post or a block; though the sound of a
defender's voice, no doubt caused her to turn to me as
to a protector, and so gave me a preference I should
have enjoyed had there even been a post or a block,
for her to choose between us.
CHAPTER XXIII.
Another adventure of a more terrible cast, in which the Sleeping
Beauty performs the part of a heroine.
In
the meanwhile, my entertainer, enraged at my
interference, sprang to his feet, and made another
dart at the maiden, to snatch her from my arms; in
which he would have, perhaps, succeeded, had not a
fourth person now rushed into the room, with a pistol,
which he fired at the gentleman, though without doing
him any harm; and then, with a chair which he
snatched
up and wielded with both hands, knocked him
down. The intruder, as I saw at a glance, was the
original of the portrait that hung as the pendant to
the effigy of Mrs. Bloodmoneyto wit, the
gentleman
with powdered hair, stern countenance, and
vigorous
frame; and the sight of him brought I know
not what strange fancies and suspicions into my head.
But I had little time to entertain them; for having
knocked Mr. Bloodmoney down, he began to
vociferate
in terms of wrath and alarm, Here! John,
Tim, Dick, George! Robbers, thieves! Fetch the
watchmurder! help! George, Dick, Tim, John,
watch! thieves, robbers! And immediately three
or four negro-men, very spruce and active looking,
though but half dressed, came tumbling into the
room, with looks and cries of astonishment and
indignation
,
following the gentleman, who now made
an assault upon me, bidding me surrender for a
house-breaking dog, and strengthening his
exhortation
by the same argument he had used in the case
of my worthy hostthat is, by knocking me down
with the chair. At the same moment, some of the
blackies whisked the young lady out of my hands,
and helped her, now recovering her senses, out of the
room; while the others, holding fast upon my
entertainer
and myself, imitated the leader in the
nocturnal
onslaught, in brawling to fetch the watch,
and to bring ropes to tie the robbers.
The weight of the chair, applied without any
consideration
of what might be the consequences, to a
head considerably softer than usual, had somewhat
stunned and muddled my faculties; and their
confusion
was rather increased than abated by the outcries
of the strange gentleman and his attendants, and
their violent proceedings in regard to my friend and
myself. Nevertheless, I was not so much stupefied
as to be incapable of forming my own opinions of
the true state of matters and things; but, had I been,
all uncertainly must have been put to flight by what
followed.
The negroes having secured my hands behind
me with a handkerchief, pulled me upon my feet,
that the powdered gentleman might see, as he said,
who the rascal was. He gave me a furious stare,
told me I was a bloody-minded looking villain
young for a housebreaker, but old enough to hang;
to not one word of which friendly and flattering
address did I return an answer, being, in truth, so
unutterably confounded, that my tongue, as I may say,
clove to the roof of my mouth.
He then turned to my entertainer, who being
helped to his feet in like manner, received him
with a volley of drunken oaths and maledictions,
called him Old Commodore, and demanded, with
every appearance of honest indignation, If that
was the way he treated an old friend and visiter.
A visiter! quoth the white-headed gentleman,
starting at sight of him as at a basilisk, and in his
surprise, uttering a name that made my flesh creep
on my bonesit was the name of the redoubtable
Captain Brown,
alias
Hellcat!
I understood my position at once, or, at least, I
thought I did: the white-headed gentleman, and no
other, was the true Mr. Bloodmoney, and the other
a villanous sharper, pirate, cut-throatevery thing
that was roguish, who had taken advantage of my
ignorance and simplicity, choused me out of my
letter of recommendation, with its enclosure of
money, and, what was worse, inveigled me into the
commission of a felony, made me his accomplice in
a burglary, and a burglary, too, in the house of the
very man to whom I was bearing the letter of
recommendation
.
If I was confounded before, I was now in a trance
of confusion a hundred times worse than ever, being
thrown into such a fit of consternation at the
discovery
of my deplorable condition, that I not only
was incapable of seeing what it was proper for me
to do, to extricate myself from the dilemmato
wit, to inform Mr. Bloodmoney who I was, and how
I had been entrappedbut lost my seven senses
along with my wits, so that I no longer saw or
heard any thing that passed around me, being
conscious
only of a multitude of sounds as of men in
wrathful argument, whom I could no more see than
I could distinguish their words. In this condition I
was dragged away, at the order, I believe, of Mr.
Bloodmoney, into another room, where one of the
blackies remained in watch over me, armed with a
Vol. I.15
poker, with which he gave me to understand, twenty
times a minute, he would knock out my brains, if I
made any attempt to escape; to render which the
more difficult, he was at the pains to produce a
second handkerchief with which he bound my legs,
leaving me lying like a log on the floor.
I now began to recall my wits a little, and could
then hear the hum of loud and angry voices from
the saloon, and presently a greater hubbub as of
altercation; then a yell and cry of murder, followed
by other sounds not less frightful; upon which the
negro who had charge of me, ran out to join the fray,
leaving me in the dark, and as much terrified as
himself. To increase the din, there was now heard
a prodigious banging at the door and ringing of
what I supposed was the street bell, and the
shrieking
of women up stairs; which, together with the
storm that still rattled as furiously as ever, made up
such a chorus of horrible sounds as I had never heard
beforeno, not even at the execution of the
dethroned
tyrant, M'Goggin.
In the midst of the hubbub, the young lady, the
heroine of the night, suddenly appeared before me,
pale with affright and excitement, yet with
something
of resolution marked on her beautiful visage.
She entered the room, closed the door, and stepping
hastily to where I lay, looked me intently in the
face, and then muttered, in tones slightly
distinguished
by a foreign accent, and low and tremulous,
yet expressive of the energy of passionYou are
a robber, a house breaker, and a villain; but you
have saved me
Dios mio!
I know not from
what!You shall escape.
With these words, she tore the handkerchiefs from
my hands and feet, and throwing open a window
that seemed to look into a garden, bade me leap
through it and begone; an injunction in which I was
extremely willing to obey her, being as eager, in fact,
to get out of the horrible scrape I was in, as ever
was mouse to fly his narrow prison of wire.
Nevertheless
,
I could not leave such a beautiful creature,
without some attempt at retrieving my character in
her opinion. I am no robber, no villain, I said,
but a miserable dupe of I would have added,
the villain, Captain Brown and my own egregious
folly; but she interrupted me impatiently, waving
with one hand to the window, and with the other
pointing warningly to the door of the room, at which
I heard, or fancied I heard, the steps and voices of
men, coming to make sure of me. Begone, she
muttered; and, if you are honest, God will go with
you.
I leaped, as commanded, my heart full of gratitude,
my head again teeming with romantic notions, which
not even the peril of my situation could prevent
returning
,
at this second encounter with the lovely
Spaniard; for such, by her exclamation,
Dios mio
,
I knew she must be.
But what peril could not do in the way of curing
me of my sentiment, a very trivial mischance soon
did; for, dropping from the window, which was
some six or seven feet from the ground, I had the
misfortune to plump into a rain-hogshead, then
brimfull
;
that is, I plumped into it with one leg,
bestriding
it as a dragoon his war-horse; and the vessel
being unsettled by the jar, toppled over with me to
the ground with a violence that must have done
much damage to my exterior leg, had not the fury
of the deluge it immediately shot over me, washed
me, as I may say, clean out of it, before I had
reached the ground.
The worst consequence of this misadventure was
my being now, for the second time, drenched to the
skin; but this I did not long lament, as it was
raining
as furiously as ever, and I perceived, I must, at
all events, have been, in a few moments, as
thoroughly
soaked as ever. I had no time to lose in
bewailing my misfortunes; and therefore thought of
nothing so much as making my escape from Mr.
Bloodmoney's garden; which I effected by climbing
a gate, and dropping into a little alley, whence I
made my way into a street.
Here I was in some danger of falling into the
hands of a watchman, who was running along
towards
Mr. Bloodmoney's house, as I supposed,
making
a terrible din with his rattle; but I avoided him by
slipping behind a corner, till he had passed; after
which, I took to my heels, and ran, I knew not
well whither, until I found myself out of breath, and
in the suburbs of the city.
This discovery, or rather the latter part of it, was
the more agreeable, as I was now heartily sick of
the City of Brotherly Love; which, after such a feat
of burglary, however innocent my own part in it, did
not seem the safest place in the world for me to remain
in. I pursued my way, therefore, without so much
caring whither it might lead me, as desiring it should
bear me as far as possible from Philadelphia; and
was, in half an hour more, outside of the town,
waddling
along (for I cannot call it walking) through a
long puddle of fluid brick-clay, knee-deep at least,
which, I afterwards ascertained, was one of the
principal
highways from Philadelphia to the South.
CHAPTER XXIV.
The Hegira continued, with some philosophical reflections in the
boot of a coach.
Along
this excellent and highly agreeable road,
miring at every step, buffeted by the winds, without
my hat, (which, with my knapsack, I had left in
Mr. Bloodmoney's drawing-room,) I journeyed
onward
with all the speed I could, being more and
more frightened, the more I thought of it, at the
terrible
quandary into which I had now fallen.
To be so egregiously duped, as I had been, by
Captain
Brown, was mortifying enough to my self love,
as proving that, with all my vanity and conceit, I was
but a schoolboy in the world after all; but to be duped
into a burglary, to be rendered, or made to appear,
the actual accomplice of a robber in a felony the
most audacious ever attempted;
there
was the rub,
there was the rock upon which I found my bark of
adventure was in danger of going to pieces. How
I was to extricate myself from this dilemma, by my
own unaided exertions, unless by flight, I knew not.
That I could sooner or later, indeed, establish my
innocence, through the means of my patron, I did
not doubt; but I had seen enough of Mr.
Bloodmoney
,
and the opinion he had formed of me, to know
that any attempt to explain the circumstance to him,
without the assistance of the letter of which Captain
15*
Brown had deprived me, could result in nothing but
my being immediately consigned, like any common
rogue, to a prison; whencenot to speak of the
ignominy
of such confinementI had good reason to
expect to be discharged only into the hands of a
New Jersey police officer, duly commissioned to
conduct me back to the scene of the M'Goggin
adventure
,
and perhaps the gallows;a thought that
set my teeth to chattering worse than even the wet
and cold did, and gave a vigour to my feet that was
the more necessary, as without some such stirring
impulse to urge me on, I should never have been
able to make any progress through the mud, and
against the storm. Upon the whole, it appeared to
me, that my only hope of safety, the only course
that was left me, was to get out of the reach of Mr.
Bloodmoney and the prisons of Philadelphia, as soon
as possible; and, this having been effected, to write
to my patron, informing him of all my mishaps, of
the last in particular, leaving it to him to make my
peace, and restore my credit, with Mr. Bloodmoney.
While I was debating this matter in my mind, it
was my fortune to be overtaken by a mail-coach, (for
such it proved,) that had just left the city, and was
floundering through the mud like myself, though at
a rate of travel somewhat more rapid than my
own. Whither it was going I had not the remotest
idea; nevertheless, being heartily sick of trudging
in the mire and rain, I felt disposed to hail the
driver, and demand a seat; and I should have done
so had I not been afraid of finding in it some
villanous
constable, watchman, or agent of Mr.
Bloodmoney
,
sent in pursuit of me. But as I perceived
behind it a very capacious boot, that seemed, from
the flapping of its leather covering, to be quite
empty, and was capable of affording me both
carriage
and shelter from the storm, I could not resist
the temptation to clamber into it; which I did,
unseen
by the driver, and there esconced myself,
defended somewhat from the rain by the leather
covering, which I buckled around me as well as I
could.
In this position, lugged along like the lion of a
travelling caravan in his cage, or a duck in a coop,
(which may be the better simile,) I had ample
leisure
to reflect upon my extraordinary ill luck in
getting into difficulties, whether I would or not,
and to devise some plan of avoiding them for the
future. And, I have no doubt, I thought many very
sensible thoughts, and framed many wise resolutions
while thus cooped up in my little prison; from
which, however, I derived the less profit, as there
was never a thought entered my head, or a
determination
formed in my mind, that it was not, a
moment
after, beaten out of my recollection, by some
sudden plump of the coach into a mud-hole, or
furious
jolt over a stone, by which I was either
frightened
or bruised out of my philosophy.
I remember, however, that, having pondered my
affair with the pseudo Mr. Bloodmoney,
alias
Captain Hellcat, over and over again, and satisfied
myself that my being duped was more owing to my
own simple credulity, than to any peculiar skill in
hoaxing on the part of that honest personage, I
manfully
resolved never again to be duped by mortal
man; to prevent which, nothing more appeared to
me necessary than to act upon a maxim of great
vogue among philosophers, and to consider every
man a rogue, until he should prove himself honest,
and so remain on the alert against knavery and
deception.
This resolution I was the better able to fix in my
memory, as at the time of framing it, the coach
suddenly emerged from mud and stones and rolled
softly along a bed of plank and timber; which
moving my curiosity, I peeped out, and found we
were upon a low floating bridge, crossing a river.
This, I supposed, was the Schuylkill, as, in fact, it
was; and hence, as I knew this river ran west of
Philadelphia, I inferred the coach was taking me
exactly the way I wished to gothat is, from
Philadelphia
,
and not back into New Jersey, and perhaps
even southward, towards the Chesapeake, whither,
of all the places in the world, I now desired most
to go, in the hope of meeting my friend Dicky
Dare; under whose command and protection I was
resolved to place myself, and so fight the enemies of
my country on dry land.
These thoughts were highly agreeable and
consolatory
,
and banished half the fears and distresses
from my mind; so that, by and by, in spite of the jolts,
I fell fast asleep, being pretty well worn out by the
watchings and labours of the night, not to speak of
my insufficient slumbers in the woods in New
Jersey, the preceding night. I dreamed that I had
stumbled on my friend Dicky Dare, who was a great
general at the head of an army, and I his second in
command; that we went into battle with an army
of red-coats, whom we put to rout, performing
prodigies
of valourI, in particular, cutting off so many
heads that I quite eclipsed my friend Dicky, as
well as all the other great heroes, Hannibal, Julius
Csar, &c., that ever lived, so that the soldiers were
in a rapture, assembling on the field of victory to
crown me king over them; a consummation of
triumph that made me feel very glorious, but which
I should have been still better pleased with, had it
not been for a sudden jolt of the coach, (that was, at
that moment, fording a brook, swollen by the rain,)
whereby I was tossed out of my perch, plumped
head over heels in the flood, and well nigh drowned,
before I knew what was the matter with me. By
dint of much effort and scrambling, however, I made
my way, at length, to the bank, without loss or
damage, which I was the better able to do, as the
day was now beginning to break, and the storm to
clear away; and having devoted a moment or two
to lamenting my unlucky fate in meeting so many
uncomfortable accidents, I resolved to make my
misfortune the means of helping me to a seat in the
coach; which I had, for some time, suspected, from
not having heard any voices in it, was without
passengers
;
as, indeed, proved true.
My resolution to treat, for the future, every
person
I met as a rogue, until he should prove himself
an honest man, involved also a determination to act
like a rogue myself:that is, to quibble, cozen, and
deceive, as far as was necessary to keep me out of
trouble. For this reason, being conscious that I
made but a strange and sorry appearance in my
reeking
clothes, and that an application for a seat in the
coach, in such a place, and at such an hour, and
coming from such a figure, must look somewhat
suspicious, I told the driver, whom I was obliged
to wake out of a nap he was snugly taking on his
seat, first, that he had certainly set out that
morning
earlier than usual, (meaning to insinuate that I
had intended to enter the coach in the city, and had
been compelled to walk after it, to overtake it,) and,
secondly, that I had had the misfortune, to get out
of my depth, in crossing the brook, and thereby to
lose my hat and bundle; all which, the honest
man declared, rubbing his eyes with great zeal, was
like enough, considering the weather: though which
he meant was like enough, considering the weather,
the early start of the coach, or my dip in the brook,
I did not trouble myself to inquire.
I found, as I expected, that the coach was entirely
empty, so that I was relieved of all fear of
uncomfortable
companions; and the driver told me we
should soon arrive at a village to breakfast, where I
might easily get a hat and such clothes as I desired;
provided, as he took care to add, looking at me as
if he had some apprehensions for his fare, I had the
money to buy them. I easily satisfied him on this
score, and we, by and by, reached the village; where
I procured a cap, and a valise, with a few pieces of
linen to put in it, being all the ready made articles
of clothing, except cowskin boots, quaker hats, and
a rejected coat made for a Daniel Lambert, that were
for sale in the village. But for this I cared the less,
as I imagined I should soon be a volunteer under
some gallant commander, who would, doubtless, fit
me out in a handsome uniform at the expense of the
government, and thereby enable me to keep my
money for more pressing occasions.
I found out, also, after a little roundabout
manuvering
for
it would not do to avow ignorance on
so important a pointthat the coach was bound to
Wilmington, in Delaware; a discovery that greatly
rejoiced me, that town being on the direct road to
the Chesapeake, whither I was now so desirous to
go. And at that townnot to waste time in
describing
a journey, that was without adventurewe did
not arrive until after nightfall, in consequence of
the badness of the road and the horses, together
with, I believe, some fears the coachman had of
driving
into the midst of a British army; which, from a
thousand flying rumours that now met us at every
roll of the wheels, we supposed had landed on the
Chesapeake, and almost feared had already taken
possession of Wilmington.
We found, however, no British there, but great
talk about them, with a prodigious deal of drumming
and fifing, shouting and swearing, and riding up and
down; for it seems, they had received news of the
enemy having actually landed in great force at the
head of Elk, or some other water of the
Chesapeake
,
not more than twenty or thirty miles off, and
were in consequence beating up with great spirit,
for volunteers to proceed forthwith to the scene of
danger.
This news, though it seemed to have disconcerted
every body else, was by no means disagreeable to
me; who, besides perceiving that my greatest
security
from all law officers would be found amid the
din and terrors of a camp, was beginning to warm
with patriotism and martial ardour. I resolved, if
any band of volunteers or other armed men, should
set out in the night, I would go with them; in which
thought, I entered the hotel where the coach
stopped
,
to get my supper, together with such useful
information as I might be able to pick up.
As for my supper, I was ushered into a room where
stood a table bountifully furnished with the good
gifts of nature, but so thronged with guests, all older
and wiser than myself, and all so much better skilled
in the art of storming bread and butter, and dividing
the spoils of the platter, that I had much ado to lay
hands upon a morsel of food. As for information,
the case appeared still more desperate; for though
every man present seemed as martially inclined as
I, (indeed, the conversation ran on nothing but blood
and battle,) and perfectly well disposed to hold forth
on the subject that engrossed all minds to any one
at all inclined to listen, I could obtain no information
of one man that was not immediately contradicted
by the next person to whom I addressed myself. In
short, there was nothing to be learned but that the
British had landed, or were about to land, somewhere
at the head of the Chesapeake, and that sundry
companies
of militia and volunteers either had set out, or
were on the point of setting out, with the full
intention
of sweeping these audacious invaders from the
face of the earth.
CHAPTER XXV.
Robin Day incurs a great danger, and surrenders to his
unrelenting
pursuer, John Dabs; but calls his wisdom to his assistance,
and performs a wonderful feat of dexterity.
The
patriotic spirit manifested by all the company
greatly increased the fervor of my own; so that
having
completed my supper, I resolved at once to seek
out, with mine host's assistance, some one of the many
bands preparing to march to the field of honor, and
enrol
myself among them. I left the supper table, and
proceeded to the bar-room, where I was in the act of
receiving the advice I wanted, when a new comer
brushed me aside, and engaged the innkeeper's
attention
by eagerly demanding, if there was not in
his house a young fellow that had arrived by the city
stage, and--
But I did not remain to hear any thing further.
The first words struck me with a panic, which was
vastly increased by a look at the stranger's face, in
which I immediately recognised the well known
lineaments of a certain John Dabs, a constable of our
town, and famous for his energy and success in
hunting
up transgressors and fugitives from the law,
whenever there was any thing to be gained by it. I
immediately made a demonstration towards the door;
but John Dabs whose eyes were as busy as his tongue
and speedily detected the movement, was too quick
for me.
Vol. I.16
I've got you, by jingo! cried John Dabs, taking
me by the shoulder, and grinning with triumph,
while I almost fainted with terror and despair. In
an instant, we were surrounded by curious spectators
some demanding what I had done, while others
disdained inquiry, swearing, one that I was a
runaway
prisoner of war; another that I had stolen
a horse, he knew by the look of me; a third that I
was a kidnapper, a Georgeye nigger-stealer, and
so on; so that I soon began to believe myself guilty
of all the crimes that had ever been committed.
In this emergency, Mr. John Dabs, to my extreme
surprise, and somewhat also to my gratification, as
relieving
me from exposure and the disgrace of the
moment
,
declared I was no criminal, but a young
gentleman
what had run away from his friends, who had
employed
him
, John Dabs, to carry me back to them;
and that he was very glad to find me, as I was a
young gentleman what did'nt know the world, and
my friends was all in a peck of troubles because of
me. With which explanation, that appeared very
satisfactory to all the company, Mr. John Dabs
asked
,
with an appearance almost of civility and respect,
to have a little private talk with me; a proposal to
which I, of course, very courteously acceded, and
accompanied
him to a private room, with hangdog
looks I doubt not, but busily plotting a thousand
plans of escape from his inexorable clutches.
The moment we had got by ourselves, Mr. Dabs
began to indulge in sundry encomiastic gratulations
on his success in finding me out, then laughed
immoderately
at the alarm I had betrayed, when seized
by him, asking me if I did not think I was
certainly
to be carried to the gallows? and ended by
assuring me I had nothing to fear in that way, or any
other; for why? Mr. M'Goggin was neither dead
nor dying, and none the worse for his broken head
when was an Irishman ever? said John Dabs,
the constable; no, he was out of danger, on his feet,
as well as ever he was, and had been bought off by
my benefactor, Dr. Howard, not to appear against me,
and sent away by the trustees, who were resolved
to have no more barbarian teachers. Upon this
happy result, he declared, Dr. Howard had come to
a determination to have me back againfor why?
he was afraid the sea would be the ruin of me; and
had sent for him, John Dabs, to hunt me up and
bring me back, offering a handsome reward if he
should find me; whereupon he, the said John Dabs,
had followed me to Philadelphia, inquired for me in
vain of Mr. Bloodmoney, lost all track of me, but
stumbled upon that of my friend General Dare, who
had, the day before, left Philadelphia by the
Wilmington
road, and with whom he doubted not he
should find me; and, accordingly, taking the road
on his own horse, and making inquiries at every
stopping place, he had at last heard of me in the
stage, (sly dog, said John Dabs, not to enter it
in Philadelphia!) and so lined me straight to the
tavern, where he had me as dead as a herring, as
well as his hundred dollars from the doctor, and
something handsome from me, as he expected, for
bringing me such happy intelligence.
But this happy intelligence, which the reader may
suppose, filled me with joy and transport, did not
by any means produce the agreeable effect that Mr.
John Dabs anticipated. I had not yet forgotten the
events of the preceding night, with my reflections
thereon, and especially the resolution I had so lately
framed not to be made a dupe a second time by
mortal
man. I saw very clearly that Mr. John Dabs
was a very cunning personage, an experienced
thief-taker
,
who very well knew how to manage a
prisoner
with the least trouble to himself, by flattering
away his fears, and lulling him into a false security.
In short, I did not believe a word of his story, being
convinced, in my own secret heart, that it was a
villanous
fabrication from beginning to end, devised
for the purpose of deluding me back to New Jersey,
or to the nearest prison, like a lamb to the butcher,
unsuspicious of evil, nay, dreaming, like that woolly
representative of innocence and simplicity, only of
green leas and enamelled meadows, while capering
onwards to the slaughter-house. No, no, Mr. John
Dabs, thought I to myself, you'll not catch me
napping so easy.
Perceiving, therefore, Mr. Dabs' true drift, I was
by no means enraptured at the account he gave me;
though, after a moment's consideration, I feigned to
be. It occurred to me, moreover, that while Mr.
John Dabs was so busy cajoling me, I might profit
somewhat by playing the same game with him. So
long as he should think it proper to have me believe
I was not his prisoner, it was manifestly necessary
he should act the character rather of a friendly
emissary than a jailer, avoiding, as far as possible,
the appearance of constraining, or watching, my
motions; and, it was equally clear, that he would
allow me a longer tether, the more he was satisfied
I was the unsuspecting dupe of his cunning. I was
resolved to have him think I entertained no doubt
of his story whatever.
Acting upon this resolution, I told him I was very
glad to see him, and asked, with feigned composure,
the news from our town, and above all, how my
patron did, how Don Pedro, and howsinner that I
was that I could not name her whom I should have
most desired to hear abouthow every body else?
Oh, said Mr. John Dabs, all well enough,
except the Doctor and his daughter, Nannie; (so
the scoundrel called her:) both of whom is quite
killed up about youif they ain't I'm blowedthe
poor gal in partickilar; and they
do
say, continued
the villain, with an air of the most sympathetic
condolence
it's
all on account of her true love for
you; and old Mammy Jones, the baker's wife told
my wife Sue, `she reckoned she'd die, poor soul,
for grieving after you,' and she reckoned that was
the reason the Doctor was so mad to have you back
again.
I was so much affected at the mere thought of
Nanna being sick, that it was not until a moment or
two I remembered this was but an additional falsehood
contrived by Mr. Constable Dabs to help him in his
business of getting me safely back to New Jersey;
but when I
did
remember it, I was so much
incensed
at the freedom with which he had spoken of
her, that I longed to knock him over the head with
the chair, from which his cruel fiction had startled
me. I recovered myself, however, in an instant,
told him care killed a cat, (for which sagacious
observation I know not how to account for my using
on such an occasion, unless it was that I modestly
wished to deprecate the idea of any body dying for
me,) and then proposed to show my gratitude for
the good news he had brought me by treating him to
a bottle of wine, the best the inn could afford.
With all my heart, quoth John Dabs, but,
considering the hard ride I've had over this cruel
bad road, I don't care if you call it a quart of brandy
toddy. On my agreeing to which, Mr. Dabs got
up to ring the bell for a servant; an operation that
he repeated thrice over without the least effect, the
house being in such a hubbub of confusion that it
16*
is doubtful whether any sound would have been
noticed, short of a flourish of British trumpets, or
the sudden cannonade of besiegers.
Seeing this, I was resolved to try my hand at a
stratagem; and complaining suddenly of feeling sick
and faint, at which Mr. Dabs expressed as much
concern as if he was not engaged in the very act of
leading me to the gallows, I begged he would do
me the favour, as no servants appeared likely to
answer the bell, to step to the bar-room and order
the brandy toddy in person, together with a little
peppermint and sugar, which I had no doubt would
soon render me able to join him in discussing the
better beverage.
To this Mr. Dabs assented with the most
benevolent
readiness, and immediately, to my inexpressible
satisfaction, and almost wonder, (for I could hardly
believe the duper would allow himself to be duped
so easily,) left the room, and went down stairs,
assuring
me he would be back before I could say
Jack Robinson.
It is highly probable he kept his promise; but I
did not remain to verify that important particular.
The moment Mr. John Dabs's figure vanished from
the door, that very moment my own slipped softly
out of the window, taking a leap of some twelve or
fourteen feet, for the window was at least so high
above the street, of which, under other
circumstances
,
I should not have been at all ambitious to make
trial. But I was leaping for freedom, for life; it was
my only chance of escaping the halter, which my
rencontre with Mr. Dabs had conjured up before my
imagination, the noose already yawning for my neck.
Nor did I receive any injury from the fall, except
jarring my legs a little; though even this was an
evil that passed off, and was forgotten, in a moment.
CHAPTER XXVI.
How it appeared that Robin Day had no such great cause to plume
himself on his adroitness.
Having
reached the ground, and fortunately,
without being seen by any one, notwithstanding
that the street was full of people, I stole out of the
town, taking a course, indicated by the north-star,
(the night being extremely bright and beautiful,)
which I knew from having, before supper,
consulted
a large map that hung in the bar-room, led to
the nearest waters of the Chesapeake. The moment
I found myself clear of the crowd and the town,
and, as I could not doubt, upon the proper road, I
quickened my pace, or rather, I ran as fast as I
could, determined to leave no effort untried to
put myself out of the danger of pursuit by Mr.
John Dabs. What he had told me of my friend
Dicky Dare leaving Philadelphia by the
Wilmington
road the preceding day, convinced me I could
not be far behind my martial companion in
misfortune
;
whom I was quite certain I should find in
company with the first soldiers I might overtake on
the road; and some gallant band or other, I doubted
not, I should stumble upon before morning,
provided
I employed due diligence in my nocturnal
march. Of this diligence I felt very capable,
notwithstanding
my having had so little sleepI might
almost say, no sleep at all for so many nights in
succession
.
With Mr. John Dabs so close behind me,
I felt, and knew I should continue to feel, no
inclination
to lose a moment in rest and inaction; for,
though I had outwitted that worthy personage once,
I thought it highly improbable I should ever, if again
in his hands, have an opportunity to do so a second
time.
The consciousness, however, of having
out-generalled
this crafty individual, beaten him, an
experienced
and veteran warrior, at his own weapons, was
I may say, one of the many stimulants I had to
nerve me on to new and more manly exertions.
The reflection of my victory over him was, first,
satisfactory, as having released me from the meshes
of the law; but it was a subject of equal, if not
greater exultation, as an evidence of my own
wisdom
and address. I began to feel that my morning
resolution had completed my education, and carried
me over the last barrier between youth and
manhood
.
Yes, said I to myself, swelling with a
sense of dignity, a consciousness of resource and
importance I had not before felt, he who can
outwit
John Dabs the constable, need not fear a
conflict
with any man. Treat every man as a rogue
until he proves himself honest, and one will be sure
to escape roguery!
The only unhappiness in this case, as I may here
state, though it was a long time before I discovered
it, was, that besides duping Mr. John Dabs so
handsomely
,
I had duped another individual much more
egregiously; and that individual wasmyself. Mr.
John Dabs had, after all, told me nothing but the
truth. Instead of being sent after me, to arrest and
bear me back to prison, he was, in reality, what he
had professed, an emissary employed by my patron to
bear me the good news of M'Goggin's recovery,
and conduct me home; for, it seems, upon learning
my friend Dicky Dare had also fled, and with a
design
to play the soldier, he shrewdly suspected
Dicky would decoy me into the same enterprise,
and that something more was necessary to my
restoration
than a mere message of recall addressed to
Mr. Bloodmoney; to whom it might admit of a
question whether, under such circumstances, I would
report myself. It was, perhaps, unlucky that the
ambassador had been selected from among the
constabulatory
;
but I am not certain I should not have
been struck with quite as much terror at the
appearance
of a private messenger, any person, in truth,
coming from our town, and played him the same
trick I had practised on honest John Dabs.
And thus it happened, that my first exercise of
newborn wisdom was entirely at my own expense;
which is, I believe, the usual way in which it is
exercised; wisdom being a kind of edge-tool,
wherewith
young philosophers are more apt to cut their
own fingers than to employ it to a profitable purpose.
Had I been less sagacious, less bent upon guarding
myself from the rogueries of my species, I should
have saved myself a deal of trouble and adventure,
of affliction and peril, which I was now destined to
encounter. But I should have also lost the
opportunity
of seeing the world and gaining my experience
in the shortest possible time, as well as of arriving
at certain discoveries of no little consequence and
influence over my future fortunes.
CHAPTER XXVII.
Robin Day, after sundry alarming adventures, finds himself at
last a volunteer, and on the eve of going into battle.
I travelled
with great diligence all the night,
inspired in part by the fear of being pursued by the
truculent John Dabs, and in part by the hope of
overtaking some gallant band of patriots encamped
on the road, with perhaps General Dicky Dare
among them. In this hope I was destined to be
gratified, though, as it proved, not precisely in
manner
and form as I had fondly anticipated.
I had trudged along, perhaps, three or four hours,
passing through one or two villages, in each of
which my presence created a terrible confusion,
first, by alarming all the dogs, and thereby their
masters; all of whom, I believe in my conscience,
attributed the sudden uproar to an assault by
Admiral
Cockburn and all his vagabond banditti; when
it was my fortune to reach another little rural town,
upon the skirts of which, it happened, a band of
volunteers had made their camp around a huge
watchfire; where they were snoozing away the
night, dreaming of conquest and glory. A sentinel,
for my sins, had been stationed upon the road by
which I advanced; who, being waked out of some
vision of blood and battle by the sound of my
foot-steps
,
was seized with a direful panic, and roaring
out, The British! the British! let fly at me with
his musket, and then took to his heels, alarming his
comrades; who sprang from their beds, and fled
with equal speed and spirit, each firing off his piece,
like the sentinel, though for what purpose, unless in
hopes to do some chance execution on the assailing
foe, I never could divine.
I am sorry to say, this very unexpected reception
produced a somewhat unheroic perturbation in my
own spirits; so that I was suddenly seized with the
apprehensionnotwithstanding that the soldier's
cries very plainly declared the contrarythat I had
stumbled upon a party of invaders, instead of
Americans
;
an idea that prevailed upon me to such an
effect, that I began to run away as furiously as they;
and, to be the more certain of getting out of danger,
I sprang from the road into the fields, and thence
ran into a wood; where I was soon as thoroughly
amazed and bewildered as if buried in the depths of
a Western wilderness.
Having wandered about in this bosky refuge for
several hours, reflecting upon the adventure, I
became
,
at length, convinced I had made a mistake, in
supposing myself among the British; and, being
heartily sick of the woods, as well as excessively
fatigued, I resolved to extricate myself as fast as I
could, look up some farm-house, and beg shelter and
a bed for the remainder of the night.
From the wood I succeeded in escaping, and a
farm-house I was lucky enough to find; but there
ended my good fortune; for besides being direfully
barked at by dogs, that seemed only waiting their
master's orders to tear me to pieces, I had no sooner
come within pistol-shot of the house than up flew
the windows, and out came the contents of some six
or seven muskets, fired at me by as many heroic
in-mates
;
whom I could hear calling to one another, in
an ecstasy of patriotic fury, to defend the house to
the last extremity. This dreadful volley was
followed
by an immediate charge of the dogs, by whom
I was driven, with loss, from the field, and compelled
to ascend a tree; where, though out of reach of the
animals, who kept up a dismal barking below, I was
in momentary expectation of dying the death of a
tree'd
bearthat is, of being followed, and shot
down, by some of those ardent worthies, the
defenders
of the house.
To prevent a catastrophe so imminent, I fell to
work with my penknife, the only weapon in my
possession, and cut me off a huge bough from the
tree; with which I descended, nerved to desperation,
among my canine besiegers; and, charging them with
great intrepidity, knocking one over the head, and
breaking the leg of a second, besides dealing a world
of lesser injuries around, I had the good fortune to
put them entirely to rout, and thus secure an
undisturbed
retreat.
I had now little difficulty in making my way to
a highroad, though without being able to say
whether or not it was the one I had left, when
repulsed from the village. To add to my difficulties
the sky became now so overcast with clouds, that I
could no longer determine the points of the compass,
and knew not in which direction I ought to proceed.
My adventures in the village and at the farm-house
had not cooled my desire to reach the scene of
action
on the Chesapeake; indeed, I had no other
resource; and the hopes of finding my friend Dicky
Dare, without whose advice and assistance I felt it
next to impossible to tread aright the dangerous paths
of glory, were enough of themselves to urge me on.
But how to proceed was now the question; to solve
which I took a seat upon a stump at the roadside;
where, at the first effort to call up my thoughts, being
inexpressibly worn and wearied, I fell sound asleep.
The two previous nights, as I have already
mentioned
,
were passed almost wholly without sleep;
and the present made, as I may say, the third in
which I had not closed my eyes; for, I believe,
it was well nigh dawn when I dropped asleep.
Sound, dead, and long, therefore, were my
slumbers
;
and it was not until many hours after the sun
had risen that I again opened my eyes, and rose
from the sod, whereon (for I had rolled, in my
sleep, off the stump,) I certainly enjoyed as pleasant
a nap as I had ever known in my life.
I was wakened by sounds the most agreeable, at
that time, that could fall upon my ears; they were
bursts of military music, the roll of a distant drum,
that accompanied a fife, breathing out the
spirit-stirring
notes of Yankee Doodle.
Bravo! said I, kindling with joy and
enthusiasm
;
I shall now be a volunteer; and Mr. John
Dabs, and cowardly villagers, and barking dogs,
and their crazy masters, may all go to the  it
is no matter to whom.
I followed the sounds; and, by and by, I caught
sight of the martial band from which they proceeded,
consisting of no more than ten or twelve persons in
all, whose odd appearance and equipments, struck
me with amazement. Their dresses were by no
means military, no two being decked precisely alike;
some had long coats, some jackets, and some neither
jacket nor coat; but most of them had scarfs, or
what were meant for scarfs, of all imaginable hues,
red, yellow, green, bluetied about their loins, and
a few had even additional ones wrapped round their
hats. Their arms were as various as their
accoutrements
each
Vol. I.17
man having a hanger at his side, and a
belt stuck full of pistols, besides guns; of which
there seemed a plentiful variety, some marching
with one on each shoulder, like so many Robinson
Crusoes. As for their march I never saw any thing
so disorderly, every man stalking along as best
pleased himself, and all swearing, talking, whistling,
singing in a manner wonderful to observe. Their
officersand I almost doubted, at first, whether
they had anyseemed to be but two in number,
and were distinguishable only by being more
obstreperous
than their followers; at least, the man
who marched at their head swore with a louder
voice and greater volubility than any one else;
except
a second worthy personage, who carried a
banner
of a very odd appearance, which, indeed, I
afterwards
found was an old red flannel petticoat, and
seemed to aim at rivalry in profanity with the other.
I immediately saw, or thought I saw, that this,
instead of being a band of regular soldiers, or
disciplined
volunteers, was a company of mere
militia-men
got together in a hurry, and stuffed with Dutch
courage for the occasion, having quaffed, along with
the gallantry that swims in the bottle, a deal of the
folly and perverseness that lie at the bottom. This
was a great disappointment to me, as I should have
preferred to unite my fate with some company of
soldiers in handsome uniform; but I thought it was
not much matter with what corps I began my
campaign
,
seeing I should soon, as I hoped, transfer my
services to anotherto that, whichever it might be,
honoured by the presence of my friend Dickey Dare.
Having solaced myself with this reflection, I
advanced
towards the warriors; who, at sight of me,
began to make some demonstrations of hostility,
such as it had been my luck already twice to meet,
during the last eight hours; that is, they drew, some
of them, their swords and pistols, while others
leveled
their guns, as if about to blow or hew me to
atoms; a catastrophe that was averted partly by
their commander dg their eyes for being so ready
to fight without his orders, (which reproof, by the
way, was immediately echoed, in the same tones,
by the knight of the petticoat,) and partly by
myself
calling out, with great energy, that I was a
friend.
Friend be ddthat isfriend, advance; quoth
the commander; an injunction which I immediately
obeyed, though with somewhat of fear and
trembling
.
And now I observed, as I drew nigh, that my
redoubtable warriors, who were three-fourths of
them, at least, in a very soldierly condition, and the
other fourth hastening to become so by frequent and
open application to sundry gourds, canteens, and
black bottles, that were circulating among them, had
taken as good care of the main chance in the second
particular as the first, being quite as well provided
with meat as with liquor. There was scarce a man of
them that had not in his hand, or upon his back,
something wherewithal to meet the exigencies of
hunger; some bore fowls, some little pigs, some
sheep, and one tall fellow was staggering under a
hindquarter
of beef, that looked like a gate of Gaza on
his shoulders. Even the magnificent captain himself
was as well burthened as any of his men, having a
garland of young chickens hung round his neck, and
a bundle of screaming guinea-fowls hanging from
his sashwhich sash, by the way, bore to my eyes
a prodigious resemblance to a woman's shawl, or
some other article of female apparel. And, indeed,
the same might be said of the brilliant girdles and
hatbands that adorned the persons of the others, who
seemed to me to have borrowed largely of their
wives and daughters, to complete their equipments.
The captain received me with a stare of mingled
wrath and solemnity, and demanded, with a
dreadful
hickup, and still more dreadful oath, who I
was.
Sir, said I, with as much dignity as I could
assume, though somewhat confounded at the strange
receptionmy name is Robin Day; and I have
come to volunteer my humble assistance in this
glorious
service.
Glorious, by G! cried the commander; never
was on such a chicken-eating campaign in my life;
chickens to fight, and chickens to eatand oxen and
assen, and piggen and sheepen, andBut, curse me,
there's no time for gabble. Well, sir, dn my eyes,
consider yourself a prisoner of war.
A prisoner, sir! said I, amazed; I come to
volunteer.
Oh, ay! you do? quoth the officer, recollecting
himself. Well then,here he flung a bundle of
chickens on my shouldershang on to the roosters
and fall in.
Sir, said I, hastily, if you will give me a
sword and a musket, I should much prefer
Oh, you would, would you? cried the captain,
turning, with a hickup, to his men:Here, you Black
Jack, or Tom Spike, or some of you, dn my eyes,
han't you a reefer's toothpick, or a barking iron, or
some such bloody piece of business, for the young
un?
Just the thing to sarve him, my eyes! cried a
one-eyed sailor-looking fellow, clapping on my
shoulder a gun some eight or ten feet long, a huge
ducking piece, such as I had heard fowlers used, but
without dreaming it was ever so horribly big and
heavy. Just the thing to a ropeyarn, said the
one-eyed man, grinning as I embraced, with no
good will, the gigantic weapon, nearly twice as long
as myself;could'nt fit better, my eyes! if you'd
been measured for it by the tailor.
Hold your jaw, Sam Slack, quoth the captain,
eyeing me with such an approving look of drunken
gravity that I felt tempted to beg permission to
exchange
my unwieldy weapon for another of more
appropriate size, as also to hint a dignified desire to
get rid of the chickens; a request that was, however,
prevented by the martialist exclaiming, I likes
them that's gentlemen, and has the game in them.
But, I say, shipmate, hang on to the roosters!
Then turning to his followers, he gave the word of
command to resume the marchAttention!
Starboard
your helm;right about wheelmarch.
Strike up, music; let's have a little more of Yankee
Doodle.
With that, the music struck up, my gallant
captain
waddled forward, his Falstaff regiment followed
at his heels, and I, who had been assigned no
particular
place, and therefore marched, as I stood, at the
commander's side, trudged along in equal time,
wondering
much at my brothers in arms, and perhaps
quite as much at myself for having taken service
with them.
It struck me, that these gallant personages, from
the captain down, had much more of a nautical than
military character about them, their dress and speech
alike smacking of salt water. But this did not appear
very surprising, considering the country where we
were, the shores of a vast navigable bay or arm of
the sea; and, besides, the ravages of the enemy, it
might be supposed, had driven on shore the crews
17*
of all the bay vessels, who would very naturally
band together to resist his further encroaches on the
land. I must confess, however, I was greatly
perplexed
by many odd expressions that fell from these
amphibious heroes; whose destination, as well as
other interesting particulars in relation to them, I
became very desirous to learn, and addressed myself
to the commander accordingly. The answer I got
was a command to hold my peace and hang on to
the roosters, accompanied with a look of authority
I durst not dispute.
CHAPTER XXVIII.
Robin Day's first battle; with a surprising discovery which he
makes in the midst of it.
So
I held my peace, and the chickens, assumed a
bold military step, and marched onwards with my
new comrades, until a turn of the road brought us
suddenly in view of a broad river, and a village of
some ten or a dozen houses standing on its banks.
Among these, we could perceive the glimmer of
arms and military uniforms, and a banner waving in
the wind over the heads of a company of soldiers,
drawn up on the borders of the river, evidently to
receive a fleet of armed boats that was seen, at no
great distance, ascending the tide with all the force
of oars. At the same time, I perceived five or six
companies similar to our own, but most of them more
numerous, and some of them of a much more orderly
and soldier-like appearance, marching from different
points, over the fields, towards the village, one of
which immediately effected a junction with us, its
conductor, of superior rank to our own leader,
assuming
the command over us, and uniting us to his
own company. He signalised his authority by
dning his subordinate's eyes, and telling him he
was drunk; by pronouncing the company a set of
lubbers and horse-marines; by thwacking the knight
of the petticoat over the back with the flat of his
sword for calling him
Swabs
, and offering him, with
drunken generosity, a sop from a black bottle which
he produced; and finally, turning to me, he
demanded
very magisterially, who I was, and what the
devil I was doing with my long nine, (meaning the
duck gun,) at the head of the company, marching
like a bullfrog under a bean-pole?
I replied, as I had done before, that I was a
volunteer; at which he looked surprised, and was
about to ask me further questions; when the sudden
report of a musket from the village, answered by a
lusty hurrah from the boats, and from some of the
companies on shore, put other matters into his mind;
and he hastily exclaimed, addressing especially my
disorderly brothers-in-arms, Now, you drunken
blackguards, fight like bulldogs, or I'll marry you to
the gunner's daughter, every man of you. There's
the enemy in the town, already banging at us, d'ye
see; and there are the boats, trying to overhaul the
raggamuffins before us, d'ye see; give wayquick
step; make ready for a broadside, and carry the ship
by boarding.
With these words, he drew his sword, and
putting
himself at our head, led the way gallantly
towards
the town; in which example he was imitated
by the leaders of the other companies, all of them,
as I now observed, quickening their march, as if
to see which should first reach the field of battle.
The words of my new commander filled me with
confusion. I had, all along, supposed we were
marching to the town, to reinforce its defenders, and
repel the British, then approaching against it in
boats. What did my commander mean by calling
the village troops the enemy? and what did
they
mean by firingor in his eloquent phraseology
banging at us? for, it seemed, the musket shot had
been aimed at us.
As these questions occurred to me, I gave another
look to the town, which we were now approaching
at charging speed, and perceived that the flag,
waving
over the heads of its defenders, was starred and
stripedthat is, an American flag: there was no
mistaking that, for our leader called attention to it
by crying, There goes the gridirongive 'em a
sight of the red bunting! I looked round upon
the banner which was immediately displayed over
our own heads; and, horror of horrors, it bore the
bloody cross of Britain!
Our commander noted my looks of confusion, and
exclaimed, with great ire, waving his sword as if
about to cut me down, but without relaxing his
steps,What! you cowardly rascal! is that the
way you volunteer to fight the enemies of your king
and country? Fight bravely, you dog, or I'll slice
you to pieces!
Sir, said I, in great distress, I have made a
mistakeI have volunteered
on the wrong side!
Which was no more than true, as I now clearly
perceived, having, in my great hurry to enter upon
the glorious life of a patriot soldier, taken service
along with a band of maraudersforaging sailors,
whom I had mistaken for soldiers, and, worse than
all, for American militia-men.
But the error was now irretrievable. Business
was waxing thick and hot on my commander's hands;
the enemythat is,
his
enemy, not minewere
nigh at hand, and shots began to be fired from
various
quarters; the scent of gunpowder was in his
nostrils, and the savour of plunder on his lips; and
to my piteous exclamation, I was on the wrong
side, he deigned no other reply than a hasty
Dn the differencefight away like a brave
fellow
;adding
to my comrades, Now men, give
them a shot, and at 'em like bulldogs!
Bangbang went twenty guns about my ears,
and I immediately felt myself borne towards the
village by a rush of my companions, among whom
I was swept, whether I would or not, receiving,
every now and then, the prick of a bayonet or
cutlass
in the back from some hasty brother-in-arms,
by which my steps were wonderfully accelerated.
In short, I marched into the village; which being
speedily cleared of its defenders, though
how
I
never knew, being too much frightened to make
any observations on the action, was taken possession
of, plundered, set in flames, and then immediately
evacuated; the victors embarking in the boats with
their plunder and my unlucky self, whom the
strangeness of the adventure, left still overwhelmed
with amazement and terror.
CHAPTER XXIX.
How, by a second exercise of his new-born wisdom, Robin Day
escapes a terrible difficulty. He meets two old friends, and has a
controversy with Skipper Duck.
I found
myself, as soon as I had collected my
wits sufficiently to look around me, crammed into
a barge, with as many of my new companions
in-arms
,
and as much plunder of various kinds, as the
boat would hold. At my side was the valiant
personage
,
the supposed captain of militia, to whom I
had first offered my patriotic services, and who now
wore a tattered handkerchief round his jaws, in
token they had received some damage in the action;
and in the stern was his superior, our gallant leader,
now in command of the boat. Around us, were
other boats, forming quite a fleet, all as much
crowded
and deeply laden as our own, and all rapidly
descending the river towards a squadron of armed
schooners and shallops, which were seen at anchor
some six or seven miles below.
The sight of these vesselsprizes picked up in
the bay, and now employed in ravaging its inmost
nooks and corners, in whichonce embarked in
themI knew not to what further warlike
expeditions
against my own countrymen I might be led,
filled me with desperation; and I immediately
desired
the commander's attention to my case, by
assuring him, as before, that I had made a mistake,
of which, I told him, it was my opinion, he
could not, as a gentleman, take advantage; and,
therefore, I expected he would immediately set me
ashore.
Hah! cried the commander, I remember
you; fought like a born devilhighly approve of
your spiritdid n't think it was in you. Butnow
I think of ityou are a volunteer, hah? Who are
you, and where did you come from?
Sir, said I, my name is Robin Day; I am not
a volunteerat least not on your side. I have
made a mistake, sirI am an American.
The devil you are! quoth the officer, staring
at me with astonishment; while my late leader
opened his bandaged jaws to give utterance to a
horse-laugh, in which he was joined by all the boat's
crew, and to the exclamation, Here's a Johnny
Raw, dn my eyes!
Hold your jaw, Tom Gunner, you drunken
jackass;and you, men, mind your eyes, dn
me! quoth the commander, irefully. He gave
me another stare as full of surprise as the first,
reechoed
my confessionAn American! and then
turned to Tom Gunner, to resolve the riddle:
Here, you lubber, he cried, what means all
this? Where did you pick up the younker?
'Long shore, said Tom Gunner, with a hiccup;
came a volunteering for his king and country
grabbed roosters like a weasel, and fought the enemy
like a tomcat! Says he to me, says hehiccup
says he to me, `Captain,' (for, d'ye see, my eyes!
he takes me for a commodore:) says he to me, says
hehe did, lieutenant, by G! And here the
worthy speaker came to a stand, admiring at the
wonderfulness of my communication; of which,
however, he forgot he had not related one word.
Hark you, Sam Slack, quoth the officer,
turning
to the one-eyed man, from whom I had received
the long nine, you are the only man of the
boatswain's
gang not as drunk as himself:how did you
come by the young fellow?
Sir, said I, waxing impatient, I can tell you
that myself, as welland, indeed, much better than
he can. I am an American, as I said before: I
came down here to fight the enemies of my country;
and happening by accident upon this gentleman and
his company,(Gentleman! quoth Tom
Gunner
,
with a nod of humorous wonder, what the
h will he make of me next, I axes!)I say,
sir, I continued, stumbling upon this person and
his company, playing Yankee Doodle on a drum
and fife(Picked 'em up in a ditch, where they
were dropped by a company of milishy, then under
full sail on the lee beam, standing No'th East half
East, murmured Mr. Gunner:)I say, sir, I had
the misfortune to be deceived in their characterto
take them for a company of American militia-men;
(Take me for a milishy-man! quoth Tom
Gunner
my
eyes, what will become of me!)
Upon which, sir, I volunteered my services. Nor
did I discover the error, sir, until the moment of
going into battle.
Upon my soul, said the commander, do you
expect me to believe all this cock-and-a-bull story!
An American, hah! discovery of error before going
into battle, hah! Why, did not I see you, with my
own eyes, fight the Americans with the greatest
spirit
in the world?
If I did sir, said I, it was because I was
frightened out of my senses: at which words,
uttered
with the earnestness of truth, the lieutenant
burst into a laugh, then swore at the men for
imitating
Vol. I.18
his example, and ended by asking me, with
much gravityAnd so, sir, because you made a
mistakemistaking a company of his Britannic
Majesty's naval forces for a gang of ragamuffin
American
militia, (and, curse me, I don't think, just now,
the mistake very unnatural,)you expect me to put
you ashore?
Certainly, sir, said I, you can't, as a
gentleman
,
refuse to do so.
I'll be hang'd if I can't though, said the
officer
:
Having once volunteered to take arms in his
majesty's service
But, said I, interrupting him, I never
did
volunteer to take arms for his majesty: it was in the
service of my own country. And sir, I added,
with suitable spirit, I won't consent to be
considered
a volunteer any longer.
You won't? quoth the lieutenant. Well then,
do me the favour to know your placeto hold your
tongue, and consider yourself a prisoner of war; for
one or the other you area volunteer, sir, or a
prisoner
of war.
A prisoner of war! It needed not the solemn and
severe look with which the commander pronounced
the word, to fill me with consternation. I had often
heard of British prison-ships: my whole life, as I
may say, had been passed in view of those waters on
which, in the days of the Revolution, these floating
Bastiles had acquired their terrible notoriety; and I had
known several old soldiers of the War of
Independence
,
who, having been confined in them, had many
a dismal tale to tell of the miseries of such captivity.
As a prisoner of war, I perceived I must be
immediately
thrust into some horrible hulk, to roast and
freeze, to hunger and thirst, to pine for air, to
languish
in fetters, to be tyrannised over by all hands,
to be carried over the seas afar from my country and
friendsin short, to be the most miserable creature
in the world.
To escape this odious fate now became an object
which I cast over in my mind with desperate
energy
and haste; for there was no time to be lost. Once
received on board a British ship, a prisoner of war,
all, I foresaw, must be over with me; escape would
then be hopeless. A brilliant prospect struck my
mind, and instantly dispelled the clouds of despair
which had been gathering upon it. Received as a
volunteer, I should, of course, escape fetters and
tyrannical
usage; and, what was of much greater
consequence
,
I should be sent ashore with the rest, to
burn villages and attack farm yards, or, (which was
my way of viewing it,) while my comrades were
thus engaged, to give them the slip, and so achieve
my liberty. The idea captivated my mind in a
moment
;
and turning to the lieutenant, I hastily assured
him, I had changed my mind, and begged he would
consider me a volunteer as before, as I was
determined
to live a life of glory. And upon his
expressing
a little wonder at my willingness to fight
the Americans, my own countrymen, I gave him
to understand, it was doubtful whether I could claim
them as such; it not being at all certain that I was
born in the country. Nay, I even informed him of
my late adventure with M'Goggin the schoolmaster,
to convince him I had the best reasons possible to
avoid returning to the Americans.
I am sorry to say, the gentleman did not seem to
consider the killing of a schoolmaster any very
heinous offence; on the contrary, he was extremely
diverted at the affair, swore I was a lad of mettle,
and that he would protect me against the universal
Yankee nation. Finally, he declared I should be
received as a volunteer in his own ship, and, by and
by, recommended to the admiral for a
commission
;
provided I should signalize my courage, at the
next excursion on shore, as handsomely as, he
declared
,
I had already done. I discovered I had
made a favourable impression upon his mind; and I
must say he made as satisfactory an one upon mine,
being a good-humoured, pleasant personage, who
seemed to take an interest in my affairs, of which
he questioned me a good deal, besides laughing
heartily at every thing I said.
Our conversation lasted until we reached the fleet
of small vessels anchored below; in one of which,
a miserable, old, and dirty looking shallop, I was
disappointed to find the ship into which I was to
be received a volunteer, under the immediate
command
of my new friend. He pointed her out, as
we approached, declaring, by way of commendation,
she was the best oysterboat on the bay.
I looked up to her, and rubbed my eyes to dispel
a dream that seemed suddenly to have seized upon
my mind. Nothing could be more familiar than
the appearance of the vessel, which, in a moment,
conjured up remembrances that had long slumbered,
and, indeed, been for a time entirely lost.
Methought
I saw before me the notorious Jumping
Jenny, that identical vile bark, in which I had passed
so many years of childhood and suffering; and to
make the illusion more perfect, I beheld, sitting upon
the bowsprit, as she swung by her anchor, the figure
of a boy, as ragged and uncouth as boy could be,
engaged in that very occupation, the last I had been
condemned to in the Jumping Jennythat is to
say, plucking a goose, and dropping its feathers idly
over the tide. I saw, methought, not merely my
eidolon
, or
alter ego
, but
myself
, such as I had
been, five years before; and so strongly did the
feeling
of identification possess me, that I, for an instant,
fairly took to myself, and blushed and trembled at,
the jeering notices, which several of our drunken
boat's crew took of the hero of the bowsprit as we
approached, and found myself involuntarily
dodging
,
in anticipation of the shower of pebbles and
oystershells, which, I felt, was necessary to give the
last finish of reality to the scene.
A second look, however, showed me that my
representative was a much bigger and older boy
than I had been, at the epoch of the gander-pulling;
and he presently showed that, with all his squalid
looks, he was not deficient in a kind of savage spirit,
such as I, certainly, had never possessed, nor,
indeed
,
any spirit at all, while under the dominion of
Skipper Duck. To the gibes of the sailors he made
immediate response, by invoking all kinds of coarse
and puerile maledictions on their heads; when,
having
thus vented his indignation, he fell to work
again upon the goose, leaving us to enter the vessel
without further scolding.
We jumped, accordingly, aboard, where the
appearances
of things called up still more vividly the
recollections
of my own unhappy childhood: I could
have sworn I again trod the deck of the Jumping
Jenny. And, indeed, I had not been half a minute
on board, when full confirmation of the suspicion was
furnished by the sudden appearance of no less a man
than the veritable Skipper Duck himself, my horrible
tyrant, whom I immediately recognised, and, I
believe, by mere instinct, for five years had wrought
many changes in his visage and person. What fury
possessed me at the moment I hardly know: perhaps
the recollections, thus renewed, of his former
barbarities
,
awakened the desire for vengeance; and
perhaps the desperation of my present circumstances
18*
had a share in the excitement; but certain it is, no
sooner had this amiable personage, in obedience to
the call of the lieutenantHere, pilot, skipper,
where the devil are you? made his appearance, than,
driven by an irresistible impulse, I flew at him, and
with the words, Now, you scoundrel, I'll pay you
up for old times, and some half a dozen cuffs,
applied
with all my strength, laid him sprawling on the
deck.
Hurrah for
you
, Mister! cried my
representative
,
rushing from the bowsprit to my side, goose in
hand, and looking half frantic with delightthat's
the way to serve himgive him a little more!
I will, said I, fortified by such encouragement,
and squared off to give the Skipper, amazed and
confounded
at such an attack, the rising blow; when my
commander, as much astonished as Duck, but still
vastly diverted, bade me (after first kicking the lad
of the goose out of the way,) hold, and asked
what I meant by beating the king's friends, after
volunteering to fight his enemies?
Sir, said I, this man is the biggest villain in
America, and treated me like a dog when I was a
little boy.
I! said Skipper Duck, wiping the blood from
his nose, and admiring its ruddy appearance on his
thumb; I! ejaculated the rascal with meek and
submissive astonishment; I never seed the young
gentleman before in my life.
What, you thief! said I, don't you recollect
Robin Day?
Robin Day! cried he, giving me a look of
surprise
,
then of surly resentment: Very well, little
Cock Robin, I won't forget you! With which
words, he sneaked away, and I saw no more of him.
The lieutenant now invited me into the cabin
that dog-hole in which I had so often played the
part of a menial and slaveto inquire a little more
into my history; and I gave him a full account of all
Skipper Duck's behaviour; upon which he
commented
by laughing very heartily, and by declaring that
Skipper Duck deserved all I had given him, and
something more into the bargain. As for his
cruelty
,
said he, they tell me, he used to treat boy
Tomthat's the cook boy with the goose, his
'prentice
just
as savagely: but Tom's a devil, and
deserves
a rope's end every watchand, upon my
soul, I believe he get's it. I asked him how
Skipper
Duck came to be in the British service; upon
which, he told me they had captured his vessel; and
the Skipper, preferring a handsome reward, and the
hope of having his shallop, by and by, restored to
him, to remaining a prisoner of war, or being set
ashore a pennyless beggar, had accepted a situation
as pilot, being well acquainted with all the
Chesapeake
waters.
What a traitorous villain! thought I to myself,
and would have said it, had it not immediately
occurred
to me that any such expression of virtuous
indignation would look suspicious, coming from me
in my present circumstances. But I resolved in
my heart, some time or other, to have Skipper Duck
hanged for high treason.
My commander having asked me all the questions
he thought proper, first as to my own affairs, and
then in relation to the villages on some of the
neighbouring waters, of which, however, I soon
satisfied him I knew nothing, now gave me to
understand
,
that as a volunteer taking arms in his
Majesty's service, it was expedient I should be
taught the use of arms; for which purpose, greatly
to my disappointment, for I expected he would
have invited me to dinner, which boy Tom was
now laying on the table, gave me in charge of a
man in a red-coatI believe a marinewho was
exercising the sailors on the deck, and teaching
them a more scientific use of their legs and muskets
than they naturally possessed, all, doubtless, to fit
them more advantageously for the land-service, on
which they were to be employed. And in this kind
of exercise, stopping only for a time to eat our
dinners
,
(I, to my great dudgeon, being obliged to mess
with the men, as a person of no greater consideration
than themselves,) we continued for several hours
during the afternoon; when a boat coming on board
with a message to the lieutenant, we were ordered
to go below and turn inthat is, go to bedand
snatch a little sleep, previous to embarking on a
new enterprise, to be undertaken some time during
the night.
I felt my dignity again outraged by being
compelled
to sleep in the common hold among the men,
and thought that my friend the lieutenant was not
treating me in the most gentlemanly manner in the
world; but the prospect of going on shore, and so
effecting my escape, reconciled me to the wrong,
and I lay down on the hard planks of the hold (for
not a bit of a bed had I,) with great resignation,
and straightway fell fast asleep, dreaming of
prison-ships
all the time.
CHAPTER XXX.
Robin Day distinguishes himself at the attack on Havre-de-Grace,
and meets with a misfortune.
I was
roused from my sleep at last by my new
acquaintance and late captain, Tom Gunner, who
undoubtedly held some petty office on board the
ship, but what it was I never knew; and, indeed I
am equally unaware what was the true rank and
title of my friend the lieutenant, though I suspect
he was nothing more than a midshipman. And
here I may as well confess a greater ignorance of
all naval and nautical matters than would seem
becoming
in one who drew his first breath on the sea,
spent his childhood in an oyster-boat, foughtor
servedsix weeks as a volunteer in the British
Navy, and smelt powder inbut I must not
anticipate
my story. The truth is, as I suspect, my early
experience gave me a disgust to the sea and its
affairs
;
and, although I have since tried to dive a
little into their mysteries, it was all labour lost, and
I find myself still as ignorant as ever. This will
explain, and, I hope, excuse, the errors into which
I may fall, in treating of these passages and branches
of my existence.
I was waked by Tom Gunner, who told me to
get up and be dd, and intimated we were going
to attack a town (it was the town of Havre de Grace,
at the head of the Chesapeake,) and that I was to
have the honour of fighting in a barge under the
command of my lieutenant. I got up, accordingly,
and going upon deck, which was already swarming
with men, was struck with the novelty of the
spectacle
that awaited me. It was not yet day, although
the dawn was not far off, so that objects were but
dimly discernible. I perceived, first, that we were
under sail, but making way very slowly, there being
scarcely any wind; and, next, that we had, during
the time I was asleep, exchanged a river of half a
mile wide for one of at least ten times the
magnitude
,
with bold shores looming duskily up in the
distance; and, finally, that our fleet had grown to
thrice the number of vessels, some of which,
following
at a distance behind, were large ships.
As we proceeded onwards, the day began to
break, and I saw, some miles off, the indications of
a town or village; which having approached within
a mile or two, the fleet came to anchor, and orders
were given to man the boats. I descended, with a
heart beating betwixt fear and hope, into the barge
that already lay beside the Jumping Jenny, and
which now received the same crew of heroes, with
whom I had so unluckily distinguished myself the
preceding day.
Our commander having also entered the boat, we
lay upon our oars for a few moments waiting the
signal to proceed. It was given at last by a
sudden
discharge of great guns from the ships of war,
the thunder of which, with the patterings of the iron
balls about their ears, were, I believe, the first
intimation
the sleeping villagers had of the presence of
the enemy. The horrible uproar of so many
cannons
shot off nigh at hand, and the dreadful sheets
of flame bursting from the black sides of the ships,
threw me into a great panic, which was not much
diminished when our commander gave the word to
proceed against the village;Give way, my
hearties
,
he cried; we shall have something better to
pick, in yon doghole, than ducks and chickens!
The men responded with loud cheers, which were
now heard proceeding from all quarters; for a great
many barges like our own were on the water; and
the rowers addressing themselves to their oars, we
were soon rapidly approaching the devoted town.
But as we drew nigh, we noticed certain
appearances
,
which convinced us that the villagers,
however
astounded at the salute we had given them,
were not inclined to receive their visitors, without
returning the compliments of the morning. And,
first, we perceived a great body of them running
hastily down to the beach before the town, where
stood three or four strange looking objects; which,
at that distance and in the uncertain light of the
morning, I could not make out: nor, I presume
should I have had the least idea of their character, had
not Tom Gunner suddenly ripped out an oath, and
declared the bloody villains, (meaning the
towns-people
,)
had cannon, and were going to give us a
salvo.
And, true enough, the words were scarce out of
his mouth, when bang went a piece, and a cannon
ball striking the river hard by our boat, which was
one of the headmost, dashed a shower of water in
my face, by which I was greatly frightened,
thinking
at first it was my life's blood all let loose. This
salute, as it did, I believe, no damage to any in the
fleet of boats, only served the purpose of inflaming
the martial ardour of all. The officers dd their
souls, the men cheered, and rowed onwards with
redoubled vigour; so that, in a few moments, we
reached the water's edge and sprang ashore.
Previous
to this, however, we received several other
discharges; the wonder of which was that they were
all fired by a single man; who, suddenly deserted
by his townsman, that had been scared off by the
noise of their own gun, stuck valiantly to the pieces,
fired them off at us, one after the other, and was
even seen, without any assistance, to recharge and
refire them; until our sudden jumping ashore, and a
volley of small arms let fly at him, compelled him to
beat a retreat.
But even then, his flight was conducted in most
heroic order, facing his enemies all the while, with
a musket, which he fired; then loaded, as he
retreated
,
and fired again. Charge upon the rascalrun
him down, quoth the lieutenant; who, having had
the honour first to reach the shore, paused a moment
to form his men, which he found no easy task in the
face of so determined a foe. At that moment, I
still in mortal affright, yet thinking of nothing but
escapetook to my heels, and ran up the street, along
which the intrepid defender of the town was backing
at his leisure, having no desire so great as to reach
him and put his heroic defence betwixt me and the
invaders. As I had had a musket put into my hands,
which I still carried, holding on to it rather from
instinct
than inclination, and unfortunately forgot in
my hurry to inform him of my peaceable intentions,
it is not extraordinary, when I approached him,
which, running at a great rate, I soon did, that his
reception of me proved any thing but friendly. In
fact, I had no sooner come within reach of his arm,
than, clubbing his musket, and exclaiming, with a
strongly Irish accent, Surrender, ye villian; which
I should have been very happy to do, had he let me,
he fetched me a terrible blow over the head, by
which I was felled to the ground, and left
insensible
.
And so ended, for that day, my hopes of flight,
as well as my share in the martial events that
followed
;
of which I have no further knowledge (and that
acquired afterwards from others,) than that the town
was taken, plundered, set in flames, and then, in due
course of time abandoned by the magnanimous
victors
.
Vol. I.19
CHAPTER XXXI.
Containing an account of Robin Day's successor in the Jumping
Jenny, and who he was.
When
I recovered my wits, I found myself again in
the Jumping Jenny, lying sick and sore in a bunk,
surrounded
by sailors, who were, however, attending to
their own affairs, without at all concerning themselves
with me. And thus, sick and sore, among the sailors in
the hold of the Jumping Jenny, I may say at once, to
shorten my story, I remained for several weeks,
having
received such a hurt from the patriotic
Hibernian
as required all the strength of a naturally sturdy
constitution to carry me through with life. And
this was doubtless fortunate, as it prevented my
taking
a share, as otherwise I must have done, in those
other forays against the villages of my countrymen,
by which the British warfare in the Chesapeake
continued
to be distinguished.
I received two or three visits from a surgeon
belonging
to the fleet, who was a very humane
personage
,
and told me my wounds were not, as I
apprehended
,
of any very great account, considering my
youth and hardy constitution; and once, also, I was
visited by my friend the lieutenant, who asked me
how I fared, swore I was a brave dog, and
vowed
he intended to recommend me to the admiral for
a commission, in reward of my gallant behaviour
at the taking of the Irishman; for, it seemed, he had
mistaken my sudden rush from his crew for an
outpouring
of valour, an attack actually upon the
bloody-minded
defender of the village. It was none of my
business to undeceive him in the matter, and I took
care not to do so. After this, I saw no more of him,
nor do I believe he ever more troubled his head about
me.
In the midst of this universal neglect, which
greatly lowered my opinion of my own importance,
as well as of the dignity and profit of volunteering
in his majesty's service, I perceived many
manifestations
of good will in a quarter from which I never
should have expected itnamely, from boy Tom,
whom I have already called my representative, as
filling in the Jumping Jenny the same unhappy
office
of football and slave of all work, once filled by
me. It soon appeared, that I had won his affections,
oras he was too much such an insensate clod as I
had once been, to have any affections to winthat I
had made some sort of agreeable impression on his
instincts, by beating his tyrant, the detestable Duck.
Indeed, I remember, the first time he made his
appearance
at my bedside, or the first time my
returning
consciousness allowed me to observe him, and
hear him speak, that his first words to me,
pronounced
with an accent of mingled eagerness and
encouragement, wereI say, mister, when you
gits well, you'll give him a little more of it, won't
you?words which he repeated, or something to
the same effect, at every visitation, until I began to
understand the drift of them.
He was, to appearance, a boy of twelve or
thirteen
years old; but allowing for the effects of
Skipper Duck's brutality, which I could well
appreciate
,
I had no doubt he was in reality three or four
years older. His figure was short and squat, but
somewhat robust, looking all the bigger, however,
for being bagged up in some of Skipper Duck's cast
garments. His visage was not in itself
unhandsome
,
having quite regular and rather delicate
features
;
but it was so begrimed with dirt and smoke,
and set in such a mop of hair, that seemed never to
have known scissors or comb, and there was withal
an expression in it of a spirit so mulish and savage
and stupid, that no one would have thought of
calling it otherwise than ugly. Such a spirit was
indicated also by his conversation, which was full
of oaths and ignorance, and by his behaviour, which
to all, saving perhaps myself, on board the Jumping
Jenny, was full of perverseness, obstinacy, and
enmity
.
He seemed, indeed, a son of Ishmael among
them; all men's handsand, I may add, feetwere
against him; he was a butt upon whom all seemed
to take a malicious pleasure in venting sarcasms and
buffets, which he requited with abuses, and, where
he durst, with blows. All swore, boy Tom
possessed
the spirit of a devila dumb devil, as
Tom Gunner called it;but, I believe they had
beaten it into him.
The attentions of this little wretch, who played
the part of a rude nurse, while I lay sick, and
brought me daily my physic and food, together with
the striking similarity betwixt his condition as it
was, and mine as it had been, begot in me a species
of interest, which increased from day to day, and
was still further augmented by a suspicion that came
over me, I could not tell how, that there was more
than a resemblancethat there was some kind of
connection between his fate and mine. I employed
a portion of the leisure, of which I had more than
enough, while on my back, in speculating on the
peculiarities of his character, and the causes which
had moulded it into what it was.
And first, it appeared to me that boy Tom had
not been always the mulish, ignorant creature he
now was, but thatunlike me, in whom brutal
treatment had prevented the natural growth of
mindhe was one in whom mind, after a certain
stage of development, had been driven back, or
thrust out, by hard usage; yet not so completely but
that some relics and fragments of it might be seen
still lingering behind. Thus, with all his stupidity,
there might be occasionally detected in him gleams
of sense, the sparkles of a fire that had not been
wholly extinguished; and, amid all the coarseness
and profanity of his conversation, I was sometimes
struck with expressions that I fancied could have
been caught only among educated and refined people,
such as he never could have met on board the
Jumping Jenny. His spirit toofor, certainly, he
was a spunky little dog, as his continual, though
unavailing
,
resistance to the tyranny of all on board
provedcould never, according to my doctrine,
derived from my own experience, have existed, had
he been accustomed to such treatment from his
earliest days. Besides, it was quite evident he could
not have been in Skipper Duck's hands longer than
from the period of my deliverance. This had
happened
between five and six years ago; and as Boy
Tom was now at least fifteen years old, it followed
that at least ten years of his existence must have
been passed in otherand, doubtless, better hands
than those of Skipper Duck.
The more I speculated upon these things, the
greater became my interest in the boy, whose rude,
but kindly, attentions grew more frequent day by
day; until, at last, it was quite evident he took
19*
pleasure in being with me, giving me the benefit of
all the time he had to spare, as well as a great deal
that he had not. The more I saw of him, the stronger
grew my suspicion as to that connection between
our interests of which I have spoken before; and
several times I was seized withI cannot say, an
absolute persuasionbut a feeling that I had seen
him before, though where or when my puzzled
memory
could not say. And, one day, this impression
became so strong, that I could not resist questioning
him on the subject, for the purpose of satisfying my
curiosity; and truly, the result was surprising
enough. I asked him, what was his name.
Tom, said he, Boy Tom.
But your other name? demanded I; your
father's name?
Tom scratched his head with a stupid stare;
The Cappin's a father over me, said he
Cappin
Duck, dang his buttons.
But your
own
father, quoth I; you certainly
had a father; what was his name?
Never had no father, said Tom resolutely
had only a papa.
There was something in the use of the word
papa (not to speak of the confusion of ideas.)
that struck me; but judge my more than
astonishment
,
when, asking what was that papa's name,
the boy answered, without the slightest hesitation,
Dr. Howard.
I started up from my bunk, sick and feeble as I
was, and looked almost with terror upon the lad;
who, as if quite unconscious of having said any thing
at all surprising, continued to inform me that his
papa lived all the way off in Jersey,as if that
were at the other end of the earth. His father my
patron, Dr. Howard? himself my little schoolmate
Tommy, who had been drowned, as all the world
knew, or supposed, five years before? The idea was
too amazing for belief; but it had conjured up a
thousand sleeping memories, and as I looked into
the little wretch's face, I could now perceive points
of resemblance, not before noticed, which staggered
me from my incredulity.
You
Tommy
Howard
!
I exclaimed, with a faltering voice; to which
the poor oaf, taking the ejaculation for an inquiry,
answered blufflyNoBoy Tom, I tells you;
papa's name was Doctor Howard; but mine's Boy
Tom.
If Dr. Howard is your papa, you then must be
Tommy Howard, I said. Yet it cannot be.
Tommy
was drowned; every body said so; they found
his clothes on the shore.
Then looking again upon the urchin, who, not
comprehending my remarks, or the drift of them,
began to stir about as if he had already discharged
the subject of conversation from his thoughts, I
cried, as a new thought struck meIf you are
Tommy Howard, you must know
me:
I am your
old friend Robin Day!
Boy Tom stared at me with a face of great
simplicity
:Never
know'd no sich feller, said he.
What! not Robin Day, that fished you out of
the river, when you hit him with an oyster-shell?
Robin Day, that you taught his letters to?that
used to play with you in the garden all day long?
'Twar'n't no sich feller as Robin Day, said
Tom, very resolutely; 'twas little Sy Tough.
Ay, dang my buttons! he continued as the gleam
of recollection shot over his murky mind, Sy
was sich a feller for eatin' and drinkin!' Know'd
Sy Tough well enough; but never know'd no Robin
Day.
The reader will remember that Sy Tough was my
nickname at school; and he may judge how much of
satisfaction, mingled with pain, I felt at hearing it
thus pronounced by the poor boy;satisfaction,
because
,
to my mind, it afforded the clearest proof of
the identity of Boy Tom and the lost Tommy
Howard, and pain, because it was only with grief I
could look upon my old playmate and friend, the
child of my benefactor, thus degraded in intellect
and mannersa wreck of what he had been, a
nonentity compared with what he might, and ought
to have been.
But he was my patron's son, Tommy Howard,
there was no doubt of that! I could see it in his
visage, I could hear it in his voice, I could trace it
in his broken and confused recollections. Five
years of slavery in the hands of such a man as
Skipper Duck, were enough to make even the bright
little Tommy what he wasto rob him of every
faculty of mind, and every acquisition of manners,
feeling and knowledge: the only wonder was that
he should have retained any thing, that he should
have recollected any thing, that he should not have
been wholly brutalized.
But little Tommy Howard had been drowned
had not the whole village said so? had not every
one settled even the particulars of his death? I
conned the circumstances over in my mind. It was
true, every one believed little Tommy had been
drowned; but that did not prove he had been. All
that was actually known of the catastrophe was,
that Tommy, with some twenty or thirty other
urchins, had gone one evening into the river to
swim, amusing themselves as usual among the
shipping
or,
to be more correct, the
shalloping
moored about the wharves, and anchored in the
river; that he was missed, when his companions left
the water to dress, and only then, when some one
remarked an unclaimed bundle of clothes, which
were found to be his; that he was supposed to have
been drowned, because that was the easiest and most
natural way of accounting for his disappearance.
The river had been dragged for his body, though
without success. That made nothing, at the time,
against the belief in his unhappy end; but it was
now every thing in favour of my own conclusions.
Had his body been indeed found, the circumstances
of Boy Tom calling himself the son of Dr. Howard,
and remembering the name of Sy Tough, would
have been merely wonderful; as it had not been
found, it was, with these, another proof of his
existence
,
and of his being one and the same person
with Boy Tom.
It remained now to account for his sudden
disappearance
,
and his falling into the hands of Skipper
Duck; and here, although I received no assistance
whatever from him, his memory being on this point
as on most others, quite extinguished, I was at no
great loss to frame a plausible solution of the
difficulty
.
It will be remembered that Skipper Duck
had expiated his wrongs to me by a severe
punishment
by
fine and imprisonmentnot to speak of
the keel-hauling and banishment from our town for
ever; which visitations of justice were directly to be
traced to my patron, Dr. Howard, to bring him to
justice; and nothing could be more natural than that he
should seize any opportunity that fell in his power
of revenging himself upon the doctor, the cause of
his misfortunes. I, who knew the Skipper so well,
felt that the cutting of the doctor's throat itself
would not have been an enormity too great for him,
had it not been for the cowardice of his nature; the
only quality that kept him from the commission of
the greatest crimes. Upon revolving the matter in
my mind, viewing it in every way, I became
convinced
that, at the time of the catastrophe, Skipper
Duck must have been with his vessel in the river,
and, doubtless, in disguise, as was necessary to
his safetythat little Tommy had, by some means,
fallen into his handsperhaps, by swimming to, and
clambering into his vessel; which kind of visitations
it was a common thing for the boys to make to the
vessels anchored in the riverthat the Skipper had
recognised him as the son of his enemy and
persecutor
,
(as he, most probably, considered the doctor,)
and, upon an impulse of revenge, immediately
concealed
and carried him away, to wreak upon his
innocent body the revenge he owed the parent.
And such an act was not the less probable, that it
gained him a slave to fill the office from which I had
been removed. Then, by changing the scene of
his operations from the New Jersey to the
Chesapeake
waters, it was as easy to retain possession of
his prize as to escape the consequences of his crime.
Such was the way in which I explained the
marvel of poor Tommy's existence and debasement;
and such was, as it afterwards appeared, the true
explanation.
It may be supposed, with such a belief upon my
mind, that I did not cease my efforts to awake the
memory of the boy to the other facts and
circumstances
of his former life, to heap together still
further
(though I required no more convincing) proofs
of his identity. But here my ingenuity and
perseverance
were alike unrewarded: he knew nothing,
he remembered nothing, save that his papa's
name was Dr. Howard, who lived all the way off
in Jersey, and that he once had a playmate, Sy
Tough, whose head he had laid open with an oyster
shell, who had fished him, in return, from the bottom
of the river, and who was sich a feller for eatin'
and drinkin'!as, no doubt, I was, when first
translated from the house of famine to the fleshpots
of my patron's kitchen, and the apples and oranges
of little Tommy's storehouse in the garret. His
sister, his playmates, old Pedro the cookevery
thing else was forgotteneven the skill he had
imparted to me in reading, was gone:I found, in
making the experiment, he scarce knew one letter
from another. In short, he was such a ruin, such a
wreck of what he had been, so stupid of mind and
callous of feeling, that it pained me to the heart to
look at him, and, especially, to pursue the
investigations
,
which only the more glaringly revealed his
deficiencies. But I had one cheering hope:once
again in the hands of his father, I doubted not of his
speedy regeneration: the hand that had rescued an
alien from barbarism, would be still more powerful
to rescue the benighted son.
This discovery, by which I was greatly excited,
did what physic and my own desires had hitherto
failed to do; it put me immediately upon my legs;
and I crawled upon the deck to look up my friend
the lieutenant, and the villanous Duck, for the
purpose
of representing to the former the singular case
of little Tommy, and charging the latter with
kidnapping
him; besides, I hoped to procure the lad's
liberty, and have him sent back to his parent. But
neither the lieutenant nor the skipper were to be
found: the commander had gone off, with a single
boat's crew, taking Duck along with him, upon an
expedition, which proved very unfortunate, the
lieutenant losing his life, and all his crew, including
the skipper, being either destroyed or taken
prisoners
.
This we learned in the evening, when
another officer, an old midshipman, came on board
the Jumping Jenny, and read his orders to assume
the command of the Jumping Jenny.
To this officer, though somewhat daunted by his
looks, which were glum and ferocious, I did not long
defer carrying my story; though I must say, its
reception
,
as well as my own, was not very
encouraging
or flattering. I had not well opened my mouth
when he unlocked his own to pour a volley of abuse,
his wrath being caused, it seemed, by my audacity
in speaking to him without having been first invited
to do so; and he ended the explosion, by demanding
who the h I was? to which I replied, I was
a volunteer in his Majesty's service.
Volunteer be dd, quoth he, sending for the
ship's list, which he looked over for my name,
though, I believe, without finding it: upon which he
fell into a great passion, and swore I was a prisoner
of war and nothing better, until Mr. Gunner came
to my assistance, and bore witness I had volunteered
my services to
him
, that they had been accepted by
the late lieutenant, and, finally, that, as a volunteer I
had won my wounds, fighting bravely on shore at
the storming of Havre de Grace.
The commander then, with another oath, asked
me what I wanted; upon which I told him poor
Tommy's story, or, rather, as much as he would
hear, which was little enough: he dd Tommy's
eyes, as well as mine; and upon my preferring an
humble request, that he would give the former his
freedom, to return to his bereaved parent, he asked
me whether I was a volunteer horse, or volunteer
jackass? told me to mind my own business, and
then uncivilly dismissed me from his presencethat
is, he picked up a handspike, and threw it at my
head, as I was hastily, to avoid his wrath, descending
to my quarters.
Vol. I.20
CHAPTER XXXII.
Robin's plans of escape are interrupted, and he marches with the
British to the attack on Carney Island.
Having
thus lost all hope of effecting the
liberation
of my poor playmate through the humanity of
the lieutenant's successor, I now cast about for other
means of insuring my ends: and none better
offering
,
I laid a plan for escaping with him in a boat to
the shore, which I thought might be done, under
cover of the night, as the watch was not always kept
with great strictness; and, once upon terra-firma, I
thought it would be no great difficulty to find the
means of sending Tommy to his friends,
notwithstanding
that my unlucky circumstances rendered it
inexpedient for me to attempt turning my face
towards
the same quarter.
I digested and perfected the scheme at my
leisure
,
taking care to admit none to my counsels, not
even Tommy himself; who, I doubted not, would be
willing to fly with me from the tyranny of the
Jumping Jenny at a moment's warning, and upon
whose prudence and co-operation I saw it was
necessary
to rely as little as possible. At the same time,
having procured a sheet of paper from a literary
marine
,
who kept a journal of his exploits, I drew up a
long letter to my patron, which I designed to send
by Tommy; in which I described, first, the happy
discovery I had made, with all matters thereto
relating
;
and, in the second place, my own unlucky
adventures, from the time of leaving his house up to
the present moment. I was particular in explaining
the incident of the robber, that he might see I was
innocent of the charge laid at my doors by the
audacious
highwayman, as well as of the loss of the
horse, which that impudent fellow had ridden off
with; and I gave him the true account of my
adventures
with the false and the true Mr. Bloodmoney,
begging that he would clear up my character, which
had, no doubt, suffered in the estimation of that
worthy
gentleman. I informed him of my fortunate
escape (for so I considered it) from Mr. John Dabs
the constable; as well as of my unhappy encounter
with the British, begging him to observe that I had
volunteered to take arms with them, only for the
purpose of avoiding the horrors of a prison-ship,
and of effecting my escape to my own countrymen,
at the earliest opportunity. I concluded the missive
by detailing my plan of escape, and assuring him
that, as I intended to make Tommy the bearer of
my epistle, he might infer, upon the receipt of it,
that I had effected my purpose, and wa at liberty.
I ended by a postscript, in which I sent my love to
Nanna, with a hint that, as soon as I should escape
the British, and light upon my friend Dicky Dare,
she would, perhaps, hear farther of me in the papers,
fighting the battles of my country. My letter, when
finished, I concealed about my person, to have in
readiness for the moment of escape, which I now
resolved
should soon take place;and that before being
called upon again to bear arms in the service of his
Britannic Majesty.
My resolution, as far as it had reference to
fighting
again in the ranks of the enemy, it would have
been as well had I omitted, since it required to make
it good, the consent of other persons whose consent
might not have been so easily obtained. At all
events, after having quite settled the matter in my
own mind to my own satisfaction, I was given to
understand one fine morning, after being first
informed
I was discharged from the sick list, that I was,
that day, for the third time, to have the honour of
fighting his majesty's enemies, and ordered to
prepare
myself for action accordingly. This
information
was conveyed by my friend Tom Gunner, who,
noting my surprise, or perhaps a stronger feeling,
for I was, in his phrase, rather taken aback by it,
told me there was no use in being scared, as the
dd bullets never got out of one's way for being
afraid of them, and added, after all, d his heart,
he believed we were going, for once, to knock our
heads against a stone wall, and that some of us
would see Davy Jones before the day was over.
And in reply to my question, upon what expedition
we were bound, he told me we were to attack the
city of Norfolk, somewhere near to which the
whole fleet lay at anchor;that if we succeeded,
we should have hellish fine times among the
women
,
and grand picking among the crockery ware
and niggers; though, to his mind, we were more
like to come off with a salt eel than any thing
better
.
And upon my asking what made the
enterprise
more dangerous than usual, he replied, there
was a cursed island, with a cursed fort upon it, to
take, before we could approach the citythat the
cursed island, besides its cursed fort, was also
defended
by a cursed Yankee frigate, and twenty
cursed
Yankee gunboats, all which cursed things,
island and fortress, frigate and gunboats, were
manned with fellows that knew the difference
between grog and gunpowderwith sailors, d
his blood, that had seen service, and none of your
blasted milishy, that one could lick by merely
looking
hard at them.
However grieved I may have felt at this
unexpected
order, I had gained too much experience to
think of disputing it; and, accordingly, I made my
preparations, and, in a very brief time, found myself
in a barge, strongly manned and officered by the
new commander, which, with a great number of
others, now set off for the southern shore of James
River, near the mouth of whichthat is to say, in
Hampton Roadsthe British fleet lay anchored.
The reader, who is better conversant with
geographical
science, than I happened to be in those
days, knows that the position of Norfolk is upon a
smaller river that empties into James River, from
which the town is seven or eight miles removed.
Upon this smaller river, three miles above the James
River, lies Craney Islandthe cursed island
of Tom Gunnerseparated from the western bank
by a narrow channel, which is, I believe, fordable;
at least it was so reported among my friends the
British, who thereupon founded their plan of
attack
.
It was designed that a part of the invading
force should advance upon the island in the boats,
while the remainder, landing at the mouth of the
river, should march up behind the island, while its
defenders were engaged with the boats, wade the
narrow channel, and carry the works on the island
by storm.
The crew of the Jumping Jenny, it appeared, were
to take part with the latter division, composed of land
troops, (brought over by Admiral Warren,) marines,
and sailorsa destination which, I believe, gave
great pleasure to every soul in the division; for, as it
20*
was pretty generally understood that the fort on the
island was a fort in earnest, with abundance of
artillery
and men, not to speak of the frigate and twenty
gunboats, lying so convenient for its assistance, so it
was as commonly believed that the attack upon it in
front with barges would prove any thing but safe or
agreeable to those assigned to the duty. As for
myself
,
I was doubly pleasedpleased to escape the
dangers of the boat service, and pleased to put my
foot again upon dry land, where (so hot was now
my desire to escape,) I determined, if possible,
to desert the king's service, leaving little Tommy
Howard, not, indeed, to shift for himself, but to be
liberated in a way and by means to be afterwards
devised.
Our division landed without difficulty or
molestation
,
and immediately took up the line of march
towards
the object of attack, marching through
scrubby
woods and thickets, so as to strike the river in
the rear of the islandor, as Tom Gunner called it,
to take it astarn; and this part of our design we
effected without any accidentthat is, we came in
sight of the river and its island, the theatre on which
we were all shortly to play parts so important and
heroical. We came in sight of it at a moment of
great excitement and interest; for, just then, the
barges
were seen close to the island, upon which they
were rushing with furious spirit and speed, while a
host of blue-jacketssailors from the American
squadron drawn up in the river abovestood
behind
a breast-work on the shore, with artillery, to
dispute their landing. We could see the gunners
whirling their matches in the air, as if upon the
very point of firing; the expectation of which, with
the interest of the scene, brought our land army to
an involuntary halt, to behold the beginning of
the battle. It is true, our commanders dd our eyes,
and ordered us, some to march, and some to give
way, according as they belonged to the bull dog or
sea-dog families; but even they could not resist the
feeling of the moment, which chained all feet to the
ground, while all eyes were directed to the scene of
strife about to open. My eyes! said Tom
Gunner
,
opening them upon his friends in the barges
they gits it! which was a very prophetic speech
of Tom Gunner's.
At this moment, the forces in the boats, who, I
fancy had just caught sight of us, their coadjutors,
so opportunely arriving, set up a lusty cheer, and
dashed with renewed spirit against the island; and
a few more strokes of the oars would have carried
them to the strand; which, however, but few of them
were destined to reach. The blue-jackets returned
the cheer with another, not so loud, but quite as bold
and confident; and immediately we beheld some
ten or a dozen matchsticks descend upon the vents
of as many cannon, followed by a din of explosion
that shook the earth under our feet. The effect of
this discharge was, to my fancies, at least, prodigious.
The river was tossed into foam, its whole surface
around and among the boats converted into froth by
the showers of ball and grape-shot poured from the
cannon; while the fragments of at least one barge
shattered by a ball, were seen knocked into the air,
with, perhaps, the mangled limbs of several of her
crew, whose bodies were, an instant after, seen
scattered
over the tide. The assailants, undeterred by
the discharge, gave breath to another hurrah, which
was, however, cut short by a second broadside, that
rapidly succeeded the former, and, I believe, wrought
horrible havoc among them; but of this we could
now know nothing, as the smoke of the artillery
drove over the water as well as around the battery,
and concealed friend and foe alike from our
view. But from that nitrous cloud long came to
our ears the sounds of battlethe roar of the
American
cannon, as well as those in the boats, (for they
had ordnance on board, and now put them to use,)
the rattle of musketry, and the shouts of the
combatants
.
There was another reason why we should no
longer
take much note of the proceedings of our
comrades
;
which was a sudden occasion we found for
giving all our attention to our own interests. The
second volley of the blue jackets awoke the wrath
of our leaders, who gave the order again to march,
and carry the island at a blow. We had scarcely
turned our faces to obey, when we were petrified at
the sight of a multitude of men, spread through the
woods, some of them very tatterdemalion-looking
personages, but all armed and formed somewhat in
military order, who had marched upon us unaware,
and were still advancing full in our front. And to
make this apparition the more disagreeable, we
immediately
heard a strong voice among them,
doubtless
that of their leader, cry aloudNow, boys,
there they are, the villains!let them have it!
And, indeed they did let us have it immediately
that is to say, a volley of small arms, chiefly rifles,
I believe, by which at least a dozen of our men were
shot down, one of them, a sailor at my side, who
rolled his eyes, andhaving Tom Gunner's late
observation
on his memorygasped out, Now
we
gits it too, dn my blood,and immediately
expired
.
Cut the villains to pieces! they are only militia,
charge them out of the wood, cried our own
commander-in-chief; and my fellow soldiers, whose
blood was now up, obeying the order, rushed upon
the offending freemen with a fury not to be
withstood
;
and they immediately retreated, though in
very good order, rather backing away than flying,
and keeping up an incessant firing all the time. We
drove them thus through the woods a few hundred
paces; when, all of a sudden, a volley was fired at
us from the bushes on the river bank, which was on
our left; and turning to charge upon this new foe,
we received a third fire upon our backs from a
detachment
,
which, it appeared, had out-flanked us on
the right. At the same time, our adversaries in
front came to a stand, and having given us one more
salute with their rifles, suddenly unmasked a battery
of field-pieces, by the first discharge of which a score
of my comrades were made to bite the dust, and the
whole force thrown into confusion.
Of the remaining occurrences of the battle I do
not profess to be able to give any clear and
satisfactory
account, having been, in fact, thrown into
such disorder by the fire of the artillery, only a few
rods in front, and the havoc wrought by the great
balls among the trees, which came tumbling down
about our ears, and among our men, whose mangled
bodies, torn by these tremendous missiles, filled me
with horror and astonishment, that I was no longer
able to note the proceedings around. All that I
know is, that the militia were too strong, and their
fire too hot, for us; that we beat a retreat in our turn,
and were pursued by the enemy, whose numbers
seemed to increase as they followed us, and that our
forces, or at least that portion of them with which
I acted, were thrown into disorder by a furious
charge of the pursuers, who became, in a manner, for
a few moments, mingled with us, fighting in mele.
I remember very well that a company of the most
beggarly-looking militia of them all came rushing
up, like so many devils, to where I stood, (without yet
an opportunity to fly,) led on by a very young officer
in uniform, who flourished a long cut-and-thrust
sword, seemingly devoured by his own valour, and
furiously cheering his men to deeds of fame and
glory.
Up to this moment, the crew of the Jumping
Jenny had not suffered any very great loss, and
were able to retreat in a body, presenting a firm face
to the enemy. But the fury of the present attack,
levelled particularly against us, was more than we
could stand, especially as our captain (whom,
however
,
nobody regretted, he was such a tyrant,) was
shot down by a chance ball, as they came on.
Nevertheless
we (that is my comrades) made some show
of resistance, even when broken by the fury of the
shock, and engaged hand to hand with the assailants.
Tom Gunner, in particular, swearing he be dd if
he was going to be whipped by any riffraff
milishymen
,
and calling upon the men to remember `they
were beef-eating Britons, and not fever and aguy
Virginee Yankees,' rushed against the captain of the
enemy, with his cutlass, and immediately engaged
him hand to hand. Fierce, but brief, was the
conflict
;
thwack went the cutlass, clash went the cut
and thrust; Surrender, you bloody baby! roared
Tom Gunner, the epithet expressing his contempt
of the officer's youthful looks,Die, you British
thief! cried the latter; then thwack and clash, and
clash and thwack again; until, suddenly, the bold
Tom, vanquished by the superior fortune, or skill,
of his antagonist, fell to the ground, exclaiming,
I'm done for, dme, and ended his marauding
campaigns for ever;at least, I suppose so, that
being the last I ever saw or heard of him.
CHAPTER XXXIII.
Robin Day discovers his friend Dicky Dare; but his pleasure is
damped by a new misfortune,which separates him from his brother
adventurer, and sends him again upon the world a fugitive.
The
disorder into which our company was thrown
by this furious attack, afforded me the opportunity
I had so long desired for effecting my escapean
opportunity, however, of which I did not
immediately
take advantage, owing to my fears and
confusion
of mind; having no other thought at that
time but how to get out of the reach of the frantic
militia-men, who were dealing death upon all before
them. But a circumstance that befell in the battle
betwixt Tom Gunner and the young officer, which
was fought, as I may say, hard by me, startled me
from my panic, and recalled the thought of escape.
The appearance of the captain of militia presented
nothing unusual to my eyes; but his voice,
proclaiming
defiance and the confidence of victory over his
opponent, electrified my inmost spiritit was the
voice of my friend Dicky Dare! Yes! a look at him,
as his valiant arm whirled in the air to strike the
blow that brought the vanquished Gunner to his
feet, convinced me it was indeed he, whom the lustre
of a martial uniform could now no longer conceal
from my eyes. It was he, my friend and brother in
arms, fighting, like a young Mars, fighting in the
front ranks of victory, fighting, too, which was equally
advantageous and glorious, on exactly the right side,
on the side of his country.
The apparition of my friend and fellow
adventurer
,
so long lost, so long sought, filled me not only
with surprise, but with joy and rapture; and
shouting
his name, with a cry half plaintive, half
triumphant
,
I rushed towards him, to put myself under his
protection and command, with the full intention of
turning my arms against my friends of the Jumping
Jenny. But it was, I soon found, no easy matter to
claim an acquaintance, or renew a friendship, on the
field of battle.
A dozen combatants rushed between me and my
friend; and, worse than that, they turned their
unfriendly
arms against me, some crying No quarter
for the robbers, while others more mercifully bade
me Surrender, which I was very willing to do.
Surrender, you British murderer and plunderer!
cried one, with tones of the most virtuous
indignation
,
clutching me, at the same time, by the collar.
The voice was another surprise; and I beheld in the
captor no less a man than the missing master of the
Jumping Jenny, the detested Skipper Duck.
The villain recognised me at the moment of
speaking
,
and a grin of exultation illumined his dark and
vindictive countenance. Little Cock Robin! blast my
oyster-tongs! he cried, giving me at the same time,
a furious box on the ear, and another at the back of
it, before I could recover from my surprise. Then,
clutching me tighter than before, he swore I was a
valuable capturethat I was a traitor, an
American-born
subject, who had volunteered with the British,
and been with them at the burning of Frenchtown,
and Havre de Grace, and I know not how many
other fields of foray besidethat he was a witness,
and could swear to all he had charged me withthat
they themselves, the militia-men, had caught me in
the very act of treason, fighting, with the British,
against my own country and fellow-citizensfor
which I ought to be hanged; as I undoubtedly would
be. In short, I found that I had stepped from one
dilemma into another, that Skipper Duck had
consigned
,
or was on the point of consigning, me to
that very fate I had so patriotically proposed for
him, and that I was in the fairest possible way of
being carried to the gallows for high treason.
There was, indeed, some prospect of my escaping
this undesirable catastrophe, by being murdered on
the spot, Duck's companions, the militia-men, being
so exasperated by the charges, which I could not
contradict, (how could I, since they were all
perfectly
true,) that some of them proposed to blow
out my brains, without further ceremony or inquiry.
At this moment, while I was vainly struggling to
explain away the guilt of my apparent treason, by
representing from what good motives I had acted,
my friend Dicky Dare came hobbling up, (for, it
seemed, he had taken an honorable wound in the
battle,) and, with a tremendous voice of authority,
ordered his men to continue the pursuit of the
enemy, who were still on the retreat, declaring, as if
the lives of all mankind depended upon his will, that
not a soul of them, meaning the British, must
be suffered to reach their boats alive. Upon this,
all opened their lips to boast their fortunate capture
of a traitor, and I to claim the protection of my
brother-in-arms
.
Dicky Dare looked astonished at the sight of me,
and was still more amazed at the charge of treason
so volubly preferred by the malignant Skipper, and
so hotly confirmed by his companions; but putting
on the look of a commander-in-chief, and swearing
Vol. I.21
like a private, he ordered his men to follow after the
enemy without further delay, and leave the prisoner
to him: On my brave fellows! said the youthful
chiefthe enemy is not yet cut to pieces: on,
then, and cover yourselves with immortal glory!
Immortal glory for ever! hurrah for Uncle
Sam! cried the gallant ragamuffins, immediately
resuming the pursuit of the enemyall except
Skipper
Duck, who seized me by the collar again,
swearing
I was
his
prisoner, and he was n't going to
give me up for nobody, blast his fish-hooksbut
would carry me to head-quarters, where he expected
to be handsomely rewarded for his prize.
What, you mutinous rascal! do you disobey
orders
?
quoth Dicky Dare, aiming with his sword
a terrible blow at the refractory Skipper, which the
latter avoided by leaping aside, without, however,
loosing his hold of me; until I, encouraged by the
countenance of my friend, took part in the affray,
and knocked the vindictive caitiff down. He then
sneaked off, swearing, as he went, that he would
report the valiant Dicky at head quarters for
befriending
the renegade whom he had in vain taken
prisoner.
A confounded insolent scoundrel, said Dicky
in a fume;think, by Julius Csar, I have seen the
rascal before.
Yes, said I, it is that notorious villain,
Skipper
Duck, that used to be of our town.But
Dicky's thoughts were upon more important
subjects
.
I say, Mr. Robin Day, by Julius Csar, said
he, in great haste, yet with exceeding dignity
there's no time, while the battle is raging, to talk; a
brave man, sir, can think of nothing but fighting; so
we must be short.Do you mean to allow, sir, you
landed on this soil in company with British forces?
I did, Dicky. But
And that you came with arms in your hands, a
volunteer in the British service?
I did, Dicky. But
And that you fought with them at Frenchtown
and Havre-de-grace?
Yes, Dicky. But
But
what?
cried the young patriot, surveying
me with disgust, and putting on the lofty port of a
hero: do you expect to excuse such an act, sir? an
act of treason, sir? I'd have you to know, sir, by
Julius Csar, he added, with increased dignity and
emphasis, I despise a traitor above all created things!
My old friend Sy Tough a volunteer in the British
service!
I explained to him that that was a mere stratagem
of warthat I had volunteered in the first place by
mistake, and then continued to bear arms only for
the purpose of effecting my escape to my friends,
the Americans.
Hem, said Dicky, with the snort of a
war-horse
blowing the breath of contempt on his enemies,
and do you suppose that
that
excuse will serve
your turn at a court-martial? that such a motive as
thator
any
motive, by Julius Csar, sir, will
justify
you
, sir, or any body, sir, by Julius Csar, sir,
in taking up arms against your country, sir?
These questions fairly set my hair upon end; and
I felt that it was a great omission I had made not to
ask them of myself, when first adopting that
sagacious
device by which I designed to effect my escape
from the British.
I believe I have been a great fool, Dicky, said
I; but I hope you will do me the justice to believe
my motives were good.
Confound your motives, said General Dare,
sublimely; actions, sir, actions are the things the
government and people of the United States will
look to. And as for actions, here you are, sir, taken
in action, with arms in your hands, fighting against
your country! I say, sir, by Julius Csar! he
cried, do you know what will be the end of all this?
do you know, sir, what is the punishment for taking
service with the enemy?
I stammered out a faltering hope that my case
was not so bad as he would have me believe.
For my part, said Dicky, I don't know
whether they shoot traitors or hang them; but one
or the other is certain for you, by Julius Csar.
You are taken a prisoner to head-quarters, accused
of high treason, convicted by a court martial, and
up you goor
down
, sir, I don't know whichbut
hemp or lead finishes the business!
Alas, Dicky! I cried, reduced to despair; and
demanded if he could not, or would not, help me
out of my desperate predicament.
That's exactly what I mean to do, said Dickey
Dare, with loftier emphasis than ever. I hate and
despise a traitor beyond mention; but, for old love's
sake, and considering it is your first offence, I
pardon
you. Go, sir, by Julius Csar; I give you your
life and libertyI release you:go, fly, save your
baconrun, jump, cut stick, clear out! make streaks,
I tell you, and hide in woods and caves from the
wrath of your injured and offended country. As
for me, sir, by Julius Csar, here goes again for
another knock at her enemies!
With these words, the youthful patriot ran
hobbling
through the woods after his company and the
flying foe; and I, conscious of my crime and of the
imminent danger it had plunged me into, betook me
to my heels returning in another direction, in which,
I judged, there was least fear of falling again into
the hands of my injured and offended countrymen.
21*
CHAPTER XXXIV.
In which Robin Day stumbles upon another acquaintance and
companion
in affliction.
The
words of my friendI don't know
whether they shoot traitors or hang them, but hemp
or lead must finish the businessremained
jingling
in my ears for many hours after I lost sight of
him, and stimulated the violent exertions which I
made to escape the dangerous vicinity of the battle.
I ran through the woods and fields, until the lesser
sounds of conflict, the shouts and rattle of musketry,
no longer came to my ears; though I could long hear,
at intervals, the dying thunder of the cannon. But,
by and by, even this was no longer heard, and I had
therefore reason to fancy myself beyond the
immediate
danger of pursuit, supposing that pursuit should
be attempted; which I thought not unlikely,
considering
the malicious temper of my foe, Skipper
Duck. Nevertheless, I did not cease running at the
very top of my speed as long as my strength held,
being impelled by the urgency of my fears to make
the most of my time; and, even when quite worn
out by my exertions, and obliged to pause to take
breath, I allowed myself only a few moments of
rest, and immediately resumed my journey, which I
pursued as fast as I could walk, until late in the
afternoon
,
when, I felt satisfied I had left the field of
battle more than twenty miles behind me.
Whither I was going I did not greatly trouble
myself to take into consideration. My first object
was to get out of danger, and beyond the reach
of the patriotic militia-men, which it appeared to
me would be most easily effected by striking away
from the coast, where I supposed all the fighting-men
of Virginia were now concentrated, to repel the
invader
;
and I had some vague kind of notion, that,
once out of their reach, I would hunt up some other
field of glory, and there, by fighting very valiantly
on the side of my country, wipe out the sin of
treason
,
of which I had been guilty in act, though not
in intention.
My first object, then, was to make my way into
the interior; my next desire was to proceed with as
little risk of interruption as possible; for which
reason I avoided, at least during the greater portion
of the day, all public roads, confining myself to the
barren pine woods with which that country is
covered
,
and in which I had less fear of stumbling upon
suspicious personsfor, truly, that day, I thought
all persons were suspicious. With the same view,
I eschewed all human habitations, giving a wide
berth to every farm house and cottage it was my
fate to see, not knowing what dangers I might
encounter
,
by approaching them. And hence it
happened
,
as I had laid in no store of provender for my
journey, that I was in quite a state of famine
towards
evening; at which period, weary and forlorn,
I sat down upon the bank of a small river, where a
by-road crossed it, to bewail my hard fate, and to
devise some means, if possible, of escaping a death
of starvation.
As for my hard fate, it was now undoubtedly
harder than ever; and I could not but wonder, while
I grieved, at the variety of perils, which a
persecuting
fortune had, in so short a period, heaped upon
my back. First, I had brought myself under the
danger of the law for a murderfor, be it
remembered
,
I had no knowledge of the restoration to life
of the unfortunate M'Goggin, Mr. John Dabs's
advices
to the contrary notwithstanding; secondly, I
lay under an accusation of highway robbery and
horse-stealing; thirdly, I had been drawn into the
commission of a burglary, and a most incredibly
audacious one, too; and, last and worst of all, I was
a traitor to my country, accused, convicted,
condemned
,
(at least by my friend Dicky Dare,) with
the most undeniable prospect of being hanged, or
shot, for my pains, the moment my country should
catch me. And all this had happened within the
few weeks in which I had been left to govern
myself
by my own wisdom. Alas! I cried,
beginning
to doubt whether my wisdom was so great as
I had supposed it to bea doubt most distressing to
a sensible personbeginning to question even my
ability to take care of myselfa question still more
afflicting to a young person who has believed
himself
for a while much cleverer than others of his
species.
My hunger was also an evil which sorely
oppressed
me, and the more bitterly as I had still a
handsome sum of money about me, enough to buy
food for a regiment, but which I durst not apply to
relieving my wants; for I was afraid lest the
attempt
should only lead to my being taken up for a
suspicious person.
When I reflected upon these things, and
remembered
that I was a stranger in a strange land, flying
I knew not well whither, but, as I greatly feared,
only from one chapter of dangers to another, being
very hungry besides, the tears coursed down my
cheeks, and I gave myself up to despair. One while
I thought I would hang myself in the wood, in
which I must otherwise make my bed; and then I
thought I would try and catch a terrapin in the
creek for my supper. But the terrapin slided off
his log, the moment I began to look too hard at
him; and the thought of suspension passed from my
mind, as too disagreeable to be debated. Now, I
had some notion of going back to the militia, to
surrender myself to the court martial, trusting to
the influence of my friend Dicky Dare, whose
regimentals
convinced me he had become a great
character, to come off in safety; and then I half
proposed even to return to New Jersey and take
my trial for the killing of M'Goggin. In the one
case, I should have the satisfaction of being near my
brother in arms; in the other, of being befriended
by my beneficent patron; but in either, I must run
a risk of hemp or lead, which I could not abide to
think of. But what was I to do? how was I to
escape the perils that followed me behind, and
perhaps
environed me in front? and, also, how was I
to get my supper?
While I sat weeping, and asking myself these
questions in vain, entirely absorbed by the greatness
of my distresses, I was surprised by the sudden
appearance
of a horseman; who rode up through the
soft sandy road, without my hearing him, or
suspecting
his presence, until he made it known by an
abrupt question; I say, brother, dn my blood,
he cried, do you swim this river, or jump over it?
The sound of a man's voice so near me, my
dangers considered, was sufficiently alarming; but
there was something in the speaker's tones that
doubled my dread; which was still further
increased
,
when looking in his face, I perceived to my
amazement the harsh features of the
pseudo-Bloodmoney
,
my fellow burglar, the redoubted Brown,
alias
Captain Hellcat.
Nor was his memory a whit more backward than
my own: he recognized me in a moment, looked
astonished, and then burst into an immoderate fit of
laughter, demanding, with great emphasis, What
cheer now, lieutenant?
END OF VOL. I.